NEW  AIRCRAFT  IN  THE 

NATIONAL  AIRSPACE  SYSTEM 

S.  HRG.  109–1157 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  28,  2006 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

71–841 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION 

CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Ranking 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 28, 2006  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Burns  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Andersson, Matthew G., Senior Aviation Consultant, Aerospace, Defense, and 
Transportation, CRA International, Inc.  ............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cirillo,  Michael  A.,  Vice  President,  Systems  Operation  Services,  Air  Traffic 
Organization, Federal Aviation Administration  ................................................
Joint prepared statement  .................................................................................
Iacobucci, Edward E., President/CEO, DayJet Corporation  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Pelton,  Jack  J.,  Chairman,  General  Aviation  Manufacturers  Association; 
Chairman,  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer,  Cessna  Aircraft  Com-
pany  .......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Raburn, Vern, President/CEO, Eclipse Aviation Corporation  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sabatini,  Nicholas  A.,  Associate  Administrator  for  Aviation  Safety,  Federal 
Aviation Administration  ......................................................................................
Joint prepared statement  .................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Air Transport Association of America, Inc., prepared statement  ........................
Honda Aircraft Company, prepared statement  .....................................................
Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Conrad Burns to: 

Matthew G. Andersson  .....................................................................................
Edward E. Iacobucci  .........................................................................................
Vern Raburn 
.....................................................................................................

Page 
1 
4 
3 
2 
1 

41 
44 

8 
9 
33 
34 

36 
37 
22 
23 

6 
9 

57 
62 
53 

55 
53 
54 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

NEW  AIRCRAFT  IN  THE 

NATIONAL  AIRSPACE  SYSTEM 

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  28,  2006 

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

Washington, DC. 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:07 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Chairman of the full Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Good  morning.  My  apologies  for  being  late.  In 
the  last  days  of  any  Congress,  there  are  an  enormous  number  of 
things  that  have  to  be  handled,  and  conferences.  I  do  apologize. 
And I apologize to you, Senator Rockefeller, for being late. 

The  Chairman  of  this  Subcommittee  will  be  here  shortly  to  take 
over this hearing. He is at the Armed Services Committee meeting, 
which  is  an  important  meeting,  and  as  soon  as  he  can  get  away, 
he will come. 

The issues we are here to discuss are critical to the future of our 
national  aviation  and  aerospace  system.  The  very  light  jets,  or,  I 
have  called,  the  ‘‘mosquito  fleet,’’  without  trying  to  be  derogatory 
at all, will be—soon be a part of our daily air travel in our Nation. 
Just  as  regional  jets  vastly  increased  the  number  of  planes  in  our 
national airspace, this new fleet has the potential to do even great-
er—to add even greater numbers to it. 

The  first  wave  of  this  fleet  is  expected  to  hit  the  market  next 
year, and that increase could revolutionize air traffic—the air traf-
fic  business.  At  around  $2  million  each,  on  an  estimated  basis, 
these new minijets will be within reach of thousands of individuals 
and companies, and have the potential to create a booming air taxi 
industry. 

Unmanned aircraft are also poised to enter our national airspace. 
They  have  been  used  by  the  military  since  World  War  II.  In  those 
days,  as  I  reminded  the  Committee  recently,  pilots  took  those  air-
craft off, and then they parachuted out, and the planes were flown 
remotely  to  targets.  That  is  not  the  situation  now,  of  course.  Un-
manned aircraft play an integral part in fighting the wars in which 
we’re involved now, particularly the war against the terrorists. And 
UAVs have the potential of being a key line of defense for our first 
responders. We have asked, actually, that they be tested in Alaska 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

to  determine  whether  or  not  they  can  play  a  significant  role  in 
maritime boundary enforcement and protecting our fisheries. 

We look forward to hearing from our witnesses today. And we ur-
gently hope we can work together to ensure that our National Air-
space  System  can,  and  will,  accommodate  all  manner  of  new  avia-
tion  transport,  as  well  as  face  a  period  of  upgrading  of  the  whole 
system itself. 

Senator Rockefeller? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  think  the  UAVs  can  patrol  very  well,  fishing  boundaries.  It’s  a 

Carolina. 

good use for them. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  It’s  a  question  of  icing,  Senator.  We—they  gen-
erally  do  not  have  icing—deicing  equipment,  and  some  of  those 
spaces  which  have  to  be  patrolled  have  an  enormous  icing  poten-
tial, so—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. They must have been talking about South 

[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  The  southern  coast  could  easily  be  done.  We’re 
talking  about  the  maritime  boundary  between  the  United  States 
and Russia. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I gotcha. 
Next year, this Committee’s going to have to reauthorize the Fed-
eral Aviation Administration. I’m certainly in hopes that we will do 
that.  One  of  the  most  important  challenges  we  have  to  address  is 
how  to  make  sure  our  aviation  system  can  absorb  all  growth  in 
traffic, any growth in traffic. 

Now, the FAA predicts that commercial air travel is scheduled to 
increase by nearly 50 percent over the next 10 years. Compounding 
the  uncertainties  surrounding  the  ability  of  our  aviation  system  to 
meet  future  needs  is  the  potential  impact  of  new  types  of  aircraft 
on the aviation system. 

I’ve been working on a different—not mosquito jet, but it’s a dif-
ferent kind of jet—for 15 years, with Taiwan, something called Sino 
Swearingen,  and  it’s  completely  a  new  innovative,  small  business 
jet,  but  it’s  not  what  we’re  talking  about  here.  And  I’m  pleased  to 
say  that  it’s  certified.  I  know  that  in  addition  to  new  business  jets 
coming onto the market, a number of innovative kinds of small air-
craft,  called  very  light  jets,  or  microjets,  are  in  the  process  of  cer-
tification or already in production. 

I  confess  to  you  that  I’m  mystified  about  this  phenomenon,  and 
that’s  why  these  two  gentlemen  are  sitting  before  us,  so  that—to 
demystify all of this. 

These  new  planes,  whether  they’re  small  business  jets  or  very 
light  jets,  have  the  potential  to  be—not  necessarily,  but  the  poten-
tial  to  be  very  disruptive  to  the  aviation  system.  I  do  not  use  that 
term  ‘‘disruptive’’  in  a  pejorative  sense.  I’m  a  strong  supporter  of 
general  aviation.  I  would  not  have  spent  all  those  years  working 
on  that  project  with  Taiwan  if  I  was  not  that  way.  But  I  am  con-
cerned  that  our  aviation  system  is  not  prepared  to  handle  the  im-
pact  of  all  categories  of  new  jets,  and  particularly  these  microjets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Now, granted, they fly at 41,000 feet, or they say they do. On any 
given  day,  as  many  as  two-thirds  of  all  airplanes  in  the  sky  are, 
in  fact,  general  aviation  planes.  Most  people  don’t  know  that.  And 
it becomes very important in all matters, including airport security. 
And  general  aviation  represents  about  15  percent  of  the  aircraft 
interacting  with  our  air  traffic  control  resources.  However,  the  in-
troduction  of  these  new  aircraft  could  alter  how  general  aviation 
impacts  the  aviation  system.  We’re  all—we  all  recognize  that  the 
very  light  jets  will  have  to  use  air  traffic  control  system.  They’re 
taxis  that  are  going  to  be  under  FAA.  Whether  the  introduction  of 
these planes into the system is gradual or explosive, the fact is that 
the composition of the planes in the sky is changing, the nature of 
air travel is changing. We must make sure, in our reauthorization, 
that  the  FAA  has  the  tools  and  the  resources  to  adapt  to  this 
changing environment. 

And  I’m  worried  about  resources.  I’ll  get  to  that  in  my  question 

The  other  issue  I  want  to  raise  today  is  that  we  must  consider 
security issues associated with an increase in general aviation traf-
fic.  I  know  the  general  aviation  community  does  not  see  itself  as 
a risk. I differ from them in that respect. We must make sure that 
the  influx  of  small  jet  aircraft  flying  from  hundreds  of  small  air-
ports into national airspace does not open up a new hole in our sys-
tem of the—aviation security. 

So, we have a lot of challenges, and we’re going to have an inter-

period. 

esting discussion this morning. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you. 
Senator Lautenberg, do have an opening statement? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. A short one, Mr. Chairman, thank you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. We really need to hold this hearing on the 
impact  of  very  light  jets  on  our  aviation  system.  One  hundred 
microjets  could  take  flight  by  year’s  end.  That’s  according  to  the 
FAA. Four hundred to five hundred could take to the skies over the 
next decade, for a total of almost 5,000 by 2017. These planes hold 
great  potential  to  fly  people  into  American  cities  and  towns  that 
they had trouble reaching before. But before we fly into the future, 
we’ve got to resolve some problems concerning the present and the 
past. 

Before  we  put  a  new  plane  in  the  sky,  we  ought  to  look  at  a 
record  that  we  have  about  some  airplanes  that  we  sent  up  before, 
more  than  40  years  ago,  the  MU–2  Mitsubishi  twin  turboprop 
plane. Twenty-five percent of those planes have since been involved 
in a serious series of fatal crashes—with these three crashes alone, 
this—where—three crashes this summer. But if you ask FAA about 
the MU–2, they’ll say that all systems are go, and that the problem 
is pilot error. Before we consider a new airplane, we’ve got to have 
the courage to look into what’s taken place with the MU–2. 

And,  second,  before  we  put  a  new  plane  in  the  sky,  we’ve  got  to 
see the effects of that on the aviation system. The equipment in our 
towers is outdated. The number of controllers in those towers is too 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

low.  We’ve  already  had  1,081  fewer  controllers  in  our  towers  than 
we did 3 years ago. And 70 percent of those controllers are eligible 
for  retirement  by  2011.  So,  as  the  workload  increases,  so  do  the 
number of people who plan to retire. 

And  I  think  it’s  fair  to  say  that  the  judgment  is  that  it  takes  4 
years  to  train  a  controller  fully,  and  yet  the  FAA  has  still  not  de-
veloped a plan to hire new staff for our control towers. 

At the same time 760 million people fly within the United States 
every year. By 2015, we’re going to hit 1 billion passengers. So, be-
fore  we  consider  new  aircraft,  we  need  full  controller  staff  to  han-
dle the planes that are currently in the sky. We saw the tragic re-
sults  of  controller  shortages  recently  in  Kentucky.  In  August, 
Conair Flight 5191 crashed, 49 people lost their lives. Only one air 
traffic  controller  was  on  duty,  and  that’s  contrary  to  Federal  Avia-
tion Administration policy. 

So,  while  the  NTSB  continues  its  investigation,  we  owe  it  to  the 
public  to  find  out  why  the  FAA  is  not  meeting  its  own  standards. 
Now,  I’ve  asked  the  Subcommittee,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  a  hearing 
specifically  on  the  Kentucky  crash  and  whether  the  FAA  is  prop-
erly staffing air traffic control facilities for our future. So, we have 
not  yet  been  able  to  have  that  hearing,  but  I  hope,  at  the  earliest 
opportunity,  that  we’ll  do  that.  And  so,  before  we  consider  a  new 
plane, I urge the Subcommittee to act. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, Senator, I think that’s a very unfair state-

ment. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Perhaps—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  think  this  system  is  working.  We’ve  had  enor-
mous  new  entries.  We  don’t  put  one  plane  in  the  sky.  They’re  put 
in the sky by private people, by companies who try to enter the sys-
tem.  The  government  doesn’t  put  anybody  in  the  air.  We  can’t  de-
termine—we’ve  got  to  prepare  the  system  so  it  can  take  on  this 
new,  coming  addition  to  the  system.  It’s  not  something  that  we— 
where we can say, ‘‘You can’t do it.’’ It’s going to happen. So, I real-
ly think the political statement, at this time, at—when we’re trying 
to find out what the facts are concerning how to deal with this new 
system—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Chairman—— 
The CHAIRMAN.—is absolutely wrong. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  we’re  going  enter  into  a 

debate, I’m going to ask for a chance to respond. 

The CHAIRMAN. You can have—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I didn’t—— 
The CHAIRMAN.—all the time you—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I didn’t—— 
The CHAIRMAN.—want to respond, but—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I didn’t—— 
The CHAIRMAN.—that’s an unfair statement. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I didn’t say—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 

Senator BURNS [presiding]. Order. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  now,  you  weren’t  in  the 
room, so I want to have an opportunity to respond to an accusation 
that  was  made  that  I  suggest  that  the  system  isn’t  working.  Not 
at all. It works. I spend a lot of time in the sky, and I know you’re 
a  pilot,  but  I  would  tell  you  this,  that  there  are  shortages.  I  go  to 
Newark  Airport.  That’s  one  of  the  busiest  in  the  country.  We’re 
short 10 percent. We’re short almost a hundred FAA controllers in 
that facility alone. That’s a lot of—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Let’s go to the floor and debate—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—a lot of people. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—this.  We  don’t  want—you  said  we  can’t  put  an-

other plane in the sky. 

here—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Those were your words, Senator. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. All right, I’m sorry, an error. We’re talking 

about TSA, at the—five controllers short. 

Senator  BURNS.  If  I  could—if  I  could  assume  a  little  control 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS.—get my hand on the stick and the ‘‘go’’ knob. 
Thank  you  all  for  your  opinions.  And  I’ll  just  make  my  state-

ment. How’s that? Is that all right with the rest of the—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. You’re in charge. 
Senator BURNS.—Committee? Thank you very much. 
I  want  to  thank  the  folks  who  will  be  showing  up  today.  We’re 
going to focus on a different situation, as we are coming up a year 
away  from  reauthorizing  the  FAA.  And  I  think  we’re  going  to  talk 
about some things that are very, very—will be very, very important 
in that reauthorization in how we handle our air traffic. 

We’re going to be talking about very light jets today, and UAVs, 
and  we’ll  review  the  information  of  developing,  certifying,  selling, 
and flying these new aircraft types, along with the challenges of in-
tegrating them with the current aviation system in a safe manner. 
And  I  would  tell  the—I  want  to  emphasize  the  safe  manner,  be-
cause that’s what we do, we err on the side of safety. 

The  introduction  of  potentially  large  numbers  of  very  light  jets 
into  the  National  Airspace  System  and  the  request  from  industry 
and  government  agency  for  speedy  certification  of  certain  UAVs  to 
operate  in  U.S.  airspace  raises  numerous  short-  and  long-time—or 
long-term policy and safety issues for the Federal Aviation Admin-
istration, and, of course, this Committee. 

In addition, earlier this year we held a hearing on the Joint Pro-
gram  and  Development  Office,  who  is  assigned  the  task  of  devel-
oping the Next-Generation Air Transportation System. It is impor-
tant  we  start  to  understand  the  impact  of  the  very  light  jets  and 
the  UAVs,  what  they  will  have  on  our  aviation  traffic.  How  will 
these  new  aircraft  interact  with  the  current  system?  Will  some  of 
the new aircraft types simply replace the current operations? Well, 
I will tell you, those are big, big questions. 

To  date,  there  has  been  a  lot  of  speculation  and  back-and-forth 
about  the  actual  impact  in  the  number  of  aircraft  that  we  should 
anticipate. On one hand, commercial aviation interests have argued 
that, based on the very optimistic, very light jet forecast, those jets 
will  clog  our  air  traffic  control  system  increase  congestion,  and  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

crease  costs,  and  not  pay  their  fair  share  of  the  costs.  And,  on  the 
other hand, general aviation interests have generally maintained a 
more  conservative  forecast  of  these  light  jets,  and  argue  that  the 
modest additional aircraft can easily be accommodated into the Na-
tional Airspace System, as they are today. We hope to clarify some 
of  those  differences  today.  Not  all  of  them,  because  the  questions 
are too big. Ultimately, the free market will probably have the final 
say. 

In  addition,  like  many  of  my  colleagues,  I’m  interested  in  the— 
effectively  utilizing  sophisticated  UAVs  to  improve  our  border  de-
fense, wildfire-fighting and capabilities, among other uses. The bot-
tom line is, where do we need to do it? And can we do it safely and 
create  a  smooth  and  noncumbersome  integration  of  the  UAVs  into 
the  general  aviation  and  commercial  aviation  communities?  And  I 
couldn’t  ask  for  a  better  Ranking  Member  on  this  Subcommittee 
than  Senator  Rockefeller,  and  we’re  going  to  pursue  this  with  a 
great  deal  of  energy  and  vigor,  and  we’ll—and  we  hope  that  we’ll 
come up with some answers. 

Today,  we’re  happy  to  have  Mr.  Michael  Cirillo,  who  is  Vice 
President of System Operations Services of Air Traffic Organization 
for the FAA, and Mr. Nicholas Sabatini. I was wondering if—that’s 
all they’re hiring over there nowadays, I suppose, huh? 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BURNS.  I’ve  had  the  pleasure  of  meeting  both  of  these 
gentlemen, and they are looking at monumental questions, and try-
ing  to  answer  them.  And  we  appreciate  both  of  you  coming  today. 

Mr. Cirillo, we will hear your testimony first. 
Oh, Mr. Sabatini is going to start, OK. All right. Thank you. 
Mr. Sabatini? 
And I assume you’ve made your statement and everything. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I did. But I can make it again. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. No, they didn’t want to hear mine the first time. 
Mr. Sabatini, please. 

STATEMENT OF NICHOLAS A. SABATINI, 

ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR FOR AVIATION SAFETY, 

FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Rocke-

feller, and Members of the Subcommittee. 

I am pleased to be here this morning to dispel any concerns you 
may have with certification and regulations regarding the introduc-
tion  of  new  aircraft  into  our  Nation’s  airspace.  Together  with  my 
colleague Mike Cirillo, we represent every step in the process of the 
successful  integration  of  new  aircraft  into  the  National  Airspace 
System,  from  certification  of  the  airframe  to  certification  of  the  pi-
lots  to  the  introduction  of  the  high-tech  tools  that  have  enhanced 
the safety of operations and made our air traffic control infrastruc-
ture as robust and flexible as it has ever been. 

The  system  is  in  place  today  to  accommodate  the  entry  of  new 
aircraft into the National Airspace System. This is nothing new for 
the  FAA.  It  is  our  day-to-day  business.  We  have  established  sys-
tems  in  place  to  assure  a  safe  introduction  of  aircraft,  no  matter 
the  size,  speed,  performance  capability,  manned  or  unmanned. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

From  when  FAA’s  predecessor  agency  certified  the  first  Buhl 
Airster  in  1927  to  the  introduction  of  the  Boeing  707  in  the  late 
1950s and the dawning of the Jet Age in the 1960s, FAA’s business 
has been to successfully assimilate new aircraft into the NAS. 

When  the  Boeing  707  began  its  transcontinental  flights  in  the 
1950s, the average airspeed of a passenger aircraft more than dou-
bled overnight, from about 220 knots to more than 500 knots. FAA 
was  able  to  successfully  mix  the  Boeing  707  into  a  system  largely 
populated  with  piston-powered,  propeller-driven  aircraft.  And  this 
transition  into  the  Jet  Age  took  place  with  an  infrastructure  that 
was,  at  that  time,  50  years  old.  The  system  is  much  more  robust 
today,  with  better  technology,  more  precision,  and  greater  flexi-
bility than any time in our history. 

FAA  has  tried-and-true  mechanisms  and  controls  in  place  to  as-
sure the safe introduction of new aircraft, and nothing indicates to 
us  that  the  introduction  of  VLJs  or  unmanned  aircraft  will  be  as 
operationally transformational as the introduction of jets. 

The  FAA  has  long-established  operating  procedures  that  ensure 
different  types  and  vintages  of  aircraft  are  operated  at  compatible 
airspeeds  in  congested  airspace  or  while  en  route  to  and  from  the 
high-altitude  structure.  We  have  done  it  time  and  again  over  the 
course  of  FAA’s  history,  and  the  introductions  have  proven  un-
eventful. We know how to do this. 

In addition, by the time a new aircraft is ready for its entry into 
service  and  the  domestic  airspace,  FAA  engineers,  pilots,  and  in-
spectors have been over every inch of the design, production, oper-
ating  procedures,  flight  envelope,  training  requirements,  and  how 
to  maintain  the  aircraft’s  continued  airworthiness.  FAA  also  cer-
tifies the pilots. We have established mechanisms to assure that pi-
lots  meet  proficiency  and  medical  standards  for  the  safe  operation 
of  aircraft.  Furthermore,  with  new,  sophisticated  aircraft,  we  have 
increased  emphasis  on  pilot  training  to  help  pilots  develop  the 
skills and in-depth systems knowledge to assure safe operating pro-
cedures for these aircraft. 

In  addition,  we  certify  air  traffic  procedures,  in  conjunction  with 
the Air Traffic Organization, based on the new aircraft size, speed, 
and capabilities to assure safe operating environment. 

Today’s  aircraft  enter  a  more  sophisticated,  technologically  ad-
vanced,  and  precise  system  than  ever  before.  Aircraft  avionics  are 
more advanced, as well, with more precise autopilot and altimetry, 
and improved navigational systems, which allow for procedures like 
RVSM. From beginning to end, nothing is left to chance. 

A  large  part  of  the  unprecedented  safety  record  that  the  U.S.  is 
now  enjoying  is  due  to  the  synergistic  partnering  of  industry,  aca-
demia,  and  government,  recognizing  that  we  all  share  the  same 
goal:  aviation  safety.  This  cooperation  is  a  large  reason  why  the 
United  States  aviation  system  is  the  envy  of  the  world.  It  is  why 
our citizens can fly with such assurance of safety. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  to  you  today,  and  I  now 
would like to turn the mike over to my colleague Mike Cirillo, who 
will talk about the ATO and their plans to integrate these new air-
craft into the air traffic control system. 

Senator  BURNS.  Mr.  Cirillo,  thank  you  very  much  for  coming 
today.  We  appreciate  it  and  we  look  forward  to  your  testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Now,  if  you  go  over  5  minutes,  why,  if  you  can  consolidate  your 
statement, that would be fine, but your full statement will be made 
part of the record. And thank you for coming today. 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL A. CIRILLO, VICE PRESIDENT, 

SYSTEM OPERATIONS SERVICES, AIR TRAFFIC 

ORGANIZATION, FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Well,  thank  you,  and  good  morning,  Chairman 

Burns, Senator Rockefeller, and Members of the Subcommittee. 

I’m here this morning with my colleague Nick Sabatini to discuss 
FAA’s  plans  to  safely  integrate  very  light  jets  and  unmanned  air-
craft  into  the  NAS.  To  reiterate  what  Mr.  Sabatini  just  said,  the 
FAA is involved in the introduction of new aircraft types, from the 
drawing board to the runway. We’re there every step of the way to 
ensure  that  new  aircraft  are  designed,  manufactured,  maintained, 
and operated safely. Our safety record is the envy of the world. We 
leave nothing to chance. 

Our  Nation’s  air  traffic  management  system  is  also  the  most 
technologically  advanced,  precise,  and  robust  system  in  the  world. 
Our  workforce  is  constantly  striving  to  improve  safety  and  effi-
ciency.  The  ATO  is  producing  results  today  that  have  already  in-
creased  capacity  and  improved  efficiency.  In  conjunction  with  the 
Joint  Planning  and  Development  Office,  we’re  designing  the  Next- 
Generation Air Transportation System. 

I’d  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  describe  to  you  some  of  the 
programs we’re implementing today that are laying the foundation 
for the NextGen system. 

Last  year,  we  implemented  Domestic  Reduced  Vertical  Separa-
tion  Minimum.  DRVSM  has  significantly  increased  capacity  in  the 
high  altitude  en  route  airspace  by  doubling  the  number  of  usable 
altitudes between 29,000 and 41,000 feet, which is the level where 
commercial airliners fly. DRVSM permits controllers to reduce min-
imum vertical separation at these altitudes from 2,000 feet to 1,000 
feet; thus, allowing twice the capacity in the same airspace. 

Last  month,  the  FAA  approved  the  updated  Roadmap  for  Per-
formance-Based  Navigation,  which  was  developed  in  cooperation 
with the aviation industry. The 2006 Roadmap focuses on address-
ing  future  efficiency  and  capacity  needs  while  maintaining  or  im-
proving  the  safety  of  flight  operations  by  leveraging  advances  in 
navigation capabilities on the flight deck. 

The strategy rests upon two key navigation concepts: Area Navi-
gation,  or  RNAV,  and  Required  Navigation  Performance,  or  RNP. 
RNAV procedures provide flight-path guidance that is incorporated 
into  onboard  aircraft  avionics  system,  requiring  only  minimal  air 
traffic  instruction.  RNAV  procedures  allow  for  more  precise  routes 
for  departures  and  arrivals,  reducing  time  intervals  between  air-
craft on the runways and allowing for increases in traffic, while en-
hancing safety. 

In  2004,  13  RNAV  departure  procedures  and  four  RNAV  arrival 
procedures  went  into  full  operation  at  Atlanta  Hartsfield-Jackson 
International  Airport,  the  world’s  busiest.  In  addition,  16  RNAV 
departures  were  implemented  at  DFW  International  Airport  in 
2005. The FAA published 53 of these procedures in 2006, and plans 
to publish at least 50 more in 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

RNP  procedures  use  onboard  technology  to  allow  pilots  to  fly  di-
rect  point-to-point  routes  more  reliably  and  accurately.  It  gives  pi-
lots  not  only  lateral  guidance,  but  vertical  precision,  as  well.  RNP 
potentially  reaches  all  aspects  of  flight—departure,  en  route,  ar-
rival,  and  approach.  As  of  today,  the  FAA  has  published  28  RNP 
approach  procedures  this  year,  and  plans  to  publish  at  least  25 
more in Fiscal Year 2007. 

As  we  move  toward  implementing  the  NextGen  system,  we  are 
actively  working  to  incorporate  VLJs  and  UAs  into  the  current 
NAS.  We’ve  been  working  with  the  VLJ  industry  to  learn  about 
their business plans, to ensure we’re prepared. 

The  advertised  business  models  for  the  first  companies  say  that 
they  will  fly  point-to-point  among  the  Nation’s  5,400  smaller  air-
ports.  In  addition,  we’re  expecting  the  VLJs  to  operate  in  the  less- 
congested  lower  altitudes.  Although  it’s  expected  that  many  of  the 
VLJs  will  be  certified  to  41,000  feet,  the  planned  stage  links  for 
these  business  plans  are  typically  less  than  600  nautical  miles, 
which will limit most of their operating altitudes to between 15,000 
and 28,000 feet. 

It’s expected that these aircraft will be delivered from the manu-
facturer  with  state-of-the-art  avionics  that  will  allow  the  VLJs  to 
take advantage of RNAV and RNP procedures and routes that will 
assist us in accommodating these aircraft in all phases of flight. 

Incorporating  UAs  into  the  NAS  will  require  similar  efforts  at 
the  FAA.  UAs  are  also  an  evolving  aviation  segment.  Safeguards 
are  currently  in  place,  through  a  Certificate  of  Authorization,  or 
COA,  for  government  agencies  and  Experimental  Airworthiness 
Certificates for civil operations, to provide appropriate criteria to be 
met  by  UA  operations  to  ensure  they  do  not  jeopardize  safety  of 
other aviation operations or the public on the ground. 

Our  objective  in  issuing  a  COA  or  EAC  is  to  ensure  an  equiva-
lent level of safety as manned aircraft. As the UA segment of avia-
tion  matures  in  both  technology  and  types  of  missions,  our  service 
delivery  will  evolve  to  accommodate  their  operations,  consistent 
with the mandate to maintain system safety. 

We have the system in place at the FAA to assure the safe, suc-
cessful  integration  of  VLJs  and  UAs  into  the  NAS,  regardless  of 
their  size,  speed,  or  performance  capabilities.  VLJs  and  UAs  will 
enter  a  more  advanced  and  more  flexible  air  traffic  control  system 
than  ever  before.  We’ve  handled  the  introduction  of  new  aircraft 
types  successfully  in  the  past  while  preserving  system  safety,  and 
will continue to do so in the future. 

This  concludes  my  remarks.  I’d  like  to  thank  you  for  the  oppor-
tunity to discuss the introduction of new aircraft into the NAS with 
you, and I’d be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

[The joint prepared statement of Mr. Sabatini and Mr. Cirillo fol-

lows:] 

SERVICES,  AIR

JOINT PREPARED STATEMENT OF NICHOLAS A.  SABATINI,  ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR 
FOR AVIATION SAFETY,  AND MICHAEL A.  CIRILLO,  VICE PRESIDENT,  SYSTEMS 
OPERATION
TRAFFIC ORGANIZATION,  FEDERAL AVIATION 
ADMINISTRATION 
Good  morning,  Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Rockefeller,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee.  It  is  our  pleasure  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  with  you  the  introduction 
of new aircraft in our Nation’s air traffic system. The Federal Aviation Administra-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

tion is preparing to deal with the challenges presented by these and other new types 
of aircraft. Very light jets (VLJs) and unmanned aircraft (UAs) are examples of the 
on-going  evolution  of  the  aviation  industry,  and  the  FAA,  working  closely  with  the 
aviation industry, will develop safety standards and operating procedures to ensure 
their safe integration into the NAS. 

VLJs  and  UAs  are  part  of  the  future  of  aviation,  and  that  future  is  on  our  door-
step  right  now.  The  system  is  in  place  today  to  accommodate  the  entry  of  new  air-
craft  into  the  National  Airspace  System . . . this  is  nothing  new  for  the  FAA.  It 
is our day-to-day business. From when FAA’s predecessor agency certified the Buhl 
Airster  in  1927,  to  the  introduction  of  the  Boeing  707  and  the  dawning  of  the  jet 
age in the late 1950s, FAA has always been able to successfully assimilate new air-
craft into the NAS. When the Boeing 707 began its transcontinental flights, the av-
erage  airspeed  of  passenger  aircraft  more  than  doubled  overnight,  from  about  220 
knots  to  over  500  knots.  And  this  transition  into  the  jet  age  took  place  within  an 
infrastructure  that  was  50  years  old  at  the  time.  The  system  is  more  robust  today, 
with  better  technology,  more  precision,  and  greater  flexibility,  than  at  any  time  in 
our  history.  FAA  has  long  established  operating  procedures  that  ensure  different 
types and vintages of aircraft are operated at compatible airspeeds in congested air-
space  or  while  en  route  to  and  from  the  high  altitude  airspace.  From  beginning  to 
end, nothing is left to chance. 

Relatively inexpensive twin-engine VLJs are believed by many to have the poten-
tial to redefine the business jet segment by significantly expanding business jet fly-
ing and offering performance that could support a true on-demand air-taxi business 
service.  FAA  forecasters  project  that  up  to  5,000  of  these  jets  will  be  in  operation 
by 2017. 

The  FAA  has  established  a  cross-organizational  group  to  address  the  issues  of 
safety  and  system  capacity  created  by  the  anticipated  introduction  of  thousands  of 
VLJs  within  the  next  10  years.  This  group  includes  elements  from  our  Air  Traffic 
Organization  (ATO),  Flight  Standards  Service  (AFS),  Aircraft  Evaluation  Group 
(AEG)  and  Aircraft  Certification  Office  (ACO).  The  group  has  organized  its  work 
under  separate  committees  that  focus  on  specific  issues:  Pilot  Training  and  check-
ing; Flight Operations; Maintenance; Inspector Training; and Air Traffic. 

Also, to address UAs, we have established an Unmanned Aircraft Program Office 
to develop guidance and regulations for certification and integration of UAs. Interest 
in  using  unmanned  aircraft  (UAs)  for  a  broad  range  of  purposes  is  increasing,  not 
only by U.S. governmental agencies, but also by the civil aviation community. Inte-
grating UAs with manned aircraft in the NAS presents significant challenges for the 
FAA,  and  both  the  public  and  private-sectors.  At  the  outset,  it  is  helpful  to  under-
stand that UAs cannot be described as a single type of aircraft. UAs can be vehicles 
that  range  from  a  12-ounce  hand-launched  model  to  one  the  size  of  a  737  aircraft. 
They also encompass a broad span of altitude and endurance capabilities. Obviously, 
the size of the UA impacts the complexity of its system design and capability. There-
fore,  each  different  type  of  UA  has  to  be  evaluated  separately,  with  each  aircraft’s 
unique  characteristics  being  considered  before  its  integration  into  the  NAS  can  be 
safely accomplished. 

The  certification  of  all  government  agency  aircraft,  including  UAs,  in  the  NAS  is 
considered a public aircraft operation, the oversight for which falls outside the scope 
of the FAA. These public operations are, however, required to be in compliance with 
certain  federal  aviation  regulations  administered  by  the  FAA  and  the  FAA  is  and 
must be involved to ensure that the operation of these aircraft does not compromise 
the safety of the NAS. FAA’s current role is to ensure that UAs do no harm to other 
operators  in  the  NAS  and,  to  the  maximum  extent  possible,  the  public  on  the 
ground. 

In  working  with  government  agencies,  the  FAA  issues  a  Certificate  of  Authoriza-
tion  (COA)  that  permits  the  various  public  agencies  to  operate  a  particular  UA  for 
a particular purpose in a particular area. In other words, FAA works with the agen-
cy  to  develop  conditions  and  limitations  for  UA  operations  to  ensure  they  do  not 
jeopardize  the  safety  of  other  aviation  operations.  The  objective  is  to  issue  a  COA 
with  terms  that  ensure  an  equivalent  level  of  safety  as  manned  aircraft.  Usually, 
this entails making sure that the UA does not operate in a populated area and that 
the  aircraft  is  observed,  either  by  someone  in  a  manned  aircraft  or  someone  on  the 
ground. For example, in the interest of national security and because ground observ-
ers  were  not  possible,  the  FAA  worked  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security 
(DHS)  to  facilitate  UA  operations  along  the  Arizona/New  Mexico  border  with  Mex-
ico.  In  order  to  permit  such  operations,  the  airspace  was  segregated  to  ensure  sys-
tem  safety  so  these  UA  flights  can  operate  without  an  observer  being  physically 
present  to  observe  the  operation.  With  the  steadily  expanding  purposes  for  which 
UAs  are  used  and  the  eventual  stateside  redeployment  of  large  numbers  of  UAs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

from the theater of war, the FAA expects to issue a record number of COAs. In fact, 
the  FAA  has  issued  more  than  75  COAs  this  year,  compared  with  a  total  of  50  for 
the two previous years combined. 

FAA’s work with private industry is slightly different than with government agen-
cies. The development of guidance and regulations for UAs for civil aviation use will 
be an evolving process. Standards development is required for all areas of UAs tech-
nology,  including  the  airframe,  maintenance  procedures,  pilot  and  controller  train-
ing, powerplant and other areas. The FAA is working with industry, under the aus-
pices of RTCA, Inc. to develop consensus standards for detect, sense and avoid sys-
tems; and command, control and communication systems. Until standards and min-
imum requirements are established, the FAA is working closely with companies that 
wish to operate UAs in the NAS today by applying the Experimental Airworthiness 
Certificate process. 

Today,  for  civil  operation,  companies  may  obtain  an  Experimental  Airworthiness 
Certificate  by  demonstrating  that  their  aircraft  can  operate  safely  within  an  as-
signed  flight  test  area  and  cause  no  harm  to  the  public.  They  must  be  able  to  de-
scribe  their  unmanned  aircraft  system,  along  with  how  and  where  they  intend  to 
fly.  This  is  documented  by  the  applicant  in  what  we  call  a  program  letter.  An  FAA 
team of subject matter experts reviews the program letter and, if the project is fea-
sible,  performs  an  on-site  review  of  the  ground  system  and  unmanned  aircraft,  if 
available.  If  the  results  of  the  on-site  review  are  acceptable,  there  are  negotiations 
on  operating  limitations.  After  the  necessary  limitations  are  accepted,  FAA  will  ac-
cept  an  application  for  an  Experimental  Airworthiness  Certificate  which  is  ulti-
mately issued by the local FAA Manufacturing Inspection District Office. The certifi-
cate specifies the operating restrictions applicable to that aircraft. To date, we have 
received  several  program  letters  for  UAs  ranging  from  39  to  more  than  10,000 
pounds.  We  have  issued  two  experimental  certificates,  one  for  General  Atomics’ 
Altair,  and  one  for  Bell-Textron’s  Eagle  Eye.  We  expect  to  issue  at  least  one  more 
experimental certificate this year. 

The  COA  and  Experimental  Airworthiness  Certificate  processes  are  designed  to 
allow a sufficiently restricted operation to ensure a safe environment, while allowing 
for research and development until such time as pertinent standards are developed. 
They also allow the FAA, other government agencies, and private industry to gather 
valuable data about a largely unknown field of aviation. The development of stand-
ards is crucial to moving forward with UA integration into the NAS. Because of the 
extraordinarily  broad  range  of  unmanned  aircraft  types  and  performance,  the  chal-
lenges  of  integrating  them  safely  into  the  NAS  continue  to  evolve.  The  certification 
and  operational  issues  described  herein  highlight  the  fact  that  there  is  a  missing 
link  in  terms  of  technology  today  that  prevents  these  aircraft  from  getting  unre-
stricted access to the NAS. 

So far we have discussed FAA’s current efforts regarding certification and regula-
tion  of  VLJs  and  UAs  as  we  enable  the  safe  introduction  of  these  new  aircraft  into 
the NAS. There are still many challenges to be met in these areas before the proce-
dures  for  certification,  licensing,  training,  inspection,  maintenance  and  operation  of 
these  aircraft  are  standardized  and  routine.  The  question  many  have  is  how  FAA 
is  going  to  integrate  these  new  aircraft  into  the  NAS,  without  adversely  affecting 
safety, or increasing congestion and delays. The ATO is producing results today that 
are  already  improving  capacity  and  efficiency,  and  in  conjunction  with  the  Joint 
Planning  and  Development  Office  (JPDO),  laying  the  foundation  for  the  Next  Gen-
eration Air Transportation System (NextGen). 

In  2005,  the  ATO  implemented  a  new  procedure,  known  as  Domestic  Reduced 
Vertical Separation Minima or DRVSM, which is truly exciting. DRVSM has signifi-
cantly increased capacity in the en route airspace by doubling the number of usable 
altitudes  between  29,000  and  41,000  feet.  The  procedure  permits  controllers  to  re-
duce minimum vertical separation at altitudes between 29,000 and 41,000 feet from 
2,000 feet to 1,000 feet for properly equipped aircraft. 

The User Request Evaluation Tool (URET) is a tool used by the controller to pre-
dict  potential  aircraft  to  aircraft,  and  aircraft  to  airspace  conflicts  earlier,  allowing 
them  to  construct  alternative  flight  paths.  URET  allows  these  conflicts  to  be  ad-
dressed  in  a  strategic  sense  rather  than  a  tactical  sense,  with  fewer  deviations  to 
the route or altitude. 

In  August,  the  FAA  approved  the  update  to  the  Roadmap  for  Performance-Based 
Navigation, developed in cooperation with the aviation industry. The 2006 Roadmap 
focuses on addressing future efficiency and capacity needs while maintaining or im-
proving the safety of flight operations by leveraging advances in navigation capabili-
ties on the flight deck. This revision updates the FAA and industry strategy for evo-
lution toward performance-based navigation. The Roadmap is intended to help avia-
tion community stakeholders plan their future transition and investment strategies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

The  stakeholders  who  will  benefit  from  the  concepts  in  the  Roadmap  include  air-
space  operators,  air  traffic  service  providers,  regulators  and  standards  organiza-
tions,  and  airframe  and  avionics  manufacturers.  As  driven  by  business  needs,  air-
lines and operators can use the Roadmap to plan future equipage and capability in-
vestments.  The  strategy  rests  upon  two  key  navigation  concepts:  Area  Navigation 
(RNAV) and Required Navigation Performance (RNP). 

The  ATO  is  focused  on  expanding  the  implementation  of  advanced  RNAV  proce-
dures  to  additional  airports.  These  RNAV  procedures  provide  flight  path  guidance 
that  is  incorporated  into  onboard  aircraft  avionics  systems,  requiring  only  minimal 
air  traffic  instructions.  This  significantly  reduces  routine  controller-pilot  commu-
nications,  allowing  more  time  for  pilots  and  controllers  to  handle  other  safety-crit-
ical  flight  activities.  Also,  RNAV  procedures  use  more  precise  routes  for  departures 
and arrivals, reducing time intervals between aircraft on the runways, and allowing 
for  increases  in  traffic,  while  enhancing  safety.  In  2004,  thirteen  RNAV  departure 
procedures  and  four  RNAV  arrival  procedures  went  into  full  operation  at  Atlanta 
Hartsfield-Jackson  International  Airport—the  world’s  busiest  airport.  Additionally, 
sixteen RNAV departures were implemented at Dallas/Fort Worth International Air-
port  in  2005.  The  FAA  published  53  of  these  procedures  in  FY  2006,  and  plans  to 
publish at least 50 procedures in FY 2007. 

FAA  is  currently  implementing  additional  technological  innovations,  including  a 
capability  known  as  RNP.  RNP  uses  on-board  technology  that  allows  pilots  to  fly 
direct point-to-point routes more reliably and accurately. RNP is extremely accurate, 
and gives pilots not only lateral guidance, but vertical precision as well. RNP poten-
tially  reaches  all  aspects  of  the  flight—departure,  en  route,  arrival,  and  approach. 
As  of  today,  the  FAA  has  published  28  RNP  approach  procedures  this  year,  and 
plans to publish at least 25 more in FY 2007. 

We must also make sure we are using the best technology to maintain a safe and 
efficient  air  traffic  system.  The  en  route  air  traffic  control  computer  system  is  con-
sidered the heart of the NAS. En Route Automation Modernization (ERAM) provides 
the  basic  foundation  upon  which  many  of  the  transforming  technologies  moving  us 
from  the  current  NAS  to  NGATS  needs.  ERAM  replaces  the  software  for  the  Host 
Computer  System  and  its  backup.  It  will  enable  the  FAA  to  increase  capacity  and 
improve  efficiency  in  a  way  that  cannot  be  realized  with  the  current  system,  which 
is  a  mix  of  different  technologies  that  evolved  over  the  years  and  is  extremely  dif-
ficult  to  expand  or  upgrade.  In  addition  to  supporting  new  transformational  tech-
nologies, ERAM itself can process more than double the number of flight plans, and 
use  almost  triple  the  number  of  surveillance  sources  as  the  current  system.  The 
ERAM system is scheduled to be deployed and operational at all 20 Air Route Traf-
fic Control Centers by 2010. 

Traffic Flow Management (TFM) is the ‘‘brain’’ of the NAS, and is the reason that 
we  could  handle  more  traffic  at  our  major  airports  in  2005  than  in  2000,  without 
the  long  delays  that  made  the  summer  of  2000  the  worst  on  record.  The  TFM  sys-
tem  is  the  mechanism  by  which  traffic  flows  across  the  NAS  are  orchestrated.  As 
the NAS is impacted by severe weather, congestion and/or outages, the TFM system 
provides  timely  information  to  our  customers  to  expedite  traffic  and  minimize  sys-
tem delays. The FAA is currently in the process of modernizing the TFM infrastruc-
ture  through  its  TFM  Modernization  program.  We  are  currently  introducing  new 
Airspace Flow Management technology to reduce the impact of delays incurred dur-
ing  the  severe  weather  season.  FAA  estimates  show  that  TFM  provides  roughly 
$340  million  in  benefits  to  our  customers  on  a  yearly  basis  in  reduced  direct  oper-
ating  costs  through  delay  reductions.  ERAM  and  TFM  together  will  enable  flexible 
routing  around  congestion,  weather,  and  flight  restrictions,  and  help  controllers  to 
automatically coordinate flights, during periods of increased workload. 

The JPDO and ATO will work together to analyze the changes that will be needed 
to  both  ERAM  and  TFM  so  they  meet  the  needs  of  the  Next  Generation  System. 
Today’s flight planning and air traffic paradigms will be transformed into a system 
that  manages  operations  based  on  aircraft  trajectories,  regularly  adjusts  the  air-
space structure to best meet customer and security/defense needs and relies on auto-
mation for trajectory analysis and separation assurance. 

The  JPDO  serves  as  a  focal  point  for  coordinating  the  research  related  to  air 
transportation modernization for agencies across the Federal Government, including 
the Departments of Transportation, Commerce, Defense and Homeland Security, as 
well as NASA and the Office of Science and Technology Policy. 

At  the  FAA,  our  eyes  are  focused  on  the  NextGen  Vision  while  using  existing 
technology to provide important and tangible operational benefits now. We are find-
ing  ways  to  make  existing  capacity  work  more  efficiently  through  advanced  tech-
nology  and  operational  improvements.  Research  is  underway  to  explore  ways  of 
safely  achieving  reductions  in  separation  standards,  allowing  for  greater  density  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

operations,  which  the  anticipated  increase  in  these  vehicles  will  demand.  We  are 
also  examining  the  Human  Factors  implications  of  super  density  operations  and 
traffic control automation. Moreover, as-yet unexplored concepts may be expected to 
play a role. 

These  innovations  provide  relief  today  as  well  as  help  to  lay  the  foundation  for 
the Next Generation System. Successful integration of VLJs and UAs into the NAS 
will  represent  a  significant  step  in  the  process  of  evolution  from  the  current  NAS 
to  the  NextGen  system.  In  order  to  fulfill  the  NextGen  2025  vision  of  handling  sig-
nificant  increases  in  today’s  traffic,  with  improved  safety,  capacity,  and  efficiency, 
we must competently manage the introduction of VLJs and UAs into the NAS. The 
impact of these new vehicles on the NAS is addressed in the JPDO Concept of Oper-
ations  (CONOPS).  One  overarching  goal  of  the  NextGen  initiative  is  to  develop  a 
system  that  will  be  flexible  enough  to  accommodate  a  wide  range  of  users—very 
light  jets  and  large  commercial  aircraft,  manned  and  unmanned  aircraft,  small  air-
ports and large, business and vacation travelers alike, while handling a significantly 
increased  number  of  operations  with  a  commensurate  improvement  in  safety,  secu-
rity and efficiency. 

In 2005, the JPDO moved ahead with plans to accelerate the development of key 
NGATS  projects,  such  as  Automatic  Dependent  Surveillance-Broadcast  (ADS–B), 
and  System  Wide  Information  Management  (SWIM).  In  FAA’s  Fiscal  Year  2007 
budget  request,  the  Administration  proposed  several  targeted  investment  areas,  to 
promote early implementation of elements of the NGATS system. One of these very 
promising initiatives, with potential for broad operational applications, is the Auto-
matic Dependent Surveillance-Broadcast (ADS–B) system, a technology that will re-
place ground-based radar systems and revolutionize air navigation and surveillance. 
For FY 2007, the President’s budget includes $80 million for the FAA for the ADS– 
B program. 

Given  its  fundamental  importance  to  the  success  of  the  NGATS  System,  estab-
lishing  an  initial  Network-Enabled  Operations  (NEO)  capability  is  a  high  priority 
for JPDO and its member agencies. Current efforts focus on identifying the network 
architecture  and  enacting  standards  for  information  and  safety  data  sharing.  In 
2005,  the  JPDO,  FAA  and  an  industry  team  demonstrated  how  network-enabled 
concepts developed for the military customers can be applied to Air Traffic Manage-
ment.  The  FAA’s  System  Wide  Information  Management  (SWIM)  program—the  be-
ginning of network-centric operation in the National Airspace System—will continue 
developing this capability. The President’s budget proposal for FY 2007 requests $24 
million for FAA’s SWIM program. 

The  FAA  has  already  been  working  with  industry  to  identify  the  near-term  oper-
ational  requirements  of  VLJs  in  the  NAS.  DayJet,  a  large  Part  135  operation,  ex-
pects  to  be  operating  100  Eclipse  EA–500s  by  the  end  of  2007.  Its  business  plan 
calls for utilizing regional airports in the southeastern U.S., and DayJet is working 
in  close  cooperation  with  FAA  so  we  can  establish  appropriate  flight  procedures  as 
these jets are introduced. FAA is also currently working with Eclipse to contract for 
training for both FAA operations and maintenance inspectors for FY07. The EA–500 
is  unlike  any  other  aircraft  currently  in  production,  and  is  unique  in  that  it  has 
highly integrated avionics systems. 

Performance  characteristics  of  VLJs  are  similar  to  some  other  business  class  air-
craft that have operated in the NAS for many years. VLJs can operate from shorter 
runways  than  commercial  airliners,  and  can  utilize  the  5000+  satellite  airports 
around the United States. In fact, the advertised business models for the first com-
panies  state  that  they  will  fly  point-to-point  among  the  Nation’s  smaller  regional 
airports that are situated within a half-hour’s drive of over 90 percent of Americans. 
These  jets  are  expected  to  be  delivered  from  the  manufacturers  with  state-of-the- 
art avionics, capable of taking advantage of RNAV and RNP procedures and routes. 
Manufacturers  state  that  VLJs  will  be  IFR-certified,  with  glass  cockpits,  with  full 
RVSM  and  ADS–B  equipage.  They  will  be  capable  of  flying  with  single  or  dual  pi-
lots, with 4–10 passenger seats, and will typically operate at intermediate flight lev-
els  between  15,000  and  28,000  feet,  but  capable  of  38,000  to  45,000  feet.  Cruising 
speeds  will  be  between  315  and  450  KIAS  or  Knots  Indicated  Air  Speed,  with  a 
range  of  900–1750  nautical  miles,  although  typical  legs  will  be  200–600  nautical 
miles. 

The FAA is conducting training throughout the ATO regarding performance capa-
bilities of these aircraft to help mitigate any problems with blending VLJs with fast-
er jets. The FAA’s Cross Organizational Group will continue to work to monitor the 
safety  and  impact  of  these  new  aircraft,  and  address  any  unanticipated  problems 
as they arise. 

These  technological  and  operational  improvements  are  positive  steps  down  the 
road to building the Next Generation Air Transportation System. The FAA and the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

JPDO  are  continuing  to  explore  near  and  far  term  innovations  that  will  enable  ac-
commodation  of  increasing  numbers  of  VLJs  and  UAs  in  the  NAS.  We  know,  how-
ever,  that  we  continue  to  face  many  challenges.  Over  the  next  few  years  we  will 
work  to  achieve  better  cost  management;  determine  the  best  solution  for  our  aging 
and deteriorating facilities; plan more effectively for catastrophic events, like hurri-
canes  or  terrorist  attacks;  and,  conduct  research  on  convective  weather  to  reduce 
flight  delays  associated  with  summer  storms.  Everything  in  our  business—pay,  job 
performance, future technology, the Nation’s economy—is linked together. We strive 
to  improve  efficiency,  while  searching  for  innovative  ways  to  provide  safer  services 
even  more  efficiently.  As  we  decide  how  to  wisely  invest  in  our  future,  we  will  con-
tinue  to  work  closely  with  our  customers,  our  employees,  and  of  course,  Members 
of Congress. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  our  testimony,  and  we  would  be  happy  to  answer 

any questions the Committee may have. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much, Mr. Cirillo. 
And let me—I will start this off, just—well, a question to you. 
Now, we know that these new light jets, they have legs of about 
1,100  miles.  They  fly  around  350–375  miles  an  hour.  They  are 
lighter  than  10,000—when  they  started  out,  I  think,  it  weighed 
around  10,000  pounds.  I  understand  that.  They  are  backordered. 
They  are,  it  seems  like,  costing  from  a  million  to  a  million-and-a- 
half  dollars,  with  some  of  them  costing  more  from  some  manufac-
turers. But those are the first figures that I have seen. 

Do  you  have  any  indication  just  how  popular  this  airplane  is 
going  to  be,  and  the  numbers  that  we  might  expect  in  the  next  5 
years? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Well,  maybe  Mr.  Sabatini  can  address  the  popu-
larity, maybe not, but we have the same figures that you have, and 
that was 5,000 by the year 2017. 

Senator BURNS. Mr. Sabatini, does that—— 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  offer  that  FAA  has  fore-
casted  that  by  2025  we’ll  have  approximately  5,000  aircraft  in  the 
system.  But  I  would  say  that,  as  I  believe  the  system  will  work, 
and how they are in—at the present time, on order, the number on 
order,  they  will  be  assimilated  into  the  system  in  an  orderly  fash-
ion.  We  don’t  have  5,000  airplanes  waiting  to  be  launched  over-
night. So, it’s going to be a very well-controlled and managed proc-
ess to allow the introduction of these aircraft. 

Senator  BURNS.  In  the  areas  of  UAVs—and  I  hear  they  can  be 
as  small  as  the  models  that  we  see  flying  on  Sunday  afternoon  to 
as big as a 737. Is that correct? 

Mr. SABATINI. That is correct, sir. 
Senator BURNS. Does this present unique problems to you? 
Mr. SABATINI. Yes, it would, but we have processes in place that 
certainly we’ve been, for the past several years, accommodating the 
need  for  these  unmanned  aircraft  to  enter  into  the  system.  We  do 
work  with  the  Department  of  Defense  and  other  public  agencies 
who  have  a  need  to  put  Predator-type  aircraft  up  along,  for  an  ex-
ample,  the  southern  border.  We  have  protected  airspace  and  very 
specific  and  tightly  controlled  procedures  for  the  safe  operation  of 
those aircraft in the system. So, we accommodate them. 

Senator  BURNS.  The  reason  I  asked  that  question,  we’ve  got  570 
miles  of  border  with  Canada  in  my  home  state,  and  we  are  now 
looking at a virtual kind of security border. And sometimes—those 
of us who are on the ground, ‘‘virtual’’ doesn’t mean a lot. In other 
words—I  always  make  the  comment—if  I  put  a  virtual  bull  on  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

virtual  cow  and  get  a  virtual  calf,  do  I  get  a  virtual  check  when 
I take the calf to market? I want to see something, you know. But 
UAVs,  the  training  and  the  certifications  of  operators  of  UAVs,  be 
they Department of Defense or Homeland Security, do they have— 
is  there  a  certification  procedure  that  those  operators  go  through? 
Are they—with the satisfaction of the FAA? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Yes,  sir.  What  we’re  currently  doing,  whether  we 
issue an Experimental Airworthiness Certificate to the civil side of 
the  request  or  whether  it’s  from  a  public  agency  such  as  DOD  or 
Customs  and  Border  Patrol,  and  issue  a  Certificate  of  Authoriza-
tion,  we  require,  at  this  point  in  time,  a  pilot  license  with  instru-
ment rating. That’s the going-in model. We’re also working in with 
the  RTCA,  where  all  interested  members  of  this  industry  are  par-
ticipating  with  the  RTCA  to  determine  how  best  to  develop  the 
technology around ‘‘detect, sense, and avoid,’’ as well as ‘‘command, 
control,  and  communications.’’  So,  I’m  confident  that  we’re  putting 
in  place  the  kinds  of  controls  that  assure  the  safe  operation  of 
these aircraft. 

Senator BURNS. Those standards are in place now. 
Mr. SABATINI. Yes, they’re existing pilot—— 
Senator BURNS. OK. 
Mr. SABATINI.—requirements. 
Senator BURNS. All right. 
Senator Rockefeller? 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Let  me  just 

take off from the Chairman’s questioning. 

Now,  you’ve—we  have  agreed  on  about  350  knots,  80  knots,  up 
to  550  knots,  41,000  feet.  And  I  know  that  many  in  the  industry 
state  that  very  light  jets  will  fly  between  18,000  and  30,000  feet. 
They’re—according  to  that  logic,  they  wouldn’t  be—they’d  not  be 
interfering  with  long-haul  traffic.  But  even  at  these  altitudes, 
would  they  not  pose  an  air  traffic  control  problem?  And  I  say  this, 
because  when  I  fly  on  turboprops  from  Charleston,  West  Virginia, 
to Washington, D.C., or to Dulles, as the case may be, they fly pre-
cisely  in  that  range,  at  the  lower  end  of  that  range.  So,  these  are 
very congested airspaces. So, you indicate that the plans are place, 
and  yet  I’ve  got  to  get  a  much  better  feel  as  to  how  you’re  going 
to  handle  this  with  respect  to  the  air  traffic  controllers  that  Sen-
ator Lautenberg brought up, and I’m just, sort of, at a loss to figure 
out—there’s  so  much  traffic  at  a  lower  level,  until  everybody  gets 
regional jets—and I don’t even know, you know, how high they fly, 
whether  there  would  be  interaction  there.  But  if  there  is,  I’m  wor-
ried about it. I’d like to have you discuss that. 

Mr. CIRILLO. Well, the top range, of 31,000 feet, is—I think that’s 
in  the  transition  phase  of  flight  out  of  a  terminal  area.  There  is— 
they  will  be  intermixed  with  other  aircraft  of  all  different  types. 
However,  the  routes  can  be  segregated.  We  currently  do  not  fore-
cast  that  the  major  airports  will  be  inundated  with  very  light  jets, 
that they will probably use a satellite airport, in which case we can 
segregate  those  flows.  And  so,  the  final  altitude  that  the  airliners 
will  use  will  be  also  segregated  from  very  light  jets.  And  even  in 
our  major  metropolitan  areas  today,  the  routes  into  the  major  air-
port  and  the  satellite  airports  are  different,  so  you  can  segregate 
the  flows  that  way.  And  there  is  capacity  at  those  airports.  We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

often  talk  about  the  capacity-constrained  airports,  and  they  do 
exist. But—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. But, Mr. Cirillo, you’re talking as if there 
were  a  lot  of  satellite  airports  lying  around.  You  know,  I  mean,  if 
you  apply  that  theory  to  West  Virginia,  I  guess  you’ve  got  to  fly— 
you’ve got to land in the Greenbrier Airport and then drive 3 hours 
to  Charleston.  I  mean,  there  just  aren’t  satellite  airports  every-
where.  Yes,  there  are,  you  know,  Teterboro,  et  cetera,  but  I  can 
see—that’s  meant  to  be  a  satellite  airport,  but  it’s  also,  I  think, 
busier  than  LaGuardia.  It  has  more  traffic  than  LaGuardia.  So,  I 
can’t  assume  that  satellite—sort  of,  the  release  point  for  these 
planes. 

Mr. CIRILLO. The—well, the business model we’ve seen shows a— 
for  a  particular  airport,  is  a  fairly  small  number  of  very  light  jets. 
And airports like Charleston do have capacity. And a very light jet 
can use a runway—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I agree with that, yes. 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  A  very  light  jet  can  use  a  runway  that  is  as  short 
as  3,000  feet—3,000  to  5,000  feet.  So,  that  opens  up  myriad  air-
ports  available  for  their  use,  which  I’m  sure  are—that  you  may 
have  in  the  vicinity  of  Charleston.  So,  it  is  in  their  best  interest 
to  have  a  business  model  like  this,  because  of  the  flexibility  in-
volved. They can go where the capacity exists, and it exists—— 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  But  you’re  saying—I  mean,  I  certainly 
can’t make the case that Charleston, West Virginia Airport is over-
flowing with flights, but I would think, as one went about the coun-
try, there would be a lot of places that are larger than Charleston, 
had  more  air  traffic  than  Charleston-Huntington,  et  cetera,  where 
there  would  not  be  satellite  airports.  I’m  just  trying  to—I’m  just— 
you  said  there’s  going  to  be  a  mix  in  the  air.  I  accept  that,  and  I 
worry about that. So, I need to have you put me at ease. 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Well,  we  can—on  the  subject  of  the  mix  in  the  air, 
we  can  deconflict  in  the  air.  And  the  reason  I  brought  up  RNAV/ 
RNP is because it does provide for precise navigation and less sepa-
ration between routes. And so, in a—even in a busy terminal area, 
there  is  a  way  to  deconflict  the  major  flows  from  the  big  airports 
and the smaller flows from the satellite airports. 

So—and then, in the en route phase of flight, there will be a dis-
parity in altitudes, so there really is not a conflict there. And there 
is  a  lot  of  en  route  capacity.  We  talk  about  the  New  York  area 
quite  a  bit,  but  there  is  a  significant  amount  of  en  route  capacity 
throughout the rest of the country, especially at those altitudes. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. My time is up. Thank you. 
Mr. CIRILLO. Thank you. 
Senator BURNS. Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Do we—do either—do you have any idea about how many of their 
airplanes  may  be  in  the  sky  at  a  busy  hour,  typically,  in  a  day  in 
the United States? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  Very  light  jets?  The  only  business  model  I’ve  seen 
is  numbers  of  aircraft  for  particular  airports,  and  they  were  all— 
they were all very low-activity airports, and the numbers were not 
overwhelming. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, I’m sorry—Mr. Cirillo, what I under-
stand  is  that  there  are  about  5,000,  at  a  busy  moment,  in  the  sky 
today. Now, we’re introducing an additional 5,000. And I—as some-
one  who  frequently  uses  the  flights  between  here  and  the  New 
York  airports,  Newark  included,  where  we’re  under  constant 
delay—half-hour the other—one night, I was told that the airplane 
couldn’t  take  off  for  an  hour  and  a  half.  They  had  just  closed  the 
door.  And  after  sitting  an  hour  and  a  half,  the  pilot  said,  ‘‘We’ve 
had some discouraging news. It’s another hour that’s contemplated. 
Too  much  traffic  for  the  area.’’  Well,  what  are  we  doing  to  get 
ready for that? What kind of airport changes have to be made? Do 
the  very  light  jets  land  at  the  same  speed  as  turbos  or  piston  en-
gines? There will have to be some accommodations made, I assume. 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  Senator,  I  would  offer—to  expand  on  this 
subject  of  the  compatibility,  I  would  offer  that,  in  addition  to  the 
precise navigation that these aircraft are capable of and the system 
that is in place today to accommodate that, we can do offsets safe-
ly.  So,  you  can  have  parallel  route  structures  because  of  the  GPS 
capability that these aircraft now have. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  In  these  smaller  airports  that  you’re  talk-

ing about, these satellite airports? 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, I would tell you that the aircraft are capable 

of doing that—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Oh, yes. 
Mr. SABATINI.—and we are in the process of building and putting 
in  place  the  kinds  of  instrument  approaches  that  will  permit  that 
kind  of  capability.  Mr.  Cirillo  offered  examples  of  Atlanta,  where 
we have demonstrated very clearly there is tremendous savings for 
the fuel conservation and tremendous savings in time—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. SABATINI.—as well as workload—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. SABATINI.—between the pilot—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. But when— 
Mr. SABATINI.—and the air traffic controller. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—when you get into an airport, and you’ve 
got—the  only  thing  you’ve  got  is  a  UNICOM,  and  they  said, 
‘‘Well’’—and  that  you’ve  got  a  recording,  ‘‘The  winds  are  thus 
and’’—and  they’re  not—these  are  intended  to  land  at  shorter  run-
ways in order to make them really useful. 

Let  me  leave  that  question,  because  we’re  in,  apparently,  some 
territory where we’re—that’s not clearly understood, and that—the 
number of controllers to take care of the—our needs. Right now, it’s 
estimated  that  we  need  15,000  controllers,  but  we  barely  have 
14,000. That’s under current conditions. We have these retirements 
facing  us.  Is  that  something  that  you  folks  are  looking  at  as  we 
contemplate heavier use of the airspace? 

Mr.  CIRILLO.  We  currently  have  in  the  neighborhood  of  14,600 
controllers, which we—which was the projection of our need for this 
year.  We  actually  hired  more  this  year.  By  the  end  of  the  fiscal 
year, we will have hired more than we had anticipated. And—now, 
we  do  have  a  fairly  sophisticated  hiring  plan,  over  the  next  more- 
than-decade, that includes more than a thousand hires per year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

and I—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What does that mean? 
Mr. SABATINI. Well, we’ve been reviewing the history of that air-
craft,  and  have,  as  a  matter  of  fact,  as  early  as  earlier  this  week, 
we have a special Federal Aviation Regulation that has been posted 
at the Federal Register to address the special training that we have 
determined needs to be put in place, and which industry has volun-
tarily  adopted,  even  before  the  regulation  became  effective.  So, 
we’ve worked very closely with the industry. We recognize that, as 
the  aircraft  has  transitioned  from  where  it  started,  in  terms  of  its 
introduction, being operated with a certain class and group of peo-
ple,  migrating  to  a  different  category,  we  have  identified  that,  in 
fact, there have—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Would  you  put  your  family  in  an  MU–2? 
Mr.  SABATINI.  I’m  a  pilot,  sir,  and  I  would  fly  one  today,  myself, 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  You  would  fly  one.  Would  you  put  your 

with my family. 

family in it? 

18 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Would  you  certify  an  airplane,  knowing 
that,  over  the  airplane’s  life,  that,  then,  25  percent  of  them  might 
crash? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Sir,  the  certification  of  an  aircraft  has  to  dem-

onstrate that it complies with a particular rule. They’ll—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Have  you 

looked  at  the  M–2—the 

Mitsubishi, Mr. Sabatani? 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, the airplane, at the time of—it was certified, 

demonstrated that it could meet—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  How  about  its  performance  now,  where 

one out of four of them that were built have crashed? 

Mr. SABATINI. Well, we’ve been quite vigilant on that subject, sir, 

Mr. SABATINI. I would put my family in it. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Um-hmm.  Well,  I  wouldn’t.  And  I  sit  sec-

ond seat a lot of times. But—— 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator BURNS. Thank you, Senator. 
With the new technologies, I would tell you that, in general avia-
tion,  we  do  a  great  deal  of  flying  with  GA  in  Montana.  And  those 
of you with the new GPS systems that can be put in there, you tell 
me  where  you’re  strip  is,  give  me  the  coordinates—I  don’t  care  if 
it’s  a  grass  strip  in  Augusta,  Montana—we  can  find  it,  we  can 
put—we  can  get  it  in  there.  And—under  some  conditions  that  we 
didn’t use to have, to be right honest with you, years ago. 

Some  of  these  light  jets  will  be  going  into  air  taxi  service,  I  un-
derstand. How do we deal with Part 135 of the FAA regulations on 
single pilots requiring two pilots in air taxi, or to allow those oper-
ations  to  go  ahead  with  just  one  pilot?  How  do  we  deal  with  that, 
Mr. Sabatini? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  the  current  regulation,  Part  135,  has,  for  a 
long time, accommodated that option by on-demand-type operations 
in—with  a  single  pilot.  So,  we  have  a  long  history  and  a  method-
ology and a process where an applicant, an operator who wishes to 
avail  themselves  of  that  capability,  must  demonstrate  that  they 
have  the  appropriate  training  program  in  place  for  its  pilots,  that 
they  have  the  appropriate  autopilots  and  functioning  for  that  air-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

craft,  because  it  is  not  just  a  single-pilot  operation,  it  is  also  com-
patible—has to be compatible with the equipment onboard the air-
craft. So, we do permit it today, and have a long history of safe op-
erations with single pilots. 

Senator  BURNS.  I  have  no  more  questions  for  this  panel.  I  do 
have  some  more,  but  they  are,  sort  of—I  think  it’ll  be  an  ongoing 
discussion with both of you gentlemen as we work our way through 
the reauthorization process next year. I appreciate your testimony. 
And  if  you  have  any  more  questions,  why,  I’d—I’m  going  to  do 
that,  but,  as  far  as  I’m  concerned,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  being 
candid with us and—in your testimony, and also in our daily deal-
ings with the FAA. I appreciate that very much. 

Senator Rockefeller? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
It’s been very interesting to me to watch all of the rigors and the 
people  involved  in  the  certification  process.  And  I  don’t  mean  to 
come back to Sino—the SJ–230, but that has 13,000 parts. They all 
have to be certified by the FAA, every single one of them. And my 
question  is—and  it’s  a  long  process.  Adjustments  were  made  as  a 
result  of  that  process.  So,  as  these  new  lighter  planes  are  coming 
onto  the  market—there  are—I  think  there  are  about  20  different 
models  that  are  being  considered,  at  the  present  time—I’m  inter-
ested  in—do  you  have—and  to  make  the  point  more  strongly,  get-
ting the FAA certifiers out to Martinsburg, West Virginia, has been 
tough, to get enough of them, on a present—larger small passenger 
jet.  You  get  20  more  coming  online,  and  I  just  want  to  be  sure— 
I  want  you  to  tell  me,  one,  how  many  people  you  have  involved  in 
certification. How, in general, are they dispersed, by what order of 
priority? And how are they going to handle these new models com-
ing on? 

Mr. SABATINI. Thank you, Senator. 
From the safety side of the house, sir, our first order of business 
and  first  priority  is  continued  operational  safety.  That  is  number 
one.  And,  from  that  point  on,  we  then  have  to  prioritize  the  work 
that we do. And as a result, because we focus our attention on con-
tinued operational safety, where you tend to see the impact of staff-
ing is in the arena of applicants coming to us for new certification, 
starting  in  2006  we’ve  had  to  put  in  place  a  queuing  system.  So, 
while applicants will eventually be served, they are put in a queue, 
and  it  could  some  time  for  us  to  get  to  those  folks  to  deliver  the 
service they’re looking for from the FAA. 

So,  when  we  do  certify  an  aircraft—and  I  will  tell  you  this,  the 
current models that are in place today are not suffering from a cer-
tification  backlog.  Those  folks  were  in  the  queue  early  on,  and 
we’ve—are  certainly  providing  the  necessary  resources  to  get  that 
work  done.  But  those  other  applicants  that  will  be  coming  online, 
while  there  may  be  20  thinking  about  it—some,  seriously;  some 
quite—not  so  seriously—they  have  expressed  their  desire  to  build 
airplanes—but they have been informed that there is a queue, and 
that there is a period of time, most likely, they will wait. Congress 
has certainly recognized that—in 2006, you plussed us up, and cer-
tainly  recognized  that  in  the  2007  budget.  So,  we  certainly  appre-
ciate that, but that’s where the impact does show up. But never at 
the level of safety—at the safety level. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Senator BURNS. Senator Lautenberg, do you have—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  A  couple,  Mr.  Chairman,  if  you’d  indulge 
me. And thanks for calling this hearing. I think it’s very important. 
Did  you  say,  Mr.  Cirillo,  that  you  have  14,600  people  on  duty 

now in the air—air traffic controllers? 

Mr. CIRILLO. Yes, in—well—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. They’re on duty. Now, I’m not—— 
Mr.  CIRILLO.  They’re  on  duty.  Some  are  in  various  stages  of 

training. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Of—various stage—so, they’re not on duty, 
those stages of training. And those that you’ve hired this year—you 
said  14,600,  that  this  was  a  big  hiring  year.  But  the  question  is, 
What’s the standing population of the controller force? 

Mr. CIRILLO. That was the 14,600. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes,  we  have  reason  to  challenge  it,  and 

we’ll discuss that at a later moment, if you will. 

All  right.  Do  these  have  any—Mr.  Sabatini,  do  these  airplanes 
have  any  commercial  viability?  Will  they—can  they  be  used—I 
mean,  you  know  that  there  are  places  that  fly  a  Cessna  402  and 
put eight passengers in there, and they function. 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  we  certainly  have  certified  the  airplane  to 
perform  under  many  different  circumstances  and  operating  envi-
ronments.  It  would  certainly  be  up  to  an  operator  to  decide  to  use 
it in a business model that they choose to. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. But you’d have no restriction. 
Mr.  SABATINI.  None.  We  have  regulations  that  would  be  specific 

for the type of operation that operator—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  that  they  can  put  as  many  people  as 
they can comfortably fit in there, right?—in one of these airplanes. 
Mr.  SABATINI.  Yes,  and  they  can  use  it,  under  Part  135,  on  de-
mand,  or  they  can  use  it—well,  basically,  that’s  the  regulation—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. SABATINI.—they would be able to—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. SABATINI.—use it under. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. I wanted to ask you this, that when 
we look at the accommodations needed, did—do you think at—with 
the  present  restrictions—we’ve  got  a  1,000-foot  separation,  and 
delays,  constantly,  on  the  East  Coast  and  other  fairly  busy  places. 
They  cause  delays  all  over,  because  what  happens  if  New  York  is 
jammed  with  flights  coming  North-South,  then  they  can’t  take  the 
airplanes  from  the  West,  coming  there.  At  what  point  do  you  say 
that  skies  have  finite—has  a  finite  limit  and  that  there’s  a  point 
at  which  we  can’t  take  any  more,  based  on  the  fact  that  delays 
count?  Is  there  a  delay  marker  that  we  use  that  says  that  every 
flight  should  be  off  in  10  minutes,  or  something  like  that,  from  its 
advertised time? 

Mr. CIRILLO. Well, safety is our number-one priority, so we don’t 
put  those  types  of  parameters  around  the  operation,  because  our 
ultimate  mandate  is  to  maintain  the  safe  operation.  But  we  do 
have a sophisticated traffic flow management system, and it’s gen-
erated  from  the  Air  Traffic  Control  System  Command  Center  in 
Herndon  and  our  traffic  management  units  around  the  country, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

and  we  have  the  ability  to  put  a  traffic  management  initiative  in 
at  any  airport,  and  also,  as  recently  as  this  year,  for  the  airspace. 
And  the  reason  is  obviously  to  maintain  efficiency,  but,  more  im-
portantly,  is  to  maintain  safety  so  that  airports  or  airspace  or  sec-
tors  don’t  get  overloaded  and  we  have  the  maximum  throughput 
while still maintaining our safety mandate. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Would  it  make  sense  for  FAA  to  publish 

delay statistics? Do they do it now? 

Mr. CIRILLO. Yes, sir. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. How frequently? 
Mr. CIRILLO. On a daily basis, we—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. All airports? 
Mr. CIRILLO. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  ask  you  a  question.  What  about 
the  noise  level  from  these  aircraft?  Will  they  be  significantly  less 
or  more  than,  let’s—turboprops  or  other—the  lightest  of  the  jets 
that are flying now? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  They  will  certified  to  the  most  recent  noise  re-
quirements.  And  I  will  tell  you  that  when  they  fly  by,  you  will 
hardly hear them. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Really?  That  would  be  excellent.  Well, 
does that mean we can get rid of some of the old, noisier ones that 
are not yet—that don’t meet the standard in a lot of airports? 

Mr.  SABATINI.  Well,  sir,  I  believe  today  that  all  aircraft  that  are 
operating  today,  regardless  of  their  weight,  meet  or  exceed  the 
noise  requirement  contained  in  their  certification  basis.  As  tech-
nology  for  aircraft  and  engine  design  has  improved  over  the  years, 
many  aircraft  today  are  quieter  than  their  predecessors.  This  is 
also true for small jets in general. Market forces will determine the 
attrition rate of the noisier jets. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Most. Not all. 
Mr. SABATINI. Well, I’m not aware of any, so I’d have to get back 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank 

to you, Senator. 

you, gentlemen. 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you.  And  I  thank  both  of  you  for  coming 
this  morning  and  offering  your  testimony.  We’ll—we  look  forward 
to working with you as we work through next year. Thank you very 
much. Thank you. 

We’ll  go  to  our  second  panel:  Mr.  Vern  Raburn,  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Eclipse  Aviation  Corporation,  out  of  Al-
buquerque,  New  Mexico;  Mr.  Edward  Iacobucci,  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer,  DayJet  Corporation,  Delray  Beach,  Flor-
ida;  Jack  Pelton,  Chief  Executive  Officer  from  Cessna  Aircraft  out 
of  Wichita,  Kansas;  and  Mr.  Matt  Andersson—and  I  suspect  it’s 
‘‘Anderson,’’  though—Senior  Aviation  Consultant,  Aerospace,  De-
fense  and  Transportation,  CRA  International,  out  of  Chicago.  We 
appreciate you gentlemen coming today. 

[Pause.] 
Senator BURNS. As we tackle with this new challenge in aviation 
of  UAVs  and  very  light  jets,  we  appreciate  your  testimony.  I  read 
most  of  it  last  night.  I  appreciate  some  of  your  testimony.  And  if 
you  have  a  5-minute  version  of  your  testimony,  that  would  cer-
tainly be helpful to us, at this time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Mr.  Vern  Raburn,  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Eclipse,  thank  you 

for coming today. 

STATEMENT OF VERN RABURN, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

ECLIPSE AVIATION CORPORATION 

Mr.  RABURN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  speak  to  the  Committee  today  on  the  really  exciting  op-
portunities and changes that are happening in aviation today. 

I  founded  Eclipse  Aviation  in  1998  to  really  revolutionize  air 
travel  through  a  low-cost,  high-performance  jet  that  we  believe  is 
delivering  unprecedented  levels  of  performance,  efficiency,  reli-
ability,  and  safety,  to  customers.  I  do  so  with  the  knowledge  that 
our  air  transportation  system  would  not  be  equipped  to  meet  the 
needs  of  21st  century  air  travelers.  And,  in  fact,  the  need  for  a 
whole new layer of air transportation would be crucial to our coun-
try’s future leadership and economic development. 

We  believe  that,  enabled  by  this  emergence  of  these  new  VLJs, 
that  there’s  a  whole  new  generation  of  entrepreneurs  that  will  be 
emerging to offer services using these aircraft. These air-taxi or on- 
demand  air  travel  companies  intend  to  leverage  the  breakthrough 
performance and costs of VLJs to provide point-to-point on-demand 
service  through  hundreds,  not  just  a  few,  communities  in  the 
United States. 

The  beneficiaries  of  VLJs  will  be  individuals  who  regularly  en-
dure  the  5-  to  10-hour  drives,  not  airline  travel,  because  they  can-
not  access  commercial  airlines  for  their  transportation  needs.  In 
other  words,  consumers  will  be  using  this  form  of  air  transpor-
tation to go to new levels of companies, new levels of communities, 
whether  it’s  small,  medium,  or  even  large-sized  companies  will  be 
using these aircraft to increase their travel needs or their travel ca-
pabilities. 

Last,  these  aircraft  will  offer  owner/operators—people  who,  like 
myself,  own  aircraft—conduct  business  and  personal  air  travel  in 
a way that hasn’t been possible heretofore. 

There  are  a  number  of  faulty  assumptions  about  VLJs  that  I’d 
like  to  address.  These  are  myths  that  are  primarily  being  gen-
erated  by  current  users  of  the  system  that  do  not  understand  the 
capability of these aircraft. 

This first myth is that these VLJs will be flown by inexperienced 
pilots, and training will be a concern. The simple fact of the matter 
is  that  we  have  over  800  individuals  who  have  bought  these  air-
craft,  and  these  individuals  typically  have  a  commercial  pilot’s  li-
cense,  have  over  a  thousand  hours  of  experience,  and  are  already 
qualified to fly aircraft that are far more difficult to fly. 

Training.  Eclipse  pilots  will  receive  the  most  advanced  flight 
training,  far  beyond  any  mandate  from  the  FAA.  In  fact,  they  will 
receive training that is in excess of what airline pilots typically re-
ceive.  So,  we  will  be  training  the  pilots,  with  the  ultimate  context 
of, ‘‘If you can’t meet the training criteria, we won’t sell you an air-
plane.’’ No other manufacturer has ever made that claim previously 
in the history of aviation. 

Another myth is that VLJs will cause airport congestion. There’s 
a lot of ample evidence to show that en route airspace to accommo-
date  new  aircraft  with  today’s  antiquated  ATC  system  is  able  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

handle  this.  VLJs  will  rarely  be  accessing  major  hub  airports.  In 
fact, they will be accessing the satellite airports. To Senator Rocke-
feller’s question earlier, every major city, ironically, with the excep-
tion  of  Washington,  D.C.,  has  significant  number  of  satellite  air-
ports around it, including, by the way, Charleston. And passengers 
will  be  able  to  use  time-sensitive,  on-demand  air  travel,  to  go 
where  they  need  to  go  when  they  want  to  go.  Once  again,  I  want 
to emphasize the point, not where the airlines go today, but where 
the airlines don’t go. 

The  myths  continue  with  this  idea  that  VLJs  will  disrupt  en 
route traffic flows. Again, this is simply not a fact. In fact, we rare-
ly  will  fly  at  higher  altitudes.  I’ve  flown  the  Eclipse  500  now  well 
over  150  hours,  and  I’ve  only  been  above  28,000  feet  six  times; 
principally  on  test  flights.  That’s  because  at  even  28,000  feet,  the 
aircraft offer 100 knots of additional speed for the same fuel burns 
as  turboprops.  For  the  ranges  and  the  typical  trips  that  these  air-
craft  will  be  using,  whether  it  be  up  and  down  the  East  Coast  or 
to the West Coast or to Montana or to Wyoming, this airplane will 
be able to use these altitudes, very effectively. 

There  is  another  myth  or  concept  that  VLJs  drive  cost  into  the 
air  transportation  system.  Well,  the  simple  fact  of  the  matter  is, 
once  again,  that  most  of  the  cost  in  the  air  transportation  system 
today  is  driven  by  the  airlines,  by  their  need  to  go  to  and  from  a 
very,  very  small,  finite  number  of  airports,  whether  it’s  the  22 
PACER  airports  or  the  35  OEP  airports.  That’s  what  drives  the 
congestion  in  the  system  today,  is  the  fact  that  they  all  go  in,  and 
want  to  depart  and  arrive  at,  the  same  places.  VLJs  will,  once 
again,  be  operating  out  of  the  airports,  out  of  the  communities 
where there is no congestion today. 

So,  the  fact  is  that  a  lot  of  these  concepts  are  fully  misdirected, 
and  it’s  endangering  the  economic  future  of  this  country.  The  air-
lines  are  approaching  air  transportation  as  a  zero-sum  game,  as  a 
game that simply says, ‘‘There’s no more space left, let’s restrict the 
access to the system.’’ In fact, a recent study that Matt will be talk-
ing about, from CRA, says that, based solely on the VLJ projections 
from  the  FAA,  that  there  will  be  over  $24  billion  in  economic  out-
put,  over  $7  billion  in  earnings,  and  over  176,000  jobs  created  by 
2017, from VLJs alone. In Albuquerque, alone, we now employ 850 
employees that, 2–5 years ago, were not employed in Albuquerque, 
with an average salary that’s three times that of the average salary 
in  the  State  of  New  Mexico.  It  is  unfathomable  that  we,  as  a  Na-
tion, will not move forward aggressively to tap into this significant 
growth opportunity for businesses and economic expansion. 

Thank you very much for your time. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Raburn follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VERN RABURN, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

ECLIPSE AVIATION CORPORATION 

Good morning. My name is Vern Raburn, and I am President and CEO of Eclipse 
Aviation  Corporation  (Eclipse),  located  in  Albuquerque,  New  Mexico.  I  appreciate 
the opportunity to address the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Trans-
portation  Subcommittee  on  Aviation,  concerning  the  incorporation  of  the  very  light 
jet (VLJ) into the national air space (NAS) and into our Nation’s economy. My goal 
today  is  to  first  summarize  Eclipse  Aviation,  the  Eclipse  500  and  the  current  air 
transportation  system.  Second,  I  want  to  dispel  the  many  myths  that  the  airlines 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

are  creating  about  VLJ  integration  into  the  National  Airspace  System.  And  finally, 
I will show how the national economy will benefit from a new layer of air transpor-
tation. 

Sadly,  with  the  exception  of  the  very  top  end  of  the  market,  the  spirit  of  innova-
tion has long been absent in general aviation, where growth contracted dramatically 
following airline deregulation in 1978. The reality is that general aviation has been 
sidelined  to  the  domain  of  the  elite  few.  Since  its  inception,  Eclipse  Aviation  has 
demonstrated  an  unwavering  commitment  to  return  innovation  and  growth  to  gen-
eral  aviation.  I  founded  Eclipse  in  1998  to  revolutionize  air  travel  through  a  low- 
cost, high-performance jet that will deliver unprecedented levels of performance, ef-
ficiency and safety to customers. 

Before I go into detail about Eclipse or why we pioneered the VLJ market, I would 
like  to  briefly  touch  on  the  role  of  air  transportation  in  our  society  and  national 
economy.  Recently,  the  U.S.  economy  has  entered  what  some  call  a  post-industrial 
phase.  Employment  growth  is  primarily  in  professions  and  services,  and  this  type 
of employment is very flexible in its location. Consequently, the U.S. population has 
begun to shift toward the interior of the nation, where things like quality of life and 
cost of living are massively, measurably better. High-speed Internet access, express 
package  delivery  and  the  expansion  of  go  anywhere  phone  numbers  (i.e.,  cellular 
phone) are enabling this migration. 

And  so,  more  than  ever  before,  goods  and  people  must  be  able  to  move  freely  be-
tween  regions.  Companies  must  have  fast,  flexible,  safe  and  cost-effective  access  to 
destinations  across  the  country.  Small  and  medium  communities  must  have  viable 
links  to  each  other.  In  short,  a  robust,  broad  and  deep  transportation  network  is 
more critical than ever to our Nation’s economic growth and prosperity. 

Yet  at  the  same  time,  our  ground  transportation  system  is  weakening.  Long  dis-
tance  passenger  rails  are  a  thing  of  the  past  and  commuter  trains  are  rare  except 
in a couple of really specialized areas like Chicago, Boston and New York. The high-
way transportation system is ever more clogged, difficult and dangerous to navigate. 
The end result—people are increasingly interested in traveling by air. 

Yet  in  spite  of  the  fact  that  smaller  communities  desperately  need  air  transpor-
tation to drive business development and economic growth, the reality is that there 
is significantly less air service available today as measured by communities directly 
served.  Virtually  all  of  these  communities  have  underutilized  airports  that  can  be 
used as economic growth engines. In the face of these challenges and nascent oppor-
tunities,  the  advent  of  the  very  light  jet  (VLJ)  is  playing  a  critical  role  in  revital-
izing the GA industry and improving our overall air transportation system. 

Eclipse Aviation has successfully designed, developed, certified—and is now man-
ufacturing  and  delivering  the  world’s  first  VLJ—the  Eclipse  500.  To  create  the 
Eclipse  500,  Eclipse  used  technologies  and  business  practices  forged  in  the  tech-
nology industry to drive down cost while increasing performance. Eclipse applied in-
novation across every facet of its business to make the Eclipse 500 significantly easi-
er  and  less  expensive  to  operate  than  traditional  business  aircraft,  and  more  effi-
cient  to  certify  and  produce.  Some  of  the  groundbreaking  innovations  that  we  are 
applying to the Eclipse 500 include friction stir welding, the PhostrEx fire suppres-
sion  system,  electro-mechanical  actuators  and  digital  electronics  with  integrated 
software. These technologies are changing the status quo of what we recognize today 
as general and corporate aviation, and inspiring new and better methods of aviation 
transportation for the masses. 

The  resulting  Eclipse  500  is  a  high-performance  aircraft  with  technology  and  ca-
pabilities  normally  found  in  jets  costing  many  millions  more.  With  an  acquisition 
cost  of  one  half  of  today’s  small  jets  and  the  lowest  operating  cost  per  mile  of  any 
jet,  the  Eclipse  500  provides  the  lowest  cost  of  jet  ownership  ever  achieved.  This 
breakthrough has made the benefits of jet transportation available to a broader seg-
ment  of  the  population,  and  inspired  an  emerging  generation  of  entrepreneurs  to 
bring  a  new  form  of  air  travel  to  the  flying  public—the  air  taxi.  It  has  also  opened 
up  a  new  world  of  convenient  air  transportation  to  a  majority  of  the  communities 
in the U.S. that are simply not served by commercial airlines, thereby enabling sig-
nificant economic growth. 

Potential  markets  for  the  Eclipse  500  include  owner  operators,  corporations,  air-
man training institutions, same-day express services, and one of the most promising 
markets  of  all,  the  new  air  taxi  industry.  Testimony  specific  to  the  new  air  taxi  in-
dustry  will  be  presented  by  DayJet  at  today’s  hearing.  For  small  to  mid-sized  com-
panies,  the  availability  of  small  affordable  jets  will  open  up  the  convenience  and 
time  savings  of  corporate  transportation  to  new  levels  of  company  management. 
This will create much leaner fiscal operations, while providing new levels of service 
to customers in the field. These aircraft will also allow owner/operator pilots to con-
duct  business  and  personal  travel  in  jets  offering  sophisticated  performance  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

safety features that were previously available only in high-end corporate and trans-
port aircraft. 

The  operational  characteristics  of  the  Eclipse  500  clearly  demonstrate  the  air-
craft’s  versatility.  Although  certified  to  operate  at  41,000  feet  at  370  knots,  the 
Eclipse 500 is very efficient at lower altitudes and speeds. Many of the shorter trip 
profiles  will  have  operators  flying  at  altitudes  from  20,000  to  30,000  feet.  For  the 
five hundred mile, two to three passenger trips that will constitute a significant por-
tion of the workload of the Eclipse 500, those often underutilized altitudes will serve 
as  the  most  efficient.  Further,  with  the  ability  to  land  and  take  off  from  2,500  foot 
runways, the Eclipse 500 can utilize 10,000 (5,000 public and 5,000 private) landing 
facilities  in  the  U.S.  This  will  allow  communities  and  remote  geographic  regions  of 
our  country  that  do  not  enjoy  the  safety  and  reliability  of  twin  engine  jet  aircraft 
transportation,  to  become  the  beneficiaries  of  modern-day  transportation,  and  the 
economic benefits that will follow. 

Bringing  turbine  safety  to  a  whole  new  class  of  aircraft,  the  Eclipse  500’s  stand-
ard  safety  features  rival  those  of  aircraft  costing  millions  more  and  include: 
autothrottle; color weather radar; a dual-redundant flight management system with 
sophisticated aircraft performance computer; ‘‘smart’’ electronic checklists and an in-
telligent  crew  alert  system.  The  state-of-the-art  Eclipse  500  cockpit  is  designed  for 
safety.  For  example,  to  ensure  availability  of  critical  flight  data,  the  Eclipse  500  is 
equipped  with  redundant,  high  reliability,  solid  state  electronic  sensors  and  dis-
plays. In addition, both Primary Flight Displays (PFDs) and the Multi Function Dis-
play (MFD) have a reversionary mode, allowing them to transfer information to one 
of the other displays if required. 

Through  digital  electronics,  the  Eclipse  500  incorporates  a  level  of  systems  inte-
gration  and  safety  previously  available  only  in  advanced  military  aircraft  and  com-
mercial airliners. This extensive level of aircraft systems integration, known as Avio 
in  the  Eclipse  500,  is  delivered  through  integral,  redundant  computer  systems,  and 
an advanced power distribution system. Avio systems contain extensive built-in-test-
ing  capabilities  that  are  used  to  constantly  monitor  and  ensure  the  integrity  of  the 
aircraft.  More  than  just  an  integrated  avionics  and  instrument  suite,  Avio  expands 
integration  technology  beyond  the  cockpit  and  applies  it  to  the  entire  aircraft.  Air-
craft systems—including avionics, engine operation, fuel system, flaps, landing gear, 
cabin pressure and temperature—are centrally controlled by Avio. Avio significantly 
reduces  pilot  workload  by  simplifying  tasks,  generating  useful  information,  man-
aging systems and assisting with troubleshooting. In fact, the Avio-equipped Eclipse 
500  is  more  capable  of  operating  in  our  current  and  future  national  airspace  than 
most of the aircraft currently used in air carrier operations. 

There  are  a  number  of  faulty  assumptions  about  VLJs,  and  one  of  them  is  that 
they  will  be  flown  by  inexperienced  pilots.  The  reality  is  that  the  people  who  are 
purchasing  these  airplanes  are  not  just  beginning  to  learn  how  to  fly.  They  are  li-
censed,  seasoned  pilots  who  have  earned  multi-engine  and  instrument  ratings  from 
the  FAA.  As  I  will  detail  in  a  moment  when  I  walk  you  through  Eclipse’s  training 
process—training  will  be  done  through  the  best  aviation  training  school  in  the 
world.  In  all  cases,  the  curriculum  goes  far  beyond  what  the  FAA  requires  and  the 
core  curriculum  goes  beyond  all  existing  airline  training  programs.  Moreover,  this 
is  not  a  matter  of  simply  sitting  through  a  course.  Pilots  will  have  to  demonstrate 
proficiency. 

As  the  category  leader,  Eclipse’s  comprehensive  approach  to  training  dem-
onstrates its unwavering commitment to safety and has set a very high bar for VLJ 
training  overall.  In  2005,  Eclipse  kicked  off  an  unprecedented  training  partnership 
with United Airlines, a proven industry leader in cockpit resource management and 
crew  safety  innovations.  This  partnership  is  designed  to  provide  Eclipse  pilots  with 
the  most  advanced  flight  training  available  in  general  aviation.  The  training  pro-
gram  will  provide  a  level  of  professional  pilot  training  normally  available  only  to 
commercial  airline  pilots.  Eclipse  takes  its  responsibility  to  create  an  environment 
for pilot success so seriously, it has committed to refund the deposit of any customer 
who cannot successfully complete its training program. 

Eclipse is actively participating in the FAA’s Industry Training Standards (FITS) 
program.  The  FITS  program  uses  scenario-based  training  and  case  studies  of  pre-
vious aviation accidents and incidents to provide a learning environment that more 
closely resembles day-to-day flight experiences. 

Eclipse’s  curriculum  is  unprecedented  in  the  industry  and  is  focused  on  creating 
safe pilots. The Eclipse pilot training program consists of multiple phases that pro-
vide  training  experiences  from  initial  introduction  to  the  Eclipse  500  to  recurrent 
training.  At  the  beginning  of  the  Eclipse  training  program,  pilots  will  have  to  com-
plete  a  Flight  Skills  Assessment  in  a  full-motion  simulator  focusing  on  instrument 
proficiency and airmanship skills. A written Pilot Qualification Review will be com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

pleted by each pilot in advance of the Skills Assessment. Each pilot will also be re-
quired  to  take  the  Myers-Briggs  Type  Indicator  personality  test  to  help  tailor  the 
training program to their individual personality type. Based upon the results of the 
Skills Assessment, supplemental training may be required for some customers prior 
to beginning the Eclipse 500 Type Rating. 

After the flight skills assessment, each pilot will be provided with information on 
the  basics  of  operating  a  jet,  and  will  have  to  complete  emergency  situations  train-
ing. The Jet Basics Self-Paced Study Course, in a CD format, provides an overview 
of jet aircraft and their operating environment. The topics covered in the course are: 
Introduction to Jet Engines; High Altitude Physiology; High Altitude and High Air-
speed  Aerodynamics;  High  Altitude  Flight  Planning;  and,  High  Altitude  Weather 
and Radar. The emergency situations training will provide hands-on upset recovery 
training in Eclipse’s L–39 jet. Further, in addition to classroom work on physiology 
and  hypoxia,  the  pilot  candidates  will  experience  actual  hypoxia  training  with  a 
mixed gas simulator. 

After  all  of  this  foundational  training  is  complete,  pilots  will  transition  to  the 
Eclipse  500  type  certificate  transition  training.  The  training  is  comprised  of  four 
parts.  They  include:  self-paced  study  of  the  Eclipse  500  aircraft  systems;  classroom 
training; simulator training; and, actual flight training in the Eclipse 500. The type 
rating  transition  course  will  provide  classroom  instruction  that  emphasizes  FITS 
scenario-based  training  to  build  good  judgment.  Following  completion  of  the  type 
rating  course,  each  pilot  will  take  a  type  rating  examination  in  the  Eclipse  500,  or 
in a full-motion simulator once the simulators are certified. 

Depending  upon  the  pilot’s  experience  level,  following  completion  of  the  type  rat-
ing  examination,  some  pilots  will  receive  their  type  rating  to  fly  the  Eclipse  500  in 
single-pilot operations. Others will be required to fly with experienced mentor pilots, 
which  is  similar  to  an  airline-style  initial  operating  experience.  This  pilot  mentor 
program  will  include  operations  in  high-density  traffic  areas,  the  high-altitude 
weather environment, and will generally ensure that the airman displays the proper 
proficiency  to  operate  as  a  single  pilot  in  the  jet  environment.  Completion  of  the 
mentor program is not based upon a predetermined number of hours flown with the 
mentor  pilot,  but  rather  is  based  upon  the  previously  mentioned  display  of  pro-
ficiency. 

Recurrent training will be required for all Eclipse 500 pilots. The frequency of re-
current  training  will  be  determined  by  individual  pilot  skill  level  and  experience. 
For  the  more  experienced  pilot,  one-year  recurrent  training  will  be  the  norm.  For 
the  pilots  requiring  an  initial  mentor  program  experience,  six-month  recurrent 
training  will  be  an  initial  requirement.  Recurrent  training  will  also  include  web- 
based home study, classroom review and a proficiency check in a simulator. 

I would now like to address some of the confusion that is emerging about the inte-
gration of VLJs into our national airspace. The FAA and Joint Planning and Devel-
opment Office (JPDO) are doing very important work to modernize our national air 
transportation  system  through  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System 
(NGATS) initiative. A recent article by a member of the Strategy, Advanced Traffic 
Management  group,  The  Boeing  Company,  illustrated  that  the  need  to  modernize 
our  Air  Traffic  Control  (ATC)  system  is  necessary  to  simply  move  away  from  the 
1950s  technology  that  is  in  place  today,  and  completely  utilize  the  system  effi-
ciencies  and  increased  safety  available  through  NGATS  technology.  Journal  of  Air 
Traffic Control, January–March 2006, (Attachment ‘‘1’’, page 43). 

The  article  also  dealt  with  misconceptions  surrounding  VLJs  and  airport  conges-
tion.  Specific  to  congestion,  the  reality  is  that  VLJs  will  neither  require  nor  seek 
regular access to major hub airports. The FAA data supports this with general avia-
tion  operations  accounting  for  only  6  percent  of  the  operations  at  the  Operational 
Evolution  Plan  (OEP)  35  airports.  In  addition,  there  is  absolutely  no  correlation 
when  comparing  the  20  busiest  general  aviation  airports  to  the  20  busiest  airports 
for  airlines.  As  the  article  states,  ‘‘The  VLJ  business  model  is  based  on  providing 
convenient,  personal  point-to-point  services  through  non-congested  airports.  VLJ 
passengers  will  be  time  sensitive  and  convenience-minded,  and  they  will  use  VLJs 
precisely  to  avoid  the  hassles  associated  with  large  hubs.  Second,  VLJ  aircraft  are 
specifically designed to operate from runways as short as 3,000 feet (including many 
grass strips). This makes them ideal for providing point-to-point services to most of 
the  5,000+  U.S.  airports  serving  small  to  medium  sized  markets.’’  Journal  of  Air 
Traffic Control, January–March 2006, (Attachment ‘‘1’’, page 42). 

In  fact,  even  if  a  VLJ  operator  decides  to  operate  into  a  hub  airport,  that  oper-
ation will not cause congestion. ‘‘The effect of VLJ operations into hub airports will 
be minimal for a number of reasons: VLJ pilots will need adequate prior experience 
and  will  receive  rigorous  training,  equivalent  in  many  cases  to  that  for  commercial 
pilots; VLJ aircraft will have advanced integrated avionics to provide enhanced pilot 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

situational  awareness,  enable  seamless  traffic  flow  integration  and  optimal  spacing 
with  commercial  traffic  flows;  VLJs  are  capable  of  operating  at  speeds  compatible 
to  those  of  commercial  jet  aircraft,  throughout  the  terminal  area  and  until  well  in-
side  the  final  approach  fix;  VLJ  climb  and  descent  rates  are  compatible  with  com-
mercial turbojet aircraft; VLJ aircraft can land and depart safely using shorter run-
ways,  unusable  by  commercial  jet  traffic.  Even  regional  jets  require  those  same 
longer  runways.  On  intersecting  runways,  VLJ  aircraft  are  capable  of  routine 
(LAHSO)  Land  and  Hold  Short  Operations;  and  finally,  to  enhance  traffic  integra-
tion  even  more,  new  procedures  that  take  advantage  of  VLJ  performance  and  avi-
onics  capability  can  be  developed.’’  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control,  January–March 
2006, (Attachment ‘‘1’’, page 42). 

Some  believe  that  VLJs  will  clog  our  airspace  and  create  gridlock  in  the  skies. 
The reality is that there is significant available airspace to accommodate these new 
aircraft.  Under  Marion  Blakey,  great  progress  has  been  made  and  the  trans-
formation  to  NGATS  has  already  begun.  Last  year  we  doubled  the  capacity  of  air-
space  system  between  FL290  and  FL410  with  RVSM,  so  there  is  plenty  of  capacity 
in  those  altitudes.  WAAS  is  now  a  reality,  and  RNAV  and  RNP  are  happening. 
Moreover,  it  is  important  to  note  the  airspace  is  three  dimensional.  This  is  not  a 
two lane highway where you are permanently stuck behind the truck in front of you. 
VLJs  are  technologically  advanced  and  nimble.  They  are  more  than  capable  of  get-
ting out of the way of faster airplanes. Moving around in the airspace is something 
airplanes do everyday, most often when the commercial airlines go up and down in 
altitude looking for a smooth ride. 

As  stated  in  the  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control,  ‘‘Commercial  jet  traffic  will  con-
tinue to dominate in the higher altitudes. VLJ operations will generally be on short-
er  routes  under  600  statue  miles  and  mainly  at  altitudes  below  those  on  longer- 
range  commercial  operations.  Sometimes,  especially  on  longer  stage  lengths,  VLJs 
will  want  or  need  to  operate  at  the  higher  altitudes,  but  even  then  VLJs  will  not 
disrupt en route traffic flows, even though they cruise at 0.64 mach, slightly slower 
than  commercial  airliners.  Current  Flight  Management  System  (FMS)  technology 
already enables faster moving aircraft to establish offset tracks so as to pass slower 
aircraft  en  route.’’  The  article  goes  on  to  say,  ‘‘In  the  ongoing  debate  about  the  im-
pact of VLJ operation, the question of VLJ speed compatibility has been raised fre-
quently. In large measure, this is a red herring. The commercial and business fleets 
of  today  operate  at  a  variety  of  climb,  cruise,  descent,  and  approach  speeds,  based 
not just on aircraft type, weight, and performance differences but also on variations 
in  company  policies.  Even  with  today’s  1950s  ATC  technology,  controllers  are  able 
to integrate traffic of varying speeds quite efficiently, so VLJs will add no significant 
complexity.’’  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control,  January–March  2006,  (Attachment  ‘‘1’’, 
pages 42&43). 

The  current  hub-and-spoke  system  used  by  the  airlines  is  reaching  capacity  re-
gardless  of  the  integration  of  VLJs  into  the  NAS,  and  as  was  established  in  1997, 
it  is  this  airline  hub  and  spoke  operation  that  drives  the  majority  of  system  cost. 
VLJs  will  not  change  this  dynamic.  VLJ  operators  and  owner  pilots  will  use  their 
aircraft  to  go  where  the  airlines  don’t,  avoiding  the  congestion  associated  with  the 
hubs.  Moreover,  when  these  airplanes  are  flown  by  air  taxi  operators  they  will  pay 
the  commercial  ticket  tax.  Because  the  air  taxi  charge  will  likely  exceed  a  typical 
coach  ticket,  the  typical  air  taxi  passenger  will  end  up  paying  more  in  taxes  than 
the scheduled airline passenger. 

It  would  be  irresponsible  not  to  point  out  the  elephant  in  the  room—and  that  is 
the  fact  that  airlines  see  air  transportation  as  a  zero  sum  game  and  are  acting  to 
limit air transportation capacity vs. expand it. In other words, fearing they will lose 
passengers to VLJ operations, the airlines are propagating a series of myths to im-
pede the air transportation expansion our country so desperately needs. This energy 
is misdirected and harmful to our economic future. As mentioned earlier, most VLJ 
passengers want to travel where the airlines do not offer service and will be choos-
ing VLJ air transportation in lieu of their cars. Additionally, the ample airspace ca-
pacity  and  new  aircraft  capabilities  exist  to  make  this  expansion  possible  today.  It 
is  clear  that  the  sophisticated  technologies  that  are  available  on  today’s  VLJs,  in-
cluding  ADS–B,  WAAS  and  LPV,  are  not  advancements  the  airlines  are  interested 
in retrofitting on their fleet. 

I  would  like  to  close  by  recognizing  the  significant  economic  impact  of  the  VLJ 
market  on  the  Nation’s  economy.  At  EAA  AirVenture  2006,  Acting  Secretary  of 
Transportation Maria Cino, prior to awarding the Eclipse 500 type certificate, stated 
that  ‘‘air  travel  drives  economic  growth.’’  At  the  same  event,  FAA  Administrator 
Marion  Blakey,  said  ‘‘Eclipse  is  more  than  about  just  building  a  plane . . . it’s 
about building a company, it’s about building our economy.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

A recent study, conducted by CRA International and based upon FAA VLJ market 
projections, estimated a potential annual VLJ economic impact of $24 billion in out-
put,  $6.9  billion  in  earnings  and  178,000  jobs  in  2017.  Based  upon  the  unprece-
dented  market  acceptance  of  the  Eclipse  500  VLJ,  there  is  a  very  real  potential  for 
higher production of VLJs than the FAA has forecast. Increasing the FAA projection 
by  50  percent  (for  a  total  fleet  size  of  7,425  aircraft),  economic  activity  in  2017  re-
lated  to  VLJs  would  total  over  $32  billion  in  output,  $9.4  billion  in  earnings,  and 
over  249,000  jobs.  If  the  forecast  of  VLJ  production  is  increased  beyond  the  FAA 
projection  to  reflect  an  additional  increment  of  corporate  sales  equal  to  the  level  of 
aircraft  purchased  by  air  taxi  operators  (for  a  total  fleet  size  of  8,250  aircraft),  eco-
nomic activity in 2017 related to VLJs would total over $35 billion in output, $10.4 
billion in earnings, and over 276,000 jobs. The Economic Impact of Very Light Jets, 
CRA International, May 2006. * More specific information on the potential economic 
impact of the VLJ market on our Nation’s economy will be presented by CRA Inter-
national at today’s hearing. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Com-
merce, Science, and Transportation Subcommittee on Aviation. I hope that my com-
ments have assisted in your understanding of the emerging VLJ market; the poten-
tial  impact  of  VLJs  on  our  society  and  economy;  and  the  incorporation  of  the  VLJ 
into the NAS. 

ATTACHMENT 1— 

Journal of Air Traffic Control—January–March 2006 

VERY LIGHT JETS, IMPACTS ON NAS OPERATIONS 

(By Captain J Leslie Robinson, Aviation Consultant, Neil Planzer, Vice President, Strategy, Advanced Air 

Traffic Management, The Boeing Company) 

‘‘Without  the  unique  benefits  of  air  transportation,  our  quality  of  life  would  be 
dramatically reduced. Whether those benefits will continue to be available in the fu-
ture  will  depend  on  actions  we  begin  taking  now.  The  system  is  already  showing 
signs  of  stress  and  it  is  clear  that  projected  demand  will  soon  surpass  the  system’s 
capacity.’’ 1 

‘‘Now imagine an alternative world where a traveler or shipper determines the de-
parture  and  arrival  times—instead  of  being  confined  to  a  predetermined 
schedule . . . Think  of  the  possibilities  if  owning  a  recreational  plane,  a  micro-jet, 
or a share of a jet capable of flying in nearly all weather conditions were affordable 
to more Americans.’’ 2 

In  the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  Integrated  Plan,  published  in 
December 2004 by the Joint Planning & Development Office, JPDO projects a range 
of  outcomes  by  year  2025  that  can  include  increases  in  demand  to  a  level  of  up  to 
3×  times  the  number  of  operations  in  today’s  current  National  Airspace  System 
(NAS). 

The  vital  work  of  the  FAA  and  JPDO  in  transforming  the  NAS  from  its  current 
1950s  technology  to  a  modern  information-centric,  network-enabled  system  of  sys-
tems  is  finally  gaining  traction  inside  the  Beltway.  Nevertheless,  the  sheer  mag-
nitude  of  the  systems-of-systems  planning,  funding,  and  engineering  required,  as 
well  as  the  accompanying  political  and  social  issues,  continue  to  stall  NAS  mod-
ernization.  If  this  delay  continues,  the  result  could  be  monumental  air  traffic  grid-
lock, with unimaginable economic and social consequences. No one can predict when 
this  could  occur,  in  some  measure  because  the  timeline  can  be  affected  by  several 
disruptive technologies. 

Some  of  these  technologies  will  likely  have  minimal  effects  on  the  NAS  in  the 
near  to  mid-term.  The  integration  of  unmanned  or  remotely  operated  aircraft  into 
the  NAS  does  not  seem  likely  in  the  near  to  mid  term.  The  NASA  Small  Aircraft 
Transportation  System  (SATS)  concept,  which  suggests  that  someday  individuals 
with little or no aviation skills may be operating private air vehicles controlled and 
separated from each other by computer systems, seems even more remote. 

In contrast to these more remote technologies, however, there is a third very real, 
disruptive technology approaching in the very near term—the Very Light Jet (VLJ). 
Next  year,  with  virtual  certainty,  these  small,  moderately  priced,  six-passenger 
twin-engine  jets  will  be  certified  and  will  begin  to  populate  the  NAS  in  increasing 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 
1 JPDO.  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  Integrated  Plan.  U.S.  GPO:  Washington, 

2004. P.2. 

2 Ibid. P.i. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

numbers, enabling personal and on-demand, point-to-point air service to most of the 
Nation’s approximately 5,400 airports. 
What Industry & Government Are Saying About the VLJ 

The  pending  introduction  of  the  VLJ  has  raised  some  concerns.  Airline  operators 
see  a  possibility  that  the  skies  and  airports  they  use  will  suddenly  be  filled  with 
large  numbers  of  smaller  and  slower  aircraft.  Increased  airport  and  airway  conges-
tion  could  mean  more  delays  and  higher  operating  costs  for  an  industry  that  is  al-
ready hanging by a thread. 

At  the  same  time,  the  FAA,  NASA,  and  the  JPDO  have  expressed  similar  con-
cerns  regarding  the  potential  impact  of  VLJs  on  the  NAS  Air  Traffic  Control  Sys-
tem: 

• ‘‘The  FAA  predicted  this  spring  that  4,500  microjets  will  be  flying  by  2016.’’ 3 
To  put  this  in  perspective,  according  to  the  Boeing  2005  Current  Market  Out-
look,  the  2004  year-end  global  fleet  of  commercial  aircraft  consisted  of  just 
16,778  aircraft,  and  by  2025  that  fleet  is  expected  to  more  than  double  to 
35,287. 4 
• ‘‘An FAA computer simulation last year predicted that flight delays would climb 
more  than  300  percent  by  2010  if  microjets  {VLJs}  arrived  as  expected  and  the 
Agency  made  no  improvements,  said  its  author,  FAA  mathematician  Doug 
Baart.’’ 5 
• ‘‘NASA says the number {of VLJs} could be even higher. It estimates the market 
• The  JPDO  Next  Generation  Air  Traffic  System  Integrated  Plan  states  that  ‘‘a 
shift  of  2  percent  of  today’s  commercial  passengers  to  micro-jets  that  seat  4– 
6  passengers  would  result  in  triple  the  number  of  flights  in  order  to  carry  the 
same number of passengers as today.’’ 7 

at more than 8,000 by 2010.’’ 6 

These  rather  stark  projections  raise  two  important  questions.  First,  can  VLJ  air-
craft be assimilated seamlessly into today’s NAS? And second, would a rapid growth 
in  VLJ  deliveries  in  the  mid-  to  long  term  overwhelm  the  air  traffic  control  system 
and create widespread gridlock, long before any Next Generation Air Traffic System 
(NGATS)  could  be  implemented?  Are  these  concerns  justified?  Let’s  take  a  look  at 
the issues. 
The Very Light Jet & ‘‘Disruptive Technology’’ 

Recently,  some  aviation  experts  have  referred  to  the  VLJ  as  a  ‘‘disruptive  tech-
nology,’’ 8 Clayton  M.  Christensen  of  Harvard  Business  School  originated  the  term 
in  his  1997  book  The  Innovator’s  Dilemma.  Christensen  described  ‘‘disruptive  tech-
nology’’  as 
‘‘a  technology  bringing  to  market  a  very  different  value  propo-
sition, . . . products  typically  cheaper,  simpler,  smaller,  and  frequently,  more  con-
venient  to  use.’’ 9 He  also  said  that  a  disruptive  technology  can  initially  appear  to 
be  of  limited  application  and  minimal  consumer  appeal,  but  can  ultimately  trigger 
changes  (sometimes  deadly)  to  industries  that  fail  to  recognize  these  changes  and 
continue to rely on existing business models and associated ‘‘sustaining technology.’’ 
With respect to the airline industry, it can be argued that VLJs will provide busi-
ness  and  upscale  leisure  travelers  with  a  cheaper,  simpler,  smaller  and  more  con-
venient  point-to-point  substitute  for  traditional  hub  airline  services.  Since  airlines 
rely  heavily  on  revenues  from  these  valuable  passengers,  substantial  skimming  of 
that traffic could have major consequences. 

FAA  and  other  air  traffic  management  experts  are  also  concerned  about  the  pos-
sible  impact  of  VLJs  on  the  ATC  system.  If  just  a  small  amount  of  traffic  were 
skimmed  to  VLJs  from  commercial  carriers,  it  could  mean  a  significant  increase  in 
the number of NAS operations. And if the era of personal air vehicles is indeed com-
ing soon, VLJ-like traffic volume could grow rapidly. 

FAA and JPDO are busily trying to develop a Next Generation Air Traffic System 
based  on  a  timeline  intended  to  meet  current  projections  of  traffic.  The  possibility 

3 Levin, Alan. ‘‘High Tech Gizmos Propel Aviation into the Future.’’ USA Today: Washington, 

4 The  Boeing  Company.  Current  Market  Outlook.  The  Boeing  Company:  Seattle,  2005.  P.  11. 
5 Ibid. 
6 Ibid. 
7 JPDO.  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  Integrated  Plan.  U.S.  GPO:  Washington, 

8 Christensen,  Clayton  M.  The  Innovator’s  Dilemma,  When  New  Technologies  Cause  Great 

Firms to Fail, Harvard Business School Press: Cambridge, 1997. P. xv. 

2005. 

2004. P. 5. 

9 Ibid, Page xv. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

of early, rapid VLJ growth could mean that aviation gridlock might come a lot ear-
lier  than  expected.  So  let’s  take  a  look  at  the  VLJ.  Will  it  be  a  ‘‘disruptive  tech-
nology,’’ and just exactly what will its impact be on the NAS in the near to far term? 
The Near-Term Operational Impact of the VLJ 

Very  Light  Jets  are  a  different  breed.  Serving  stage  lengths  of  up  to  1,300  nau-
tical  miles,  they  are  capable  of  operating  at  altitudes  of  up  to  41,000  feet,  carrying 
4  to  6  passengers  rapidly  and  comfortably  above  the  weather  and  in  airspace  cus-
tomarily  used  by  commercial  airlines.  Let’s  examine  the  possible  impact  of  VLJs, 
from an operations perspective. 
VLJ Aircraft—Safety & Equipage 

The  Eclipse  is  a  great  example  of  VLJ  aircraft  design.  Designed  as  an  integrated 
airframe and avionics platform, these aircraft are subjected to rigorous certification 
standards set by the FAA. And precisely because these aircraft are new, integrated 
designs,  not  just  rehashes  of  old  airframes  with  new  black  box  avionics,  they  are 
getting  even  more  rigorous  attention  from  FAA.  VLJs  will  clearly  be  safe  upon  cer-
tification! 

As  to  equipage,  most  VLJs  will  include  advanced  integrated  avionics  as  standard 

or optional equipment. For example, the Eclipse will be equipped to support: 

• ADS–B for precision surveillance monitoring; 
• Dual GPS with WAAS for precision navigation; 
• Auto-throttles; 
• Data  link  communications  capability  to  connect  to  tomorrow’s  network-centric 
• Color Weather Radar; 
• Dual  FMS  (Flight  Management  Systems)  for  trajectory-based  operations  in  to-
• The only option the Eclipse does not yet include is data link to FMS integration 

day’s environment and in the NGATS of tomorrow. 

ATM architecture; 

linkage. 

In  short,  the  typical  VLJ  will  distinguish  itself  as  better  equipped  than  many  of 

the aircraft in today’s commercial fleets. 
The Pilots—Training and Qualifications 

A  VLJ  pilot  will  be  required  to  hold  an  FAA  Pilot  certificate  with  type  rating, 
which  implies  appropriately  high  levels  of  training  and  experience.  In  addition,  be-
cause  VLJ  manufacturers  are  particularly  sensitive  to  the  need  for  high-quality 
training,  they  are  taking  training  curricula  one  step  further.  For  example,  Eclipse 
Aviation  signed  an  agreement  with  the  United  Services  division  of  United  Airlines 
to  provide  a  mandatory  training  program  similar  to  that  of  commercial  airline  pi-
lots. 

There are still a few unanswered questions as to whether VLJs will be certificated 
to  fly  with  a  single  pilot  crewmember,  but  current  evidence  supports  such  a  step 
for several reasons: 

1.  Meticulous  attention  has  been  given  by  both  industry  and  FAA  to  new  ad-
vanced training standards for high performance aircraft (i.e., FITS—FAA/Indus-
try Training System); 
2. The VLJ’s integrated aircraft design and advanced avionics platform will help 
make flight training and flight operations much safer, yet much simpler; 
3.  Using  advanced  VLJ  avionics  capability,  pilots  can  maintain  higher  levels  of 
situational awareness. 

This  combination  of  rigorous  training  and  sophisticated  design  will  place  VLJ 
pilot  operating  capabilities  and  operating  environments  near  to,  at  or  even  above 
the sophistication and capability of many airline cockpits. 
Air Traffic Operations—Near- to Mid-Term VLJ Impacts 
Airport and Terminal Area Operations 

There  is  speculation  that  even  in  the  near  to  mid-term  VLJ  traffic  will  trigger 

congestion or gridlock at major hub airports. They won’t, for several reasons. 

With few exceptions, VLJs just won’t want access to major hub airports. The VLJ 
business  model  is  based  on  providing  convenient,  personal  point-to-point  services 
through  non-congested  airports.  VLJ  passengers  will  be  time-sensitive  and  conven-
ience-minded, and they will use VLJs precisely to avoid the hassles associated with 
large hubs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Second,  VLJ  aircraft  are  specifically  designed  to  operate  from  runways  as  short 
as  3,000  feet  (including  many  grass  strips).  This  makes  them  ideal  for  providing 
point-to-point  services  to  most  of  the  5,000+  U.S.  airports  serving  small  to  medium 
sized markets. 

Some of those airports lack the runway, taxiway, or terminal facilities to support 
larger  aircraft.  Others  serve  markets  for  which  there  is  no  business  case  for  com-
mercial  service.  Still  others  have  some  commercial  service  but  offer  few  point-to- 
point travel options, forcing travelers to connect through congested hub airports. For 
these  communities,  the  VLJ  will  provide  convenient  new  service  options.  This  is 
their  market  niche.  Narrow  body  jets  and  RJs  just  can’t  serve  most  of  those  cities. 
Third, of all the reasons why VLJs won’t frequent major hub airports, the biggest 
one is pure economics. Projected passenger cost-per-mile for VLJ travel will be equal 
to  or  higher  than  full  commercial  coach  fares.  VLJs  will  also  probably  provide  no 
frequent  flier  benefits.  Therefore,  business  or  upscale  leisure  travelers  flying 
through  hub  airports  will  be  inclined  to  choose  a  traditional  airline.  VLJ  travel  at 
its  currently  projected  costs  will  never  be  a  viable  economic  substitute  for  commer-
cial travel at major hub airports. 

But  what  if  despite  all  these  reasons,  VLJ  operators  decide  to  operate  into  hub 
airports. Will those operations disrupt traffic or induce gridlock? Absolutely not! The 
effects will be minimal, for the following reasons: 

• VLJ  pilots  will  need  adequate  prior  experience  and  will  receive  rigorous  train-

ing, equivalent in many cases to that for commercial pilots; 

• VLJ  aircraft  will  have  advanced  integrated  avionics  to  provide  enhanced  pilot 
situational  awareness,  enable  seamless  traffic  flow  integration  and  optimal 
spacing with commercial traffic flows; 

• VLJs  are  capable  of  operating  at  speeds  compatible  to  those  of  commercial  jet 
aircraft, throughout the Terminal area and until well inside the final approach 
fix; 

• VLJ  climb  and  descent  rates  are  compatible  with  commercial  turbojet  aircraft; 
• VLJ  aircraft  can  land  and  depart  safely  using  shorter  runways,  unusable  by 

commercial jet traffic. Even regional jets require those same longer runways. 

• On  intersecting  runways,  VLJ  aircraft  are  capable  of  routine  (LAHSO)  Land 

and Hold Short Operations; and finally 

• To  enhance  traffic  integration  even  more,  new  procedures  that  take  advantage 

of VLJ performance and avionics capability can be developed. 

In  summary,  for  the  near  and  mid  term,  Very  Light  Jet  technology  will  not  only 
bring  point-to-point  travel  convenience  and  enhanced  economic  development  to 
many  smaller  towns  and  cities,  it  will  do  so  with  minimal  impact  on  the  existing 
crowded hubs frequented by traditional air carriers. 
En Route Operations 

It  has  been  suggested  that  VLJs  will  cause  or  exacerbate  en  route  traffic  conges-
tion,  either  by  their  growing  numbers  or  because  of  their  somewhat  slower  (mach 
.64) cruise speeds. This is certainly not the case in the near to midterm. 

There  is  ample  available  en  route  airspace  to  accommodate  new  aircraft,  even 
with  today’s  antiquated  ATC  system.  Commercial  jet  traffic  will  continue  to  domi-
nate  in  the  higher  altitudes.  VLJ  operations  will  generally  be  on  shorter  routes 
under  600  statute  miles  and  mainly  at  altitudes  below  those  of  longer-range  com-
mercial operations. 

Sometimes, especially on longer stage lengths, VLJs will want or need to operate 
at  the  higher  altitudes,  but  even  then  VLJs  will  not  disrupt  en  route  traffic  flows, 
even  though  they  cruise  at  0.64  mach,  slightly  slower  than  commercial  airliners. 
Current  Flight  Management  System  (FMS)  technology  already  enables  faster  mov-
ing  aircraft  to  establish  offset  tracks  so  as  to  pass  slower  aircraft  en  route.  And  in 
the near future, the addition of high altitude ‘‘tubes’’ with passing lanes should en-
hance that capability. 
The General Question of VLJ Speed Compatibility—Terminal and En Route 

In  the  ongoing  debate  about  the  impact  of  VLJ  operations,  the  question  of  VLJ 
speed  compatibility  has  been  raised  frequently.  In  large  measure,  this  is  a  red  her-
ring.  The  commercial  and  business  fleets  of  today  operate  at  a  variety  of  climb, 
cruise,  descent,  and  approach  speeds,  based  not  just  on  aircraft  type,  weight,  and 
performance  differences  but  also  on  variations  in  company  policies.  Even  with  to-
day’s  1950s  ATC  technology,  controllers  are  able  to  integrate  traffic  of  varying 
speeds quite efficiently, so VLJs will add no significant complexity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Air Traffic Operations—Mid- to Long-Term VLJ Impacts 

32 

We have discussed the near- to mid-term integration of Very Light Jets into NAS 
operations and concluded that their impact will be minimal. It’s time to take on the 
larger  question—will  the  VLJ  prove  to  be  a  ‘‘disruptive  technology’’  in  the  mid-  to 
long-term? 

Often  the  term  ‘‘disruptive  technology’’  seems  to  have  mostly  negative  connota-
tions, perhaps due to the havoc such technology can sometimes create in an industry 
or  institution  that  fails  to  recognize  and  adapt  to  change.  Yet  ‘‘disruptive  tech-
nology’’ is generally a positive thing in the longer term and is accompanied by peri-
ods  of  exciting  growth.  Such  periods  of  innovation  and  growth  should  be  expected 
and  encouraged,  if  our  goal  is  for  the  U.S.  economy  and  domestic  productivity  to 
continue to grow. 

VLJ  technology  could  have  this  kind  of  substantial  positive  economic  impact  and 
could emerge as a ‘‘disruptive technology,’’ but the results may also create increased 
demand for ATC and airport services: 

• By bringing personal and on-demand travel within the reach of the small busi-
ness  and  middle  class  user,  the  VLJ  may  usher  in  a  new  paradigm  of  personal 
travel  freedom  and  mobility.  This  could  result  in  substantial,  as  yet  unantici-
pated, increases in future travelers and NAS operations, with increased conges-
tion in en route airspace; 
• By  providing  a  jet  aircraft  tailored  to  serve  smaller  airports  and  markets,  the 
VLJ  can  broaden  airport  usage  in  the  NAS  to  include  many  more  currently 
under-served airports. This could mean increased demand for terminal services 
at those airports; 
• By  answering  the  need  for  personal  and  on-demand  point-to-point  air  service, 
driven by user needs, the VLJ can enhance domestic productivity and economic 
activity,  while  linking  smaller  markets  directly  to  the  domestic  and  global 
economies. This could generate increased needs for VLJ cargo operations. 
• By  including  a  fully  integrated  aircraft  and  avionics  platform,  the  VLJ  can  as-
sume  a  leadership  role  in  advancing  the  JPDO  NGATS,  by  assuring  that  VLJs 
will be full and efficient participants in the NGATS of tomorrow. 

All this new activity could add to the scope of the overall NAS congestion problem, 
which is largely focused on hub airports. A convergence with possible new terminal 
demand  at  VLJ  airports,  plus  increased  en  route  operations,  could  be  the  makings 
of an ATC ‘‘Perfect Storm’’ of gridlock. 
The Solution—Demand Management or Capacity Enhancement 

Regrettably,  instead  of  concentrating  our  collective  efforts  on  capacity  enhance-
ment and NGATS, there are those who favor demand management solutions. In par-
ticular,  the  idea  of  user  fees  or  other  surcharges  for  Regional  Jets  has  re-emerged 
for VLJs. This is an unfortunate and distracting debate. 

Demand management is a flawed concept that constrains innovation and economic 
activity,  while  distorting  market  forces.  If  a  new  era  of  personal  travel  options  is 
possible,  we  should  do  everything  possible  to  encourage  the  development  of  an 
NGATS  in  which  traditional  air  carrier  services  can  operate  in  harmony  with  per-
sonal air vehicles such as VLJs. We should not try to constrain or inhibit innovation 
by disincentives such as demand management. 

Instead  of  wasting  time  considering  ways  to  generate  higher  fees  in  support  of 
current  inefficient,  antiquated  systems,  shouldn’t  we  tackle  the  real  problem?  Isn’t 
it  time  for  the  FAA,  Congress,  and  industry  to  make  jointly  a  full  commitment  to 
a Next Generation Air Traffic System? 
Conclusion 

Very Light Jet technology may represent the beginning of a new and exciting era 
of  increased  personal  and  on  demand  travel.  If  the  business  model  succeeds,  VLJ 
technology  can  broaden  usage  of  the  NAS  and  its  under-served  airports,  and  it  can 
boost  the  economies  of  small  to  medium  sized  communities,  which  today  may  lack 
adequate point-to-point connections to domestic and global market places. 

Such  a  potential  revolution  in  personal  travel  can  have  significant  beneficial  ef-
fects  on  domestic  productivity  and  economic  growth,  but  ‘‘disruptive  technologies’’ 
sometimes  leave  casualties  in  their  wake,  often  because  the  institutions  and  indus-
tries  affected  either  fail  to  recognize  the  paradigm  shift  or  else  refuse  to  deal  with 
it. 

Time  is  growing  short.  FAA,  Congress,  and  industry  should  recommit  to  forging 
with  all  possible  speed  the  partnership  necessary  to  assure  timely  transformation 
of our antiquated air traffic management system into the scalable, network-enabled 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

system  of  systems  required  to  satisfy  tomorrow’s  demand,  and  in  so  doing  assure 
continuing U.S. economic growth and opportunity. 

Senator BURNS. We thank you. 
And  now  we  hear  from  Mr.  Edward  Iacobucci,  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer  of  DayJet  Corporation,  down  in  Delray, 
Florida. Thank you very much for coming. 

STATEMENT OF EDWARD E. IACOBUCCI, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

DAYJET CORPORATION 

Mr.  IACOBUCCI.  Thank  you.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Burns, 
Senator  Rockefeller,  and  other  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  want 
to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  here  to  you—with  you 
today on the topic of VLJs, and specifically the work that my com-
pany  has  been  doing  in  conjunction  with  the  FAA,  the  JPDO, 
NASA,  TSA,  and  our  partners,  Eclipse  Aviation,  over  the  past  3 
years. 

The  mission  of  our  company  is  to  develop  and  deploy  what  we 
consider to be the world’s first commercial—what we call ‘‘per-seat, 
on-demand’’  service,  as  opposed  to  air-taxi.  It’s  a  seat-oriented  on- 
demand  system.  It’s  a  regional  air  transportation  system,  and  it’s 
exclusively deployed between secondary markets, using community 
airports. 

The Jet Age in the United States has delivered a very affordable 
transportation  methodology.  It’s  ushered  in  a  broadbased  economic 
opportunity,  and  it’s  done  so  by  connecting  major  cities  in  the— 
over  the  past  years.  However,  despite  that,  trips  of  600  miles  or 
less  remain—have  been,  and  remain,  a  frustrating  experience  and 
very  inefficient  for  millions  of  travelers.  According  to  DOT  statis-
tics,  there  were  29  percent  fewer  scheduled  flights  less  than  500 
miles in length in 2005 than in 2000—only a 5-year period, 29-per-
cent  reduction.  While  scheduled  flights  at  small  regional  airports 
still  exist,  they  dropped,  for  the  same  period,  by  over  17  percent. 
For  many  years—in  fact,  for  decades—broadbased  subsidies  and 
programs  have  failed  to  bring  self-supporting  commercial  air  serv-
ice  to  the  secondary  communities  of  our  country.  Even  in  the  case 
where air flights were available, typically it involves multiple steps 
with long layovers, unpredictable layovers through a large hub, and 
it  costs  time  and  money,  and,  as  a  consequence,  a  lot  of  regional 
travelers  have  taken  to  driving.  In  fact,  BTS  travelers  survey— 
here,  let  me  make  sure  I  quote  it  properly—is  136  million  of  the 
192  million  business  trips  identified  in  that  survey  in  2003  were 
spent driving to regional meetings 100 to 750 miles away. 

As I said, our corporate mission is to make direct on-demand air 
transportation  between  secondary  markets  a  commercial  reality. 
Our  passengers  will  enjoy  safe  and  secure  transportation  to  these 
markets  and  produce  economic  development  opportunities  at—in 
those markets. 

For  example,  earlier  this  year,  DayJet  announced  our  first  five 
locations.  We’ve  actually  announced  our  southeast  region  as  our 
first region; and the first five locations, within that region. 

The VLJs themselves are going to enable new travel options and, 
to  the  cost  point,  allow  us  to  aggregate  passengers  in  ways  that 
haven’t  been  done  before.  Our  marketing  studies,  focus  groups, 
agent-based  technology  shows  us  that  most  of  the  travelers  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

come off the highway. Our optimization systems show us that these 
services can be deployed at scale on a profitable basis. 

We  will  connect  smaller  communities,  metropolitan  exurbs,  and 
rural  areas  with  point-to-point  service,  strictly  point-to-point  serv-
ice. Our missions are all 100 to 600 miles. And seldom will we ever 
have to enter Class B airspace. 

As  was  mentioned  before,  all  our  flights  are  between—some-
where  between  18,000  and  30,000  feet,  and  we  plan  to  deploy  the 
Eclipse 500 using two-person crews. Despite the fact that we could 
do it with one, we’re going to do it with two, as part of our business 
model. 

The  training  is  done  in  conjunction  with  Eclipse—work  that 
we’re doing with Eclipse, United Airlines. And the training is going 
to  be  done  to  standards  that  are  well  beyond  the  typical  standard 
that you would see in FAR 135 operations. 

As far as security goes, we will plan to implement the 12–5 rule. 
Again,  even  though  the  aircraft  is  only  5700  pounds,  we  will  be 
putting  in  place  all  the  rules  that  are  in  place  today  for  12,500- 
pound  aircraft.  Our  pilots,  maintenance  personnel,  will  have  10- 
year  background  checks.  Parking  lots  are  going  to  be  monitored— 
ramps, fence, passengers cleared through TSA lists and escorted to 
and from the airplanes. 

I  could  talk  quite  a  bit  more  about  the  work  that  we’ve  been 
doing with the air traffic control and NASA, in terms of developing 
some of the new technologies within our network as we grow it. I’m 
going to run out of time, so that I’m—so that I’ll leave that for the 
questions and answers. The topics have been covered. 

But,  in  short,  we  believe  that  the  network-enabled  operations 
that  we’re  developing  view  DayJet  as  a  network  of  airplanes,  not 
individual airplanes, that are all managed by a system. That inno-
vation  and  the  innovative  business  model  will  bring  new  business 
to  communities,  new  transportation  options,  and  ultimately  eco-
nomic growth. 

Thank you so much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Iacobucci follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EDWARD E. IACOBUCCI, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

DAYJET CORPORATION 

Good  morning  Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Rockefeller,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee. Thank you for the opportunity to testify today on the topic of very light 
jets (VLJs) and the work we are doing together with the Federal Aviation Adminis-
tration  (FAA),  the  Joint  Planning  and  Development  Office  (JPDO),  National  Aero-
nautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA),  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA)  and  Eclipse  Aviation  to  develop  and  deploy  the  world’s  first  commercial  ‘‘per 
seat—on  demand’’  regional  air  transportation  service  between  secondary  commu-
nities using community airports. 

In the United States the jet age has delivered safe, affordable transportation ush-
ering  in  broad  based  economic  opportunity  by  connecting  major  cities.  Yet  trips  of 
600 miles or less remain frustrating and inefficient for millions of travelers. Accord-
ing  to  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  there  were  29  percent  fewer  sched-
uled  flights  less  than  500  miles  in  2005  than  in  2000,  while  scheduled  flights  at 
small regional airports dropped 17 percent during the same period. For decades, de-
spite  concerted  effort,  a  variety  of  subsidies  and  programs  have  failed  to  bring 
broad-based,  sustainable,  self-supporting  commercial  air  service  to  secondary  com-
munities and rural areas of the Nation. Even in the case where flights are available, 
multiple  legs  must  be  flown  through  a  hub  airport  costing  time  and  money.  Often 
regional  trips  require  a  forced  overnight  stay  due  to  flight  scheduling.  As  a  result, 
136  million  of  the  192  million  business  trips  identified  in  the  2003  BTS  Business 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Travelers  Survey  were  spent  driving  endless  hours  to  regional  meetings  100  to  750 
miles away. 

DayJet’s corporate mission is to make direct on-demand jet air transportation be-
tween secondary markets a commercial reality. DayJet passengers will enjoy afford-
able,  safe  and  secure  air  transportation  between  these  markets  and  our  air  trans-
portation  service  will  expand  local  economic  development  opportunities  in  the  com-
munities  we  serve.  Earlier  this  year  DayJet  announced  our  initial  service  area  in 
the  southeastern  region  including  Florida,  Georgia,  Alabama,  Mississippi,  North 
Carolina, South Carolina and Tennessee. 

VLJs enable new travel options. DayJet’s new ‘‘per seat, on-demand’’ * service low-
ers  the  cost  for  individual  travelers  traveling  on  a  VLJ  by  aggregating  other  pas-
sengers  on  the  aircraft  (for  a  total  of  up  to  three  (3)  passengers  per  flight)  even  as 
we  manage  all  of  the  factors  of  logistics  and  costs  of  providing  the  air  service.  Our 
marketing  studies,  focus  groups  and  agent-based  demand  generation  technology 
shows  us  that  most  of  our  travelers  come  off  the  highway.  Our  Advanced  System 
Technology for Real Time Operations (ASTRO) makes it possible to establish a prof-
itable  business  to  serve  customers  with  the  highest  levels  of  safety,  security  and  a 
great customer experience. 

DayJet  will  connect  smaller  communities,  metropolitan  exurbs  and  rural  areas 
with  a  point-to-point  service.  With  missions  in  the  100  to  600  statute  mile  range 
our short flights will avoid entering Class B air space. Instead we will fly in under- 
utilized air space at flight levels typically in the 18,000 ft to 30,000 ft range. DayJet 
plans to fly our Eclipse 500 jets using a two-person crew meaning we will train and 
fly with two pilots. Our business plan supports this level of personnel. We will train 
our flight crews in a program that is similar to that of a traditional airline. Eclipse 
Aviation in cooperation with United Airlines will train our pilots using the most up- 
to-date methods and equipment including flight simulation. As a FAA FAR 135 cer-
tificated operator we choose to train our pilots and maintenance personnel at a level 
that  goes  above  and  beyond  minimal  requirements.  We  do  the  same  when  it  comes 
to security. 

DayJet  will  follow  the  TSA  12–5  rule  for  security,  setting  a  higher  standard  for 
an  aircraft  in  this  weight  class  beyond  today’s  TSA  requirements.  Our  pilots  and 
maintenance  personnel  will  have  10  year  background  checks,  our  parking  lots  will 
be  monitored,  ramps  will  be  fenced  and  all  passengers  will  be  escorted  to  and  from 
our  aircraft.  While  this  is  not  required  by  TSA  at  this  time  and  many  community 
airports  do  not  have  security  practices,  at  DayJet  we  believe  security  and  safety 
must  be  nurtured  and  lived  everyday.  This  is  why  our  training,  best  practices  and 
corporate culture are founded upon of safety, security and accountability. 

DayJet’s  investments  in  next  generation  technology  are  a  factor  driving  mod-
ernization of the National Air System (NAS). Working in partnership with the FAA 
over the past 3 years and leveraging technical research and development by NASA, 
we have identified key areas in which operational best practices combined with new 
technology  will  be  implemented.  These  implementations  on  our  aircraft  and  in  our 
training,  maximize  safety  and  operational  availability  while  minimizing  our  impact 
on  workloads  for  air  traffic  control  (ATC).  Our  investments  in  on-board  technology 
and  in  training  will  allow  DayJet  to  use  new  Required  Navigation  Performance 
(RNP)  routes  and  Wide  Area  Augmentation  System  (WAAS)  lateral  precision 
vertical  (LPV)  approaches.  We  will  equip  our  fleet  with  Automatic  Dependent  Sur-
veillance  Broadcast  (ADS–DB)  transponders  allowing  for  much  improved  ground- 
based  surveillance.  As  ‘‘ADS–B  in’’  capability  becomes  available,  we  expect  to  reap 
the benefits of reduced minimum separations and much improved situational aware-
ness.  These  innovations  result  in  lower  costs  for  all  parties  while  enhancing  safety 
through greater flight precision in the utilization of air space and in a greater vari-
ety of weather—all meaningful near term advantages of modernization. 

In  the  longer  term  our  active  participation  on  the  JPDO’s  Agile  Airspace  Inte-
grated  Product  Team  (Agile  IPT)  provides  an  appropriate  dialogue  mechanism  for 
technical  input  and  the  sharing  of  information  for  future  planning  purposes.  As  a 
business  person  with  an  in-depth  understanding  of  digital  technology,  who  played 
a role in shaping the information networked age over the past two decades, I believe 
that  the  JPDO’s  development  of  the  Concept  of  Operations  and  the  Enterprise  Ar-
chitecture  working  toward  Network-Enabled  Operations  (NEO)  is  essential  to  real-
ize the vision of a scaleable network-centric automated NAS model. 

Innovation comes from setting standards and encouraging entrepreneurs to invest 
in  the  realization  and  commercialization  of  the  vision.  We  saw  this  in  the  applica-
tion  of  digital  technology  in  telecommunications,  the  Internet  and  Hi-Definition 

* The  report  ‘‘Per  Seat,  On-Demand  Jet  Services—How  to  Keep  Air  Transportation  Moving  at 

the Speed of Business’’ has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

broadcasting. Many innovations come from small companies and start-ups with new 
approaches  and  ideas.  In  aviation  we  need  to  foster  similar  innovation  by  encour-
aging new entrants while accommodating an evolutionary pathway for legacy stake-
holders in their move to modernize. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  testimony.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any 

questions the Committee may have. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much for your testimony. 
We  have  Mr.  Jack  Pelton  here  now,  Chief  Executive  Officer, 

Cessna Aircraft Company, from Sedgwick County, Kansas. 
STATEMENT OF JACK J. PELTON, CHAIRMAN, 

GENERAL AVIATION MANUFACTURERS ASSOCIATION; 

CHAIRMAN, PRESIDENT, AND CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, 

CESSNA AIRCRAFT COMPANY 

Mr.  PELTON.  Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and  Mem-
bers  of  the  Subcommittee,  my  name  is  Jack  Pelton.  I  join  you  this 
morning  in  a  dual  capacity  of  Chairman  of  the  General  Aviation 
Manufacturers Association, or GAMA, and as Chairman, President, 
and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  Cessna  Aircraft  Company.  Thank 
you for the invitation to join you and offer testimony on the devel-
opment  of  what  has  become  known  to  be  called  very  light  jets,  or 
VLJs. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  ask  that  my  full  statement  be  in-

cluded in the—for the record. 

Senator BURNS. Without objection, it sure will. And all of your— 

all of the statements will be included. 

Mr.  PELTON.  Since  its  founding  in  1927,  Cessna  has  introduced, 
participated  in,  or  witnessed  firsthand  every  major  innovation  in 
aviation.  From  radials  to  pistons  to  jets,  Cessna  built  half  of  the 
airplanes in the world today and trained the majority of the world’s 
pilots.  It’s  with  that  background  that  I  join  you  today  to  address 
the development of VLJs. 

The  introduction  of  ‘‘very  light  jets,’’  a  term  that  was  defined  by 
the  industry  as  jet-powered  aircraft  with  a  maximum  takeoff 
weight of 10,000 pounds or less, is merely another step in the evo-
lutionary cycle of general aviation, or GA, aircraft development. Al-
though  the  significance  of  the  arrival  of  the  VLJs  will  be  best  as-
sessed after several years of experience, this is an exciting time for 
the general aviation community. 

I believe that soon the traveling public will also realize how VLJs 

can fulfill an unmet need for air transportation. 

Mr.  Chairman,  in  recent  months,  some  have  expressed  concern 
regarding  the  effects  of  the  introduction  of  VLJs  on  the  National 
Airspace System. Although I do see VLJs as an exciting expansion 
of  the  GA  market,  there  are  at  least  five  specific  reasons  why  I 
strongly disagree with some of the opinions that I’ve heard. 

First, very light jets will not darken the skies. Based on the fore-
casts made in the development of Cessna’s own entry into this sec-
tor, the Citation Mustang, fears of traffic congestion are unfounded 
and  unwarranted.  Cessna’s  been  manufacturing  jets  since  1971. 
Today,  our  Citation  fleet  is  the  largest  business  jet  fleet  in  the 
world, numbering around 4,500 aircraft, and it took us 35 years to 
put  those  jets  into  our  customers’  hands.  Based  on  my  experience, 
I  believe  general  aviation  will  see  steady  and  linear,  not  expo-
nential,  growth.  Cessna  believes  that  the  VLJ  market  will  develop 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

like  every  other  turbine-powered  GA  aircraft,  in  an  evolutionary, 
rather than revolutionary, way. 

Second, VLJs will not place an undue burden on the Nation’s air 
traffic  control  system.  Concerns  about  integrating  VLJ  operation 
with  other  aircraft  flying  in  the  National  Airspace  System  have 
been  greatly  exaggerated.  Currently,  the  air  traffic  control  system 
accommodates  a  variety  of  airplane  types,  each  with  a  different 
speed  and  performance  capability.  VLJs  will  operate  within  the 
speed  envelop  of  a  broad  spectrum  of  aircraft  that  are  operated 
today by the airline fleet, and will be able to coexist with these air-
craft. 

Third,  VLJs  will  not  increase  congestion  at  the  Nation’s  busiest 
airports.  At  the  Operational  Evolution  Plan,  35  airports  comprised 
mainly  of  airline  hubs  and  where  a  majority  of  the  FAA  expendi-
tures  are  made,  GA  currently  accounts  for  less  than  6  percent  of 
the total operations. We have no reason to believe that GA’s usage 
of these airports will change with the introduction of VLJs. In fact, 
VLJ operators have a powerful incentive to avoid the traffic conges-
tion and delays found at these airline-dominated airports. In short, 
Cessna  sees  the  introduction  of  VLJs  at  a  rate  that  will  permit 
them  to  be  transparently  and  smoothly  absorbed  into  the  system. 
Fourth, VLJ pilots will be trained to the same standards as com-
mercial  pilots.  To  obtain  a  type  rating  in  a  very  light  jet,  a  pilot 
will  have  to  go  through  FAA-approved  training,  the  same  that’s 
mandated  for  today’s  air-carrier  and  corporate  pilots.  Manufactur-
ers  have  selected  their  training  partners,  United  Airlines  and 
FlightSafety,  both  worldwide  leaders  in  pilot  training  recognized 
for  their  leadership  and  safety.  These  pilots,  who  will  operate  in 
the  very  light  jet  operations  or  on-demand  charter,  will  also  meet 
the  training,  testing,  and  currency  standards  specified  and  over-
seen  by  the  FAA.  These  type-rating  requirements  and  proficiency 
standards have been established to ensure competent pilots operate 
airplanes in private and commercial operations. 

Fifth, VLJ operations will pay taxes into the Airport and Airways 
Trust  Fund  in  the  same  manner  as  all  other  aircraft  operators, 
based on the operation. 

Mr. Chairman, the introduction of very light jets into the market 
is an exciting time for general aviation. The General Aviation Man-
ufacturers  Association,  Cessna,  and  all  of  our  industry  partners 
look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  your  colleagues  to  ensure 
seamless  integration  of  the  VLJ  into  the  United  States  aircraft 
fleet. 

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  this 

morning, and I look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Pelton follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACK J.  PELTON,  CHAIRMAN,  GENERAL AVIATION 
MANUFACTURERS ASSOCIATION;  CHAIRMAN,  PRESIDENT,  AND CHIEF EXECUTIVE 
OFFICER, CESSNA AIRCRAFT COMPANY 
Chairman  Burns,  Senator  Rockefeller  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my 
name  is  Jack  Pelton  and  I  join  you  this  morning  in  the  dual  capacity  of  Chairman 
of  the  General  Aviation  Manufacturers  Association  (GAMA)  and  as  Chairman, 
President and Chief Executive Officer of Cessna Aircraft Company. I am pleased to 
appear  before  you  to  discuss  the  unique  and  growing  contribution  general  aviation 
(GA)  makes  to  our  Nation’s  economy  and  air  transportation  system.  At  large,  me-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

dium  and  small  sized  airports  across  the  country,  general  aviation  operations  sup-
plement  and  complement  the  air  transportation  services  provided  by  our  partners 
in  air  transportation—scheduled  airlines.  Without  general  aviation  services,  thou-
sands  of  communities,  especially  those  in  remote  or  rural  areas,  could  not  realize 
the economic benefits of air transportation. 
General Aviation Development 

Not  many  years  ago,  the  existence  of  general  aviation  was  in  doubt.  If  the  value 
of  GA  had  not  been  recognized,  its  role  in  the  current  air  transportation  system 
would have been significantly diminished. If we had failed to act then, the traveling 
public  would  be  suffering  now.  This  Subcommittee  played  a  significant  role  in  re-
solving  those  threats,  so  I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  update  the  Sub-
committee  on  the  many  positive  outcomes  of  your  past  actions.  I  believe  they  also 
provide  a  conceptual  framework  for  resolving  some  of  the  issues  we  are  discussing 
today. 

In  1994,  recognizing  the  unique  and  essential  contribution  GA  makes  to  the  Na-
tion’s  air  transportation  system,  Congress  enacted  the  General  Aviation  Revitaliza-
tion  Act  (GARA).  GARA  instituted  a  Federal,  18-year  statute  of  repose  for  general 
aviation  products,  removing  an  impediment  that  had  caused  some  to  conclude  that 
the GA industry was ‘‘dead.’’ Subsequent to GARA’s enactment, the number of frivo-
lous lawsuits filed against GA manufacturers dropped dramatically. 

During  the  GARA  debates,  the  General  Aviation  Manufacturers  Association 
(GAMA) predicted that if the legislation was enacted, former GA airplane manufac-
turers  would  return  to  the  market,  new  manufactures  would  emerge  and  advanced 
GA products would once again be widely available. The public, especially small com-
munities,  would  benefit  from  an  improved  margin  of  safety,  enhanced  economic 
growth  and  a  more  effective  air  transportation  system.  I  am  pleased  to  note  that 
the  public  benefits  predicted  by  GAMA  in  1994  have  more  than  materialized  and 
there are still more to come. 

The growing demand for general aviation airplanes reflects the increased need for 
air  transportation,  which  is  driven  by  a  growing  economy.  No  single  segment  of 
aviation can fulfill this country’s transportation needs. Major airlines serve only 150 
U.S.  airports,  regional  airlines  serve  an  additional  300,  while  general  aviation  is 
still the only means of air transportation at more than 5,000 public-use airports and 
thousands of private-use airports. It’s easy to understand why the economic benefits 
from general aviation are significant. 

A  recent  economic  study  by  some  of  the  country’s  most  knowledgeable  transpor-
tation  economists  quantified  the  economic  value  of  general  aviation  to  the  national 
economy,  as  well  as  each  state.  GA  contributes  more  than  $150  billion  to  U.S.  eco-
nomic output, and directly or indirectly, employs more than 1,265,000 people whose 
collective  earnings  exceed  $53  billion.  I  have  attached  a  state-by-state  summary  of 
this analysis to my statement and the entire study is available on GAMA’s website 
(www.gama.aero). 
General Aviation Safety 

While  economic  benefits  are  very  important,  our  highest  priority  is  improving 
GA’s  margin  of  safety.  Recent  FAA  statistics  indicate  that,  at  the  current  rate,  the 
number of fatal general aviation accidents will hit an all-time low in 2006. 

Safety improvements have been enabled by four main factors: 
• Development  of  innovative  designs  and  production  processes  for  airplanes,  en-
gines,  avionics  and  other  components,  thereby  enhancing  the  reliability,  per-
formance and efficiency of GA operations. 
• Development  of  affordable  avionics  with  advanced  capabilities,  sized  for  instal-
lation in even the smallest GA airplane, thereby allowing every type of GA air-
plane to fully benefit from available communication, navigation and surveillance 
services, and to interface seamlessly into the air traffic control system. 
• Introduction  of  integrated,  digital  cockpits  and  electronic  displays,  thereby  im-
• Introduction of more effective and efficient training curricula for both pilots and 
maintenance technicians, and growing use of advanced-technology training sim-
ulators and devices for pilot training. 

proving a pilot’s situational awareness while reducing human error. 

The  integrated,  digital  cockpits  available  on  GA  airplanes  today  rival  any  equip-
ment installed on commercial airliners. GA manufacturers and pilots recognized the 
safety benefits of this technology so quickly that ‘‘all-glass’’ cockpits are now stand-
ard  equipment  on  almost  all  new  GA  airplanes  capable  of  flying  under  instrument 
flight rules (IFR). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Very Light Jets 

The  introduction  of  very  light  jets  (VLJs),  a  term  defined  by  industry  as  jet  pow-
ered  aircraft  with  a  maximum  take  off  weight  of  10,000  pounds  or  less,  is  merely 
another step in the evolutionary cycle of GA aircraft development. Although the sig-
nificance  of  the  arrival  of  VLJs  will  be  best  assessed  after  several  years  of  experi-
ence,  this  is  an  exciting  time  for  the  general  aviation  community.  I  believe  that 
soon, the traveling public will also fully realize how VLJs can fulfill an unmet need 
for air transportation. 

As  airplanes  enter  service,  GAMA  will  continue  to  be  a  strong  advocate  for  GA 
safety risk management. GAMA will work closely with current and future manufac-
turers, operators, training providers, aviation advocacy groups, and appropriate rep-
resentatives  from  the  FAA,  including  the  Air  Traffic  Organization,  to  ensure  the 
safe  operation  of  very  light  jets.  Our  purpose  will  be  to  help  collect,  assimilate  and 
distribute  any  reported  incidents  or  other  occurrences  related  to  the  continued  air-
worthiness  and  operation  of  VLJs.  In  line  with  FAA’s  work  on  safety  risk  manage-
ment to proactively manage the safe operation of all airplanes in the NAS, the data 
available  about  very  light  jet  operations  will  exceed  that  of  any  previous  airplane 
type. This will help us ensure safe operation, and enable us to make real time modi-
fications to training programs and target operator oversight from the FAA. 
The Future and Impact of Very Light Jets 

In  recent  months  some  have  expressed  concern  regarding  the  effects  of  the  intro-
duction  of  VLJs  on  the  National  Airspace  System.  Although  I  do  see  VLJs  as  an 
exciting expansion of the GA market, there are a number of reasons why I strongly 
disagree with some of the opinions I have heard. 
VLJs Will Not ‘‘Darken the Skies’’ 

Based  on  the  forecasts  made  in  the  development  of  Cessna’s  own  entry  into  this 
sector,  the  Citation  Mustang,  fears  of  traffic  congestion  are  unfounded  and  unwar-
ranted. 

Cessna  has  been  manufacturing  jets  since  1971.  Today,  our  Citation  fleet  is  the 
largest  business-jet  fleet  in  the  world,  numbering  around  4,500  aircraft  and  it  took 
us  35  years  to  put  those  jets  into  our  customers’  hands.  Based  on  this  experience, 
I believe general aviation will see steady and linear, not exponential, growth. 

Cessna believes that the VLJ market will develop like that of every other turbine 

powered GA aircraft, in an evolutionary, rather than revolutionary way. 
VLJs Will Not Place an Undue Burden on the Air Traffic Control System 

VLJ  operations  will  not  place  an  undue  burden  on  the  air  traffic  control  system 
today  or  in  the  future.  In  addition,  VLJ  operations  will  not  increase  operational 
delays for other operators. 

Concerns  about  integrating  VLJ  operations  with  other  aircraft  flying  in  the  Na-
tional  Airspace  System  (NAS)  have  been  greatly  exaggerated.  Currently,  the  air 
traffic control system accommodates a variety of airplane types, each with different 
speed and performance capabilities. VLJs, which operate within the speed envelopes 
of the broad spectrum of aircraft operated by the airline fleet, will be able to coexist 
with these aircraft. 

FAA  Administrator  Marion  Blakey  apparently  agrees.  In  a  July  28,  2006  feature 
on  very  light  jets,  following  the  provisional  certification  of  the  Eclipse  500,  the  Ad-
ministrator  told  NBC  Nightly  News,  ‘‘I  think  the  people  who  are  anticipating  con-
gestion problems way up at high altitudes are probably anticipating a problem that 
we don’t necessarily expect to have.’’ 
VLJs Will Not Increase Congestion at Operational Evolution Plan Airports 

At the Operational Evolution Plan (OEP) 35 airports, comprised mainly of airline 
hubs  and  where  a  majority  of  FAA  expenditures  are  made,  GA  currently  accounts 
for  less  than  6  percent  of  total  operations.  We  have  no  reason  to  believe  that  GA’s 
usage  of  these  airports  will  change  with  the  introduction  of  the  VLJ.  In  fact,  VLJ 
operators have a powerful incentive to avoid the traffic congestion and delays found 
at  these  airports,  and  they  will  have  several  ways  to  do  so.  The  flexible  nature  of 
a GA operation, and the operational characteristics of a VLJ, make it relatively easy 
for operators to avoid congestion and delay. 

VLJs  can  fly  fuel-efficient  profiles  using  altitudes  both  above  and  below  those 
typically  used  by  airlines.  Unlike  larger  aircraft,  the  operating  costs  for  VLJs  will 
not significantly increase when the aircraft is flown at less-than-optimum altitudes. 
Also,  unlike  scheduled  operations,  the  departure  time  for  a  VLJ  operation  can  be 
easily  adjusted  to  accommodate  current  congestion  in  the  ATC  system,  or  current 
weather conditions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

VLJ Operators Will Pay Their Fair Share 

VLJ  operators  will  pay  into  the  Airport  and  Airways  Trust  Fund  (AATF)  in  the 

same way as all other aircraft operators, based on the operation. 
VLJs Will Provide Service to Many Underutilized and Neglected Markets 

Due  to  their  unique  operating  characteristics,  VLJs  will  be  able  to  provide  com-
mercial  service  to  communities  currently  ignored  by  the  airlines.  Today,  most  GA 
operations  occur  at  airports  with  excess  capacity.  It  is  preposterous  to  think  that 
VLJ  operators  will  not  follow  suit,  as  doing  so  would  alleviate  the  primary  benefit 
of  owning  and  operating  your  own  personal  airplane:  time  savings  and  flexibility. 
VLJ Pilots Will be Trained to Standards Applicable to Commercial Pilots 

To  obtain  a  type  rating  in  a  very  light  jet,  a  pilot  will  have  to  go  through  FAA 
approved  training,  the  same  as  that  mandated  for  today’s  air  carrier  and  corporate 
pilots.  Manufacturers  have  selected  their  training  providers—United  Airlines  and 
FlightSafety  International—both  worldwide  leaders  in  pilot  training,  recognized  for 
their leadership in safety. Those pilots who will operate a very light jet for commer-
cial  purposes,  such  as  an  air  taxi  operation  or  on-demand  charter,  will  also  meet 
the  training,  testing,  and  currency  standards  specified  and  overseen  by  the  FAA’s 
principal  operations  inspectors  and  at  the  discretion  of  the  FAA  Administrator. 
These  type  rating  requirements  and  proficiency  standards  have  been  established  to 
ensure  competent  pilots  operate  airplanes  in  both  private  and  commercial  oper-
ations. 
The Delivery of VLJs to Market Will Take Place Over Time 

There  is  simply  no  large  parking  lot  full  of  VLJs  poised  to  soar  into  America’s 
skies  in  the  coming  days  and  weeks.  In  fact,  as  we  speak,  there  are  less  than  two 
dozen  VLJs  flying  (including  prototypes).  Regardless  of  consumer  demand  for  these 
aircraft,  it  will  take  significant  time  for  industry  to  produce,  flight  test  and  deliver 
aircraft to customers. 
Summary 

The development and introduction of VLJs should be lauded as a significant tech-
nical  achievement  by  U.S.  manufacturers.  GA  makes  a  unique  contribution  to  the 
air  transportation  system  and  generates  significant  benefits  to  the  U.S.  economy. 
The introduction of new technology, such as the VLJ, further expands and enhances 
GA’s contribution to the air transportation system. 

GA  operators  and  manufacturers  continue  to  give  safety  the  highest  priority.  Ad-
vanced technologies are an essential precursor to innovative airplane designs. Inno-
vative designs enhance the margin of safety and efficiency of GA operations. 

VLJs  will  operate  under  the  same  pilot  training  standards  required  for  all  U.S. 

jet pilots. 

Based  on  the  most  likely  estimate  of  VLJs  to  be  delivered  in  the  next  10  years, 
for the foreseeable future VLJ operations will not contribute to air traffic delays suf-
fered  by  airlines.  Most  GA  airplane  operators,  including  those  that  will  operate 
VLJs, will continue to avoid congested airspace and airports in order to make their 
movements as quick and efficient as possible. 

The  VLJ’s  impact  on  both  the  National  Airspace  System  and  the  GA  market  has 
been  greatly  exaggerated  on  a  number  of  fronts.  The  VLJ  will  develop  in  a  similar 
fashion to other general aviation aircraft, as a tide, rather than tidal wave. 

VLJ operators will pay their fair share for use of the NAS through a combination 

of ticket and fuel taxes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

APPENDIX B 

Summary of Results 

Table B1—State Impacts—Total value and per capita, 2005 

State 

($ millions) 

Per Capita  State 

($ millions) 

Per Capita 

Alabama 
Alaska 
Arizona 
Arkansas 
California 
Colorado 
Connecticut 
Delaware 
District of Columbia 
Florida 
Georgia 
Hawaii 
Idaho 
Illinois 
Indiana 
Iowa 
Kansas 
Kentucky 
Louisiana 
Maine 
Maryland 
Massachusetts 
Michigan 
Minnesota 
Mississippi 
Missouri 

$1,703 
$400 
$2,766 
$1,033 
$18,202 
$2,141 
$2,409 
$577 
$483 
$7,520 
$8,751 
$412 
$581 
$6,040 
$3,352 
$1,413 
$7,072 
$1,746 
$2,059 
$521 
$2,085 
$4,046 
$4,138 
$2,976 
$860 
$2,498 

$370  Montana 
$571  Nebraska 
$529  Nevada 
$376  New Hampshire 
$529  New Jersey 
$479  New Mexico 
$726  New York 
$722  North Carolina 
$914  North Dakota 
$462  Ohio 

$1,040  Oklahoma 

$307  Oregon 
$393  Pennsylvania 
$492  Rhode Island 
$539  South Carolina 
$481  South Dakota 

$2,561  Tennessee 

$426  Texas 
$454  Utah 
$405  Vermont 
$381  Virginia 
$641  Washington 
$424  West Virginia 
$595  Wisconsin 
$296  Wyoming 
$437 

$260 
$721 
$962 
$639 
$4,351 
$761 
$9,267 
$4,140 
$218 
$5,462 
$1,215 
$1,832 
$6,009 
$465 
$1,606 
$303 
$2,571 
$11,237 
$912 
$274 
$3,333 
$3,186 
$616 
$3,523 
$353 

$259 
$409 
$465 
$499 
$518 
$378 
$508 
$503 
$322 
$478 
$348 
$507 
$489 
$460 
$398 
$374 
$431 
$523 
$378 
$430 
$455 
$509 
$333 
$643 
$621 

Senator  BURNS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Pelton.  We  appreciate  that  very 

much. 

Mr. Andersson? 

STATEMENT OF MATTHEW G. ANDERSSON, SENIOR 

AVIATION CONSULTANT, AEROSPACE, DEFENSE, AND 

TRANSPORTATION, CRA INTERNATIONAL, INC. 

Mr. ANDERSSON. Members of the Senate Aviation Subcommittee, 

my comments here—— 

Senator BURNS. Am I pronouncing that right, or do you have an-

other pronunciation when you put to ‘‘s’s’’ in it? 

Mr. ANDERSSON. No, it’s just that that’s the Swedish variety. 
Senator BURNS. OK. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. You Svedes. OK. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. Ja, sure. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. ANDERSSON. Members of the Senate Aviation Subcommittee, 
my comments here, as well as my purpose today in answering your 
questions,  are  necessarily  limited  to  VLJ  economic,  business,  and 
policy  issues  and  their  implications  for  the  NAS.  Of  course,  I  wel-
come any questions you may have on broader civil aviation develop-
ment, and will endeavor to respond to the best of my abilities. 

My  background,  briefly,  includes  more  than  25  years  of  private 
and  commercial  aviation  management  experience,  including  over 
10,000  hours  as  an  airline  transport  pilot.  I  was  the  founder  and 
CEO  of  Indigo  Airlines,  an  American  Express  Corporation-backed 
venture, and currently serve as a senior aviation consultant to CRA 
International,  or  Charles  River  Associates,  a  leading  provider  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

economic,  financial,  business,  legal,  and  regulatory  consulting,  re-
cently ranked by Forbes as one of the top 100 fastest-growing serv-
ice  firms.  Founded  and  in  business  continuously  since  1965,  with 
over a thousand specialists around the globe, serving Fortune 500, 
government,  and  new  businesses  across  more  than  12  sectors,  in-
cluding  aerospace,  defense,  and  transportation,  our  firm  is  known 
worldwide  for  its  innovations  and  expertise  in  travel  analysis  and 
forecasting. 

My objectives here today in this particular forum are not to pro-
vide  an  oral  defense,  per  se,  of  the  economic  impact  study,  but  to 
help  explain  some  of  the  features  of  the  results,  and  to  translate 
these  into  real-world  examples,  including  their  merit  as  indicators 
of industrial market development. 

As  for  the  report’s  accuracy,  only  one  thing  is  certain:  it  will  be 
wrong.  All  forecasts  are.  But  getting  it  right  also  means  what 
‘‘right’’ means. This can range from the right numbers to the right 
market  and  industry  direction  to  the  right  trend,  the  right  reality. 
For  some  descriptive  comparison  of  previously  unexpected  devel-
opments in air travel, consider, among others, the growth of shared 
or  so-called  fractional  jet  services.  In  1985,  this  industry  didn’t 
exist; today, one company alone is considered a top-ten airline, with 
a  fleet  that  rivals  the  world’s  largest.  In  2005,  the  private  jet  in-
dustry  was  the  recipient  of  over  $10  billion  in  new  business;  the 
consumers  diverted  from  traditional  airline  service.  Why?  This  is 
how  consumers,  your  constituents,  increasingly  want  to  travel  re-
gionally. 

Allow  me  to  preface  the  remarks  concerning  NAS  management 
with an underlying position. The current debate or contest between 
the airline industry and general aviation and the private-jet sector 
is unproductive and unnecessary. Far from a nuisance, the VLJ in-
dustry will represent a family of worker bees pollinating their envi-
ronment and experts at making honey. And traditional airlines will 
continue to work toward improving their products and services, and 
mass  public  transportation  will  continue  to  be  a  central  critical 
backbone  of  our  Nation’s  economy.  Both  air  networks  will  share  a 
need  for  increasingly  intelligent  ATC  capabilities  and  financing, 
such that these advances in benefits can be operationalized. 

Airlines  and  GA  need  not  fight  an  antagonistic  battle.  Working 
together  on  strengthening  our  aviation  industry,  in  all  its  forms, 
along  with  a—along  with  driving  forward  breakthroughs  in  tech-
nology,  material  science,  propulsion,  and  processing,  will  only  best 
serve  the  American  public,  American  business,  and  America’s  fu-
ture. 

NAS  ramifications  are,  in  my  view,  straightforward  and  clear. 
There’s  no  shortage  of  airspace.  VLJs  will  not  constrain  airspace. 
Business  jets  will  not  compromise  airline  operations.  VLJs  will 
productivize  dormant  aviation  assets.  Intelligent  ATC  will 
revolutionalize  density  assumptions.  NGATS  must  be  funded,  re-
gardless  of  the  slope  of  UAV  and  VLJ  growth  curves,  because 
NGATS is really a recapitalization issue. 

As  for  new  aircraft  in  the  NAS,  the  topic  of  today’s  hearing,  it 
is helpful to consider that long before the concept of an airline was 
introduced, aviation was born from individual aspiration, with indi-
viduals  operating  small  private  aircraft  for  personal  and  business 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

purposes. And right alongside the introduction of the very first pas-
senger  jets  were  also  the  very  first  business  jets,  including  the 
Sabre,  JetStar,  Learjet,  Falcon,  Gulfstream,  Cessna,  and  now  the 
VLJ,  a  natural  development  from  a  long  series  of  built-to-purpose 
aircraft. 

Relatedly,  it  is  important  to  maintain  context  over  relative  rep-
resentation of airline and GA aircraft in the NAS. Airline capacity, 
operational  intensity,  and  inventory  levels  vary  based  on  several 
competitive issues and can often represent significant excess levels 
over  demand.  A  generally  held  view  is  that  airline  capacity  is  still 
excessive,  some  believe  as  much  as  30  percent.  Moreover,  our  de-
regulation  regime  supports  nearly  constant  entry  of  new  carriers, 
and ‘‘Open Skies’’ will invite yet more capacity. GA business, jet or 
air-taxi  flight  operations,  on  the  other  hand,  do  not  compete,  per 
se,  for  market  share  through  blind  inventory  creation.  They  fulfill 
actual  demand  in  regional  catchment  areas;  indeed,  they  are  de-
mand-pulled, rather than supply pushed, and may represent an in-
herent efficient equilibrium. Further, VLJ production levels and air 
taxi  operations,  among  others,  will  generally  reflect  actual  con-
sumer demand. Aircraft and seat inventory will not spoil on a daily 
basis, like traditional airline inventory. VLJs and VLJ services will 
be mass-customized rather than mass-supplied. 

Implied  economic  impact,  jobs,  and  earnings  from  our  recent 
study are, indeed, meaningful. It indicates to me that we could wit-
ness  not  merely  a  new  segment  of  civil  aviation,  but  a  whole  new 
industry,  one  based  on  the  powerful  effects  of  decreasing  product 
and  service  cost  and  its  ability  to  make  individual  jet  transpor-
tation  available  to  the  broader  public.  Moreover,  the  indications  of 
work  productivity  achievable  from  such  travel  tools  and  services 
are  serious,  millions  of  precious  travel  hours  worth  billions  of  dol-
lars saved every year, ones that can be reinvested back in our econ-
omy. 

Please  keep  in  mind,  however,  that  these  initial  estimations  of 
future production impact are, in the context of other current forms 
of  transportation,  are  still  modest.  Indeed,  it  is  my  view  that  the 
study  is  conservative  in  its  conclusions,  but  literal  in  its  implica-
tions:  that  the  democratization  of  personal  air  travel  may  be  upon 
us; and, if so, the future of urban and short-distance air travel will 
be very much different from the one we know today. 

Regardless of your acceptance or rejection of this view, one thing 
is  certain,  individuals  will  continue  to  gain  increasing  control  over 
their  air  mobility,  as  we  have  witnessed  over  communication  and 
computing  tools.  We  can  argue  over  forecasts.  What  we  cannot 
deny,  however,  is  inexorable  fact,  technology,  in  all  its  forms,  gets 
smaller, better, cheaper, faster, smarter, and more broadly diffused 
across the marketplace. 

Allow  me  to  conclude  with  what  I  believe  to  be  a  key  message. 
The  topic  under  our  consideration  is  not  just  important,  it  is  of 
vital  national  significance.  Air  travel  is  a  young  industry.  Only  50 
years  ago,  the  first  jet  aircraft  was  introduced  into  commercial 
service. The aviation industry is capable of developing in ways just 
as  dramatic  as  it  did  when  we  went  from  the  Wright  Flyer  to  the 
first  passenger  jet.  More  so,  in  fact.  It  will  be  led  by  U.S.  aviation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

entrepreneurship  while  advancing  and  building  on  aviation  know- 
how. 

No  one  rivals  the  U.S.  in  aviation.  India  may  have  call  centers; 
China, low-tech manufacturing; the Middle East, oil; and Japan, its 
auto  industry.  But  the  U.S.  owns  aerospace.  It  is  critical  that  all 
of  us  do  not  unintentionally  neglect  or  short  sell  U.S.  aviation 
dominance expertise with the future of this industry. 

I urge you to join forces with the Nation’s entrepreneurs and pro-
fessionals,  some  of  whom  are  here  today,  to  make  certain  that  we 
succeed. As American technology pioneer Alan Kay said, ‘‘The best 
way to predict the future is to invent it.’’ This Nation’s aviation fu-
ture is too important and promising to leave to chance. 

Thank you, and I look forward to your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Andersson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MATTHEW G. ANDERSSON, SENIOR AVIATION CONSULTANT, 

AEROSPACE, DEFENSE, AND TRANSPORTATION, CRA INTERNATIONAL, INC. 

Introduction 

Members of the Senate Aviation Subcommittee, I appreciate this opportunity and 

am pleased to testify this morning on a very important topic. 

My comments here, as well as my purpose today in answering your questions are 
necessarily  limited  to  VLJ  economic,  business  and  policy  issues  and  their  implica-
tions  for  the  NAS,  ATC  modernization  and  FAA  reauthorization.  I  am  an  exclusive 
senior consultant to CRA, not an employee; some views may be strictly my own pro-
fessional ones. 

Of course I welcome any inquiries you may have on broader civil aviation develop-

ment, and will endeavor to respond to the best of my abilities. 
Background 

My relevant background briefly, includes more than 25 years of private and com-
mercial aviation management experience, including over 10,000 hours as an Airline 
Transport Pilot. I come from an aviation family. My father, Lee, was a Navy veteran 
and  Eastern  Airlines  Captain.  My  mother,  Bobbi,  was  a  Colonial  Airlines  DC–3 
‘‘stewardess.’’  I  leaned  to  fly  at  age  11  in  a  Piper  Cub  on  a  grass  field  in  Con-
necticut, and graduated from Embry Riddle Aeronautical University at age 19. I re-
ceived  a  B.A.  degree  and  studied  economics  with  W.W.  Rostow  at  the  Johnson 
School  of  Public  Policy  at  the  University  of  Texas  at  Austin  and  received  an  MBA 
in economics from the University of Chicago. I was the Founder and CEO of Indigo 
Airlines,  an  American  Express  Corporation  backed  venture  and  currently  serve  as 
a  Senior  Aviation  Consultant  to  CRA  International  (Charles  River  Associates)  a 
leading provider of economic, financial, business, legal and regulatory consulting, re-
cently  ranked  by  Forbes  among  the  top  100  fastest  growing  service  firms,  founded 
and in business continuously since 1965 with over 1,000 specialists around the globe 
serving  Fortune  500,  government  and  new  businesses  across  more  than  12  sectors 
including aerospace, defense and transportation. Our firm is comprised primarily of 
Ph.D.  level  economists,  engineers  and  other  specialists  and  is  known  worldwide  for 
its innovations and expertise in travel analysis and forecasting. 
Overview of VLJ EI Analysis 

The  VLJ  economic  impact  study  that  you  have  been  supplied  with  and  that  our 
firm produced was commissioned by Eclipse Aviation and is part of a growing body 
of  formal  analysis  directed  at  producing  a  sharper  understanding  of  this  important 
new transportation initiative. 

My  objectives  here  today  in  this  particular  forum  are  not  to  provide  an  oral  de-
fense  per  se  of  the  study  but  to  help  explain  some  of  the  features  of  the  results, 
and  to  translate  these  into  real  world  examples,  including  their  merit  as  indicators 
of  industrial  and  market  development,  such  that  the  Nation’s  aviation  infrastruc-
ture  is  contemplated  in  light  of  demands  on  system  modernization  and  processing 
capacity, consumer/constituent benefits—and of course, ATC funding. 

The EI study concludes that a range of VLJ production is reasonable and provides 
from a base-case and higher production scenario, likely economic impacts organized 
as user, direct, indirect and induced. There is not a probability weighting across the 
scenarios  but  a  sensitivity  to  variance  addressed  through  production  variation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Moreover, it is important to understand that our focus was on EI, given certain as-
sumptions of VLJ production. We are currently conducting a much more formalized 
and comprehensive unit forecasting analysis. 

As  for  the  reports  accuracy,  only  one  thing  is  certain:  it  will  be  wrong.  All  fore-
casts are. But getting it ‘‘right’’ also means what ‘‘right’’ means. This can range from 
the  right  numbers,  to  the  right  market  and  industry  direction,  the  right  trend,  to 
the  right  reality,  the  right  view  of  the  world.  And  for  some  descriptive  comparison 
of  previously  unexpected  developments  in  air  travel,  consider,  among  others,  the 
growth  of  shared  or  so-called  fractional  jet  services.  In  1985  this  industry  didn’t 
exist.  Today,  one  company  alone  is  considered  a  ‘‘top-ten’’  airline  with  a  fleet  as 
large  as  the  world’s  largest  airline,  and  as  an  industry  continues  to  attract  record 
numbers  of  consumers.  In  2005,  the  private  jet  industry  was  the  recipient  of  over 
$10 Billion in new business that consumers diverted from traditional airline service. 
Why? This is how consumers—your constituents—increasingly want to travel. 
Competitive Airspace Considerations 

Allow  me  to  preface  some  remarks  concerning  NAS  management  with  an  under-
lying position: the current debate (contest) between the airline industry and the gen-
eral  aviation/private  jet  sector  is  an  ill-founded  one;  it  is  unproductive,  distracting 
and  unnecessary.  Various  sound  bites  including  ‘‘a  blip  is  a  blip;’’  ‘‘mosquito  fleet’’ 
or  ‘‘Pterodactyl  airlines’’  are  not  helpful  and  needlessly  antagonistic.  Most  impor-
tantly they are not accurate. Consider for example, the airline industry. Their posi-
tion may not even be relevant to today’s topic. Airlines are concerned right now es-
pecially,  not  so  much  with  the  future,  but  with  survival.  Airlines  are  subject  to  a 
legacy  regulatory  system  that  is  central  to  their  struggles.  The  ‘‘Hill’’  is  merely  an-
other  platform  for  cost  divestiture  in  the  absence  of  a  comprehensive,  supportive 
regulatory  and  policy  regime.  As  for  the  notion  of  a  ‘‘mosquito  fleet,’’  I  prefer  a 
smart team of peregrine falcons, of fast swallows, or a VLJ family of ‘‘worker bees,’’ 
pollinating their environment and experts at making honey. 

Relatedly,  the  consternation  over  so-called  user  fees  may  be  misplaced.  The  FAA 
broadly,  is  in  my  view  a  public  good  that  will  be  publicly  financed,  with  targeted 
private  participation.  User  fees  may  serve  as  a  proxy  for  private  sector  financing 
preconditions. Then again, they may not. And future infrastructure finance require-
ments  likely  in  high  excess  of  both  funding  levels  and  funding  duration  stemming 
from  this  limited  component.  And  of  course  the  source  of  funding  is  fungible  and 
always  the  same:  the  consumer.  Whether  various  income,  sales,  estate,  transaction 
or  ticket  tax  receipts;  user  fees  passed  through  to  the  consumer;  or  private  equity 
investing pension funds, the consumer pays. We can vary the descriptor but the sub-
ject  remains  unchanged.  As  for  ‘‘new  aircraft  in  the  NAS’’  it  may  be  helpful  to  con-
sider  that  long  before  the  concept  of  an  airline  was  introduced,  aviation  was  born 
from  individual  aspiration;  of  individuals  operating  small,  private  aircraft  for  per-
sonal  and  business  purposes.  And  right  alongside  the  introduction  of  the  very  first 
passenger  jets  were  also  the  very  first  business  jets;  including  the  Sabre,  Jetstar, 
Lear Jet, Falcon, Gulfstream (in civil and military use) and now the VLJ: a natural 
development from a long series of built-to-purpose aircraft. 
UAVs in the NAS 

Concerning  UAVs,  I  limit  my  response  to  the  following  issue:  detection.  UAVs 
must  possess  4-Pi  steradian  or  full  spherical  coverage  to  operate  safely  outside  re-
stricted  airspace  in  the  NAS.  UAVs  must  posses  a  sensor  capable  of  fulfilling  the 
FAA’s ‘‘sense and avoid’’ requirement and this must be applied across the full range 
of  UAV  types,  from  large  winged  loiter  craft  to  small  tactical  UAVs  that  may  re-
quire a ultra-wide-band (UWB) capability for high range-resolution across microstrip 
patch-array  antennas  directed  at  object  avoidance  (power  lines,  telephone  poles, 
buildings,  towers,  trees,  etc).  I  direct  your  attention  to  Mr.  William  Cotton,  Presi-
dent, Flight Safety Technologies, Inc. for further elaboration and possible expert tes-
timony on this subject. 
Position on New Aircraft Vis-a` -Vis the U.S. Aviation System 

NAS ramifications are in my view, straight forward and clear: 

1. There is no shortage of airspace. 
2. VLJs will not constrain airspace. 
3. Personal jets will not compromise airline operations. 
4. VLJs will productivize dormant aviation assets. 
5. Intelligent ATC will revolutionize density assumptions. 
6.  NGATS  must  be  funded  regardless  of  the  slope  of  UAV  and  VLJ  growth 
curves (NGATS is really a recap issue). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Indeed,  not  unlike  automotive  development,  there  are  various  sports  cars,  family 
cars, SUVs, motorcycles, campers, LTL and LH trucks and many other forms of sur-
face  vehicles  and  multimodal  interaction  that  all  rather  peacefully  coexist,  if  not 
mutually  reinforce  each  other  (and  one  could  compare  telecommunication  networks 
similarly,  from  copper,  fiber,  ISDN,  cable,  satellite,  PCS,  cellular,  radio,  VoIP)  as 
airspace will becomes ‘‘digitized.’’ 

Finally, implied EI, jobs and earnings from our recent study are indeed meaning-
ful. It indicates to me that we could witness not merely a new segment of civil avia-
tion, but a whole new industry, one based on the powerful effects of decreasing prod-
uct  and  service  cost  and  its  ability  to  make  individual  jet  transportation  available 
to the broader public. Moreover, the indications of work productivity achievable from 
such  travel  tools  and  services  are  serious:  millions  of  precious  travel  hours  saved 
every year, ones that can be ‘‘reinvested’’ back in our economy. 

Please  keep  in  mind,  however,  that  these  initial  estimations  of  future  production 
and impact are, in the context of other current forms of transportation, still modest. 
Indeed,  it  is  my  view  that  the  study  is  conservative  in  its  conclusions  but  liberal 
in  its  implications:  that  the  ‘‘democratization’’  of  personal  air  travel  may  be  upon 
us,  and  if  so,  the  future  of  urban  and  short-distance  air  travel  will  be  very  much 
different than the one we know today. 

Regardless  of  your  acceptance  or  rejection  of  this  view,  one  thing  is  certain:  indi-
viduals  will  continue  to  gain  increasing  control  over  their  air  mobility,  as  we  have 
witnessed  over  communication  and  computing  tools.  As  Steve  Forbes  insightfully 
stated over a decade ago, ‘‘Small jets are starting to do to the airline industry what 
PCs did to mainframe computing; minimills did to steel; cellular is doing to teleph-
ony;  mutual  funds  are  starting  to  do  to  centrally  managed  corporate  and  govern-
ment  pension  plans  and  eventually  will  do  to  Social  Security;  and  what  coming 
minigenerators will do to massive power plants—give customers more service, more 
flexibility,  more  control  at  less  cost,  as  well  as  generate  new  products  and  services. 
Its about power moving away from the machine-age center toward individuals of the 
microchip era.’’ 

Moreover,  traditional  airlines  will  continue  to  work  toward  improving  their  prod-
ucts and services and mass public transportation will continue to be a central, crit-
ical  backbone  of  our  Nation’s  economy.  Both  air  networks  will  share  a  need  for  in-
creasingly  ‘‘intelligent’’  ATC  capabilities  (and  financing)  such  that  these  advances 
and benefits can be operationalized. Airlines and GA need not fight an antagonistic 
battle.  Working  together  on  strengthening  our  aviation  industry—in  all  its  forms— 
along  with  driving  forward  breakthroughs  in  technology,  material  science,  propul-
sion  and  processing,  will  only  best  serve  the  American  public,  American  business, 
and American government. 
Conclusion 

Allow  me  to  conclude  with  what  I  believe  to  be  a  key  message:  the  topic  under 

our consideration is not just important, it is of vital National significance. 

Air  travel  is  a  young  industry.  Only  50  years  ago  the  first  jet  aircraft  was  intro-
duced  into  commercial  service.  The  impact  on  communication,  economic  develop-
ment  and  business  productivity  has  been  profound.  But  perhaps  we  have  lost  our 
perspective  as  well  as  our  ambition:  in  all  the  confusion  and  turmoil  of  aviation 
dramas  we  may  easily  lose  sight  of  the  real  goal;  it  isn’t  just  commercial  survival, 
but  continuous  modernization,  fundamental  scientific  advancement  and  technical 
and service progress. The aviation industry is capable of developing in ways just as 
dramatic  as  it  did  when  we  went  from  the  Wright  Flyer  to  the  first  passenger  jet. 
More  so,  in  fact.  It  will  be  lead  by  U.S.  aviation  entrepreneurship  while  advancing 
and building on U.S. aviation know-how. 

But rather than fixating on what one airline’s quarterly financial results were, we 
should  ask  first  where  America’s  future  is;  what  the  next  generation  of  flight  will 
look like, and what it will take to get there. Some of that future is testifying today. 
In  addition  to  VLJs  and  personal  air  mobility  services  such  as  air  taxi,  we  should 
be engaged in a flurry of inventive activity that brings us new, quiet supersonic air-
craft,  new  blended  wing  designs,  new  forms  of  propulsion  and  material  science,  en-
tirely  new  ways  of  processing  a  flight  from  take-off  to  touch-down,  and  especially, 
new kinds of thinking. 

The  airline  industry  is  capable  of  developing  in  ways  just  as  dramatic  as  it  did 
when  we  went  from  the  Wright  Flyer  to  the  first  passenger  jet.  More  so,  in  fact. 
But  first  we’re  going  to  have  to  get  our  economics  right.  And  that  also  means 
crafting a U.S. national airline policy. 

Most observers often forget just how big and how important the overall U.S. mar-
ket  is  to  the  rest  of  the  world.  America’s  GDP  is  over  $11  Trillion;  Japan  is  a  very 
distant  second  of  $4.5  Trillion  while  Germany  and  France  around  $2T  each.  The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

GDP of California alone is larger than Spain, Italy and even Russia; over twice the 
size of Australian GDP and together with several other states including Texas, larg-
er than all of China. If the U.S. grew 10 percent in 1 year it would produce another 
‘‘Canada.’’  America’s  aviation  markets  are  no  less  dramatic.  More  passengers  fly 
more  often  on  more  aircraft  to  more  places  than  in  any  other  country.  Our  aero-
space,  defense,  commercial  and  space  programs  lead  the  world.  No  one  rivals  the 
U.S.  in  aviation.  India  may  have  call  centers,  China  low  tech  manufacturing,  the 
Middle East oil and Japan its auto industry, but the U.S. owns aerospace. 

It  is  critical  that  all  of  us  do  not  unintentionally  neglect  or  short  sell,  U.S.  avia-
tion dominance, U.S. aviation expertise or the potential and future of the U.S. avia-
tion industry. 

America’s  aviation  system  can’t  meet  all  of  its  challenges  alone.  Industry  can’t 
carry all the load. But neither can government. Until we raise aviation’s moderniza-
tion requirements to a national policy level of importance, can we expect the private 
sector  and  government  to  be  able  to  join  forces  coherently  and  reliably  around  a 
comprehensive modernization objective, and then actually realize it. 

The  late  President  Ronald  Reagan  said  that  everyone  American  is  a  shareholder 
in government; so for my  1⁄300 Millionth equity share, I urge you to join forces with 
the  Nation’s  entrepreneurs  and  aviation  professionals,  some  of  whom  are  here 
today,  to  make  certain,  that  we  succeed.  As  American  technology  pioneer  Alan  Kay 
said, ‘‘The best way to predict the future, is to invent it.’’ Captain Picard might say 
‘‘Make it so.’’ Nike would say, ‘‘Just do it.’’ 

I  say,  this  Nation’s  aviation  future  is  too  important  and  promising  to  leave  to 

chance. 

Thank you and I look forward to your questions. 

Senator BURNS. Thank you very much. 
I was interested in your assumption that—the important part or 
your  testimony  said,  ‘‘No  matter  what  we  do,  we’ll  probably  be 
wrong.’’  I  can  remember  sitting  at  this  dais  whenever  we  did  the 
telecom bill in 1996, when we tried to predict the use of cell phones 
by the year 2000. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. How far could we be wrong? And I will tell you, 
I’m  not  a  very  good  forecaster,  because  the  first  cell  phone  that  I 
looked  at,  I  said,  ‘‘Who  in  the  world  would  ever  own  one  of  those? 
We still have pay phones, don’t we?’’ And—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BURNS.—I  think  I  said  the  same  dumb  thing  about  fac-

simile machines, also. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. But, nonetheless, I appreciate your testimony. 
Mr.  Raburn,  your  testimony,  you  state  that  the  most  promising 
market for the Eclipse 500 is the new air taxi industry. In fact, the 
largest percentage of your orders will be for those designed for that 
market.  Some  are  skeptical  of  that  growth.  That  already  is  an  ex-
isting market. Why are you confident that the air taxi market will 
continue to grow with the introduction of the lighter jets? 

Mr.  RABURN.  Well,  just  to  follow  onto  your  comments,  Senator, 
I’ve been involved in introductions of lots of new technology, includ-
ing opening one of the very first computer stores in the Nation over 
30 years ago, to being the 18th employee of Microsoft, when we in-
troduced  all  kinds  of  new  technology,  and  all  I  can  tell  you  is,  the 
forecasters  are  always  wrong.  The  skeptics  are  always  wrong.  The 
numbers are always bigger when you actually solve a problem. And 
it’s very simple, when you look at the air tax model, the ‘‘per-seat, 
on-demand’’  model,  they’re  solving  a  problem.  And  the  problem  is, 
people  today  need  to  take  a  lot  of  time  to  go  between  secondary, 
smaller  communities,  especially  if  you’re  not  going  from  a  small 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

community to a large city and you’re going between two small com-
munities.  I  live  in  a  State  where  that  happens  every  single  day, 
just  as  you  do.  And  the  simple  fact  of  the  matter  is,  there  are  a 
lot  of  people  out  there  today  who  need  a  better  form  of  transpor-
tation. 

So,  I  find  it  inconceivable  that  the  air  taxi  model  couldn’t  work. 
It  does  require  two  things.  It  requires  a  very  different  kind  of  air-
plane,  an  aircraft  that  is  designed,  from  the  beginning,  to  be  not 
only  efficient,  from  a  cost  standpoint—meaning  fuel  expense  and 
maintenance—but also very, very reliable. In other words, it has to 
be like a Boeing. The second thing that it requires—and our friends 
at  DayJet  have  done  a  marvelous  job  of  this—is  a  whole  new  way 
of  dispatching  and  managing  these  aircraft.  And  it’s  really  tech-
nology out of the Internet world that’s providing that—not just web 
access,  but  the  theory  behind  network  management—that  will 
make this possible. 

So,  there  really  are  two  technology  changes  that  is  enabling  the 
air  taxi.  The  fact  that  there  is  demand,  I  have  no  problem  with, 
because  I  live  in  the  pain  every  day,  personally,  of  trying  to  get 
around this Nation if I don’t have my own airplane to fly. 

Senator  BURNS.  I  would  pose  the  same  question  to  Mr.  Pelton, 
because you’re competitors, of course, in the market of building air-
planes, and I would like to hear his view on that. 

Mr. PELTON. Well, certainly at Cessna we are hoping that the air 
taxi  market  does  emerge,  because  it  will  be  good  for  our  industry. 
We built our Citation Mustang in our business plan around conven-
tional  wisdom,  in  the  assumption  that  what  we  know  today  will 
hold  true  going  forward,  and  that  there  would  not  be  an  emerging 
air  taxi  market.  So,  certainly  our  forecasts  are  significantly  lower 
than some of the other competitors within the industry. 

When  we  look  at  the  very  light  jet  market  in  concept,  we’re  ad-
dressing it with the existing known fractional providers, air charter 
providers, individual owner/operators, and corporations buying that 
airplane.  And  today,  we’ve  successfully  sold  into  that  market  and 
have  not  been  able  to  penetrate  the  air  taxi  market.  So,  I  think 
there are probably two different ends of the spectrum, although we 
are  optimistically  hoping  that  the  market  does  emerge,  because  it 
will be good for everybody in the industry. 

Senator BURNS. The folks from DayJet, do they concur with that 

model? 

Mr.  IACOBUCCI.  Well,  Chairman  Burns,  with  all  due  respect  to 
my  industry  partners  here,  I  think  that  the  VLJ  is  a  part  of  the 
story.  It  is  what  we’d  like  to  term  a  necessary,  but  not  sufficient, 
condition  for  the  creation  of  this  new  market.  We  view  this—and 
the  reason  that  there’s  so  much  skepticism  around  this  is  that 
aviation hasn’t seen an incremental market, much in the same way 
that technology’s seen—you cited cell phones; I could cite the Inter-
net,  even  desktop  computing—are  all  examples  of  markets  that, 
when  we  started,  everyone  was  very  skeptical,  because  it  didn’t 
exist before. 

In  the  context  of  aviation,  in  particular,  there  hasn’t  been  any 
transformative changes that have created new groups of users com-
ing to the market. I believe—firmly believe—DayJet believes—that 
the  short-haul  transportation  between  hard-to-get-to  places  not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

only  serves  a  good  common  cause,  but  has,  also,  the  potential  for 
developing  a  true  incremental  market  where  people—not  CEOs, 
COOs;  I’m  talking  about  servicepeople,  engineers,  auditors,  law-
yers,  you  name  it—that  today  are  forced  to  drive  the  500–600 
miles,  yet  are  willing  to  investigate  other  options,  but  just  don’t 
have that option today. Going all the way up to a charter is far too 
cost  prohibitive  for  a  CEO  to  cut  loose  his  senior  salesperson  to 
close  a  couple  of  deals  or  for  a  support  person  to  fix  something. 
Happens sometimes, but it’s very unlikely. 

So, yes, I believe that there is a market. I believe that both gen-
tlemen here actually demonstrate the two ends of the spectrum, in 
terms  of  the  assessment  of  that  market.  And  naturally,  from  our 
perspective, we’re very confident the market exists, and that’s what 
our business plan is built on. 

Senator BURNS. Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The  topic  is  one  of  great  personal  interest  to  me.  I  like  aviation, 
and  have  spent  a  lot  of  time  flying  around;  never  at  the  helm,  but 
always  interested  in  what’s  going  into  technology.  And  over  the 
years,  I  wrote  legislation  to  insist  on  transponder  C’s  in  all  areas, 
except the busiest. And I’m concerned about safety. 

I worry about one thing. By the way, Mr. Raburn and Mr. Pelton, 
I am also very excited about the prospects that this new—the new 
light  jets  bring.  I  really—I  see  it  in  so  many  ways.  Every  time  I 
get  in  the  car  between  here  and  the  New  York  area  and  find  out 
that  the  car  is  never  fast  enough  to  make  a  decent—trip  decent, 
I  look  longingly  at  aviation.  And  then  I  get  to  the  airport,  and  I 
wait an hour or a half-hour to take off, and the flight’s 36 minutes, 
but the waits are an hour and a half. So, these are terrific opportu-
nities. 

And I asked a question of the earlier panel about commercial via-
bility.  I  view  general  aviation  as  something  that  companies  own 
and people own and so forth, but I—of course, commercial viability 
is expressed in different manners. I worry about whether or not the 
infrastructure  for  dealing  with  this  new  phenomenon  is  in  place. 
Because it can’t be the same. 

Mr.  Raburn,  I  think  you  said  something  about,  ‘‘We  won’t  see 
parking—airports  become  parking  lots  for  very  light  jets,’’  but  I 
think,  in  some  cases,  you  will  see  that  kind  of  a  condition.  And 
it’s—and will a tower or some kind of a management system be re-
quired? In a way, I hope so. 

Let  me  ask  you  this  question.  The  noise  factor  in  light  jets,  rel-

atively insignificant, a lot less than the typical stage-3 aircraft? 

Mr. RABURN. Senator, if I may, we just finished our FAA certifi-
cation  testing  for  noise  levels  on  the  Eclipse  500.  It  has  been  cer-
tified at a noise level that’s 41 decibels lower than stage-4 require-
ments,  which  is  not  even  yet  promulgated.  In  other  words,  that’s 
51 decibels lower than the current stage-3 requirements. 

What  that  means,  practically,  is,  this  jet  is  quieter  than  any 
other  jet  flying  today.  It’s  quieter  than  any  twin  propeller  flying 
today. And it’s quieter than all but about a dozen single-engine pis-
ton airplanes flying today. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. Well, Mr. Pelton, how do you feel about—— 
Mr.  PELTON.  Well,  I  guess  I’d  like  to  answer  it  on  behalf  of 
GAMA, not Cessna, because GAMA’s looking very hard at, How do 
we, as an industry, recognize that noise is an issue that upsets peo-
ple at local airports and ends up causing problems with our future 
growth? So, we are very active in looking at, How do we move for-
ward  with  getting  into  mandatory  stage–3  requirements?  And,  as 
Mr.  Raburn  mentioned,  all  of  our  new  airplanes  are  certified  well 
beyond stage 3 and well beyond proposed stage–4 requirements. So, 
we  feel  we’re  doing  the  right  things,  environmentally,  long  term 
with  our  new  products,  and  we  also  support  the  necessary  regu-
latory rules to move into the stage-3 environment. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Do  the  VLJs,  more  than—are  they  single- 

engine or are they all twins or—— 

Mr.  RABURN.  The  current  certified  ones  are  twins.  That’s  the 

Mr. PELTON. Twins. 
Mr. RABURN.—and the Eclipse. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Is  it  intended  that  there  will  be  singles 

Mustang—— 

out—— 

50 

So, this jet—and I think Mr. Sabatani made the comment that— 
because  he’s  seen  demos  of  the  aircraft—that  you  really  can’t  hear 
the aircraft as it takes off and goes by. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Depends upon your hearing, huh? 
Mr.  RABURN.  Well,  that’s  true,  too.  I’ve  flown  for  so  long,  I  don’t 

have much hearing left, either. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. No, but that’s a kind of surprise, that you 
can’t  notice  it.  I—so,  do  you  think  these  aircraft  can  help  replace 
some of the stage-2s that still—that remain around? 

Mr. RABURN. I’m sure Mr. Pelton and I would just love to replace 

those airplanes. 

Mr.  RABURN.  There  are  announced  single-engine  airplanes,  yes. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. There are now. 
Mr. RABURN. None of them are certified now. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I  wish  you  luck.  I  think  it  would  be 
a terrific addition to our convenience and economic well-being. And, 
without  dating  myself  too  much,  I  watched  the  first  unmanned  jet 
bombs  ever  flown.  I  was  a  solder  in  Antwerp,  Belgium,  while  the 
city  was  being  hit  by  B–1s,  B–2s.  The  B–1  was  the  jet.  But  I  also 
saw—I think the airplane was made by Fokker—a jet airplane fol-
lowed  by  British  Spitfires.  And  the  distance  that  opened  between 
them  was  incredible.  It—and  I  thought—and  I  was  young  once, 
and—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator BURNS. Aw. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And I thought—yes. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Wiseguy. Don’t talk. Look in the mirror. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, I—but what scared me, even as a 20- 
year-old—‘‘My  God,  what’s—if  these  people  have  that  kind  of  tech-
nology,  where  are—will  we  be  if  this  war  continues?’’  And,  fortu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

nately,  the  fates  had  it  that  we  changed  the  course  of  events  and 
came out a stronger country for it all. 

Thanks very much. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator BURNS. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
Well, I will tell you that I’m not as young as you think I am, be-
cause  I  can  remember  when  the—when  Continental  flew  the  first 
707  into  Kansas  City,  old  MKC,  downtown  Kansas  City.  And  that 
was—that’s  been  several  years  ago.  And  I  went  to  work  for  Ozark 
Airlines, and we were still flying—at the time, we were flying—still 
flying  DC–3s,  but,  I’ll  tell  you  what,  they  were  modified,  and  they 
had the wheel covers, if you remember. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  BURNS.  We  were  the  only  airline  that  had  wheel  covers 

on a DC–3. But we were pretty modern. 

And  tell  me  about  the  new  powerplants.  We  are  all  concerned 
about  fuel,  fuel  efficiency,  cost  of  fuel,  which  is  probably  your  big-
gest  cost  in  operating  air  taxis,  or  whatever  you’re  doing  with  air-
craft.  Tell  me  about  the  new  powerplants.  Can  anybody  bring  me 
up to date on that? Mr. Andersson probably could, and Mr. Pelton, 
for sure. Can you—— 
Mr. PELTON. It’s—— 
Senator BURNS.—comment on those, please? 
Mr. PELTON. Yes. It’s been—the engine manufacturers have done 
a  remarkable  job  of  addressing  the  fuel  efficiency  issue,  and  Mr. 
Raburn’s  airplane  and  my  airplane  both  has  a  Pratt  &  Whitney 
600-series powerplant on it, which is the latest technology and the 
most  efficient  engine  out  there  today.  It’s  probably  20  percent  less 
fuel  consumption  of  what  the  turbine  engines  of  20  years  ago  con-
sumed,  and  it’s  fully  electrical—electrical,  digitally  controlled.  We 
see continual movement by the engine manufacturers in addressing 
the  efficiency  aspect  of  fuel,  along  with  probably  what’s  most  im-
portant,  as  what  comes  out  the  back  end  of  the  engine.  The  real 
issue—we’re  dealing  with  the  environment  and  making  sure  that 
low  carbons,  low  NOx,  is  being  addressed  by  the  engine  manufac-
turers.  And  with  our  two  new  products,  we’ve  really  made  a  step- 
function change in that area, and we’re seeing engine manufactur-
ers aggressively addressing that issue. 

For the manufacture—for the engine companies to compete glob-
ally,  they  have  to  address  that,  because  of  the—the  green  stand-
ards  in  Europe,  which  are  far  more  stringent  than  they  are  here, 
are going to drive where aviation goes. 

Senator  BURNS.  Use  of  new  materials.  Are  they  lighter  engines 

than we’ve known in the past? 

Mr.  RABURN.  Both  engines  are  for—on  a  per-pound,  per-thrust 
basis,  are  about—again,  about  20  percent  lighter  than  previous. 
That’s  a  combination  of  not  necessarily  new  materials,  but  new 
manufacturing techniques and, to some extent, new materials. 

Senator BURNS. In other words, you’ve got some—OK. 
Tell me about—we are looking at developing new fuels. We think 
we  can—through  coal  gasification,  we  can  build  a  cleaner  and— 
more trending toward the green side of a jet fuel. And we know we 
can,  as  far  as  diesel  is  concerned,  and  that’s  a  very  close  kind  of 
operation.  So,  I  appreciate  that,  and—but  the  efficiency  of  the  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

gines, I think, are of primary concern, because of fuel costs and this 
type thing. And that. 

I just want to—I appreciate your testimony. I read all your testi-
mony last night. And I look forward to working with all of you, be-
cause,  as  we  go  down  this  road  of  FAA  reauthorization—I’ll  come 
back  to  that  again,  that  I  think  you  folks  ought  to  be  at  the  table 
whenever  we  do  this,  for  new  technologies  and  how  we  handle  our 
traffic. And, there again, we’re in the business of safety. And I ap-
preciate  your  views  and  your  insight  on  entering  a  new  era,  I 
think, probably in aviation here in this country. So I appreciate all 
of you. 

Mr.  Andersson,  I  was  particularly  interested  in  yours—in  your 
testimony,  and  I’ll—I  want  you  at  the  table,  too,  because  you’re 
pretty  candid,  and  because—but  I’ll—but  it’s  really  good,  though, 
if  we  have  folks  like  you  that  have  hands  on  in  the  industry,  in 
every phase of it, as we go down this trail. 

So,  I  think  there  will  be  questions  posed  to  this  panel  by  other 
Members  of  this  Committee.  If  there  are,  if  you  could  respond  to 
the  Committee  and  to  the  individual  Senators,  that  would  be  very 
good. 

We  look  forward  in  working  with  you.  And,  at  this  point,  we’re 

going to call this hearing to an end. Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 11:40 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Rapid  advances  in  technology  present  both  tremendous  opportunities  and  signifi-
cant  challenges  for  our  system  of  air  travel.  The  introduction  of  hundreds,  maybe 
thousands,  of  very  light  jets  (VLJs)  into  our  Nation’s  air  space  could  transform  the 
way people travel, but it presents challenges the Congress must address. If our poli-
cies  do  not  support  improvements  to  our  system  of  air  traffic  control,  the  impact  of 
very light jets and other new aircraft in the national airspace could have severe con-
sequences for safety and air traffic management. Wise decisions now will allow our 
aerospace system and industry to evolve in a way that could provide significant ben-
efits for American consumers and businesses. 

I  am  very  familiar  with  air  charter  operations,  which  have  long  served  my  state 
of  Hawaii,  and  the  idea  of  introducing  these  new  VLJs  to  develop  air  taxi  services 
in  targeted  markets  is  intriguing.  Yet  this  type  of  service  is  still  in  the  planning 
stages  and  no  one  is  sure  how  this  business  will  develop  and  how  great  the  impact 
of micro-jets will be on our airspace. 

All accounts indicate that the very first VLJs will begin to enter our skies by the 
end  of  this  year,  and  we  will  need  to  pay  close  attention  to  how  these  aircraft  are 
used  and  whether  the  system  can  handle  the  additional  air  traffic.  VLJs  hold  a  lot 
of  promise  for  those  underserved  or  isolated  communities  that  have  not  received 
adequate  air  service  in  the  past.  If  these  new  micro-jets  will  make  remote  commu-
nities more accessible to the rest of the country and give their residents better trav-
el options, then they will serve the American public well. 

The  Senate  Commerce  Committee  already  has  begun  to  consider  aspects  of  the 
Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  reauthorization  legislation  which  will  need 
to be passed during the 110th Congress. Air traffic modernization and FAA funding 
will  be  key  components  of  this  bill,  and  we  must  be  certain  that  the  National  Air 
Space  is  flexible  enough  to  accommodate  changes  in  aircraft  capability  both  in  the 
near-term  and  well  into  the  future.  The  impact  of  new  aircraft  like  VLJs  will  be 
part of this equation and will require close attention from the Congress. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. CONRAD BURNS TO 

EDWARD E. IACOBUCCI 

Question. What about convective weather in the United States. The FAA air traf-
fic control system suffers huge unavoidable system delays that often impact all traf-
fic in regions. How will you schedule around such weather interruption?JLW 

Answer.  DayJet  has  developed  an  Advanced  System  for  Real  Time  Optimization 
or  ASTRO.  Because  our  ‘‘per  seat—on  demand’’  service  is  unscheduled  we  dynami-
cally  manage  our  fleet  and  personnel  to  meet  the  needs  of  our  customers.  When 
weather  forces  changes  in  itineraries  and  flight  plans  we  can  adapt  in  real-time. 
The  result  is  that  as  weather  approaches  or  develops  we  change  our  movements  to 
accommodate  the  weather  with  the  least  level  of  service  disruption  for  passengers 
while maintaining a high fleet optimization and efficiency. 

Additionally,  our  routes  and  altitudes  avoid  airline  traffic  and  Class  B  airspace 
so we do not add challenges for FAA Air Traffic Control during challenging recovery 
times due to weather or other circumstances. Our investment in the most advanced 
on-board technology allows us to be very precise on all four dimensions of flight in-
cluding  time.  The  result  of  our  collaborative  work  with  the  FAA  and  ATC  over  the 
past  several  years  will  increasingly  enable  us  to  leverage  the  use  satellite-based 
high  precision  approaches,  precision  navigation  and  precision  performance  to  fly 
routes and approaches which require minimal workload for air traffic control under 
all conditions. 

(53) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. CONRAD BURNS TO 

VERN RABURN 

Question  1.  Since  we  are  talking  about  new  more  modern  ways  of  producing  and 
operating  new  aircraft,  do  you  have  any  recommendations  about  the  FAA  aircraft 
certification process at this point? If very light jet expected sales doubled as the in-
dustry  study  estimates,  do  you  think  the  FAA  regulatory  and  safety  and  certifi-
cation  process  keep  up  with  demand  for  new  aircraft?  If  not,  do  you  have  any  rec-
ommendations for improvements? 

Answer. There are two basic aspects to the certification process—design approval 
and  operational  approval.  The  FAA  has  been  very  proactive  in  accepting  the  new 
technologies  and  capabilities  very  light  jets  deliver  in  the  design  approval  process. 
However, a ‘‘fear of jets’’ mindset still plays a role in the operational approval proc-
ess.  The  FAA  is  asking  that  very  light  jets  meet  higher  regulatory  standards  than 
similarly sized propeller-driven aircraft, simply because they are ‘‘jets.’’ Moving for-
ward,  we  recommend  a  fundamental  shift  in  thinking.  Small  jets  should  not  be 
viewed  as  more  complex  aircraft  from  an  operational  perspective.  Rather,  they 
should  be  acknowledged  as  modern  aircraft  that  have  more  reliable  systems  than 
similar propeller driven aircraft and are easier to operate. 

As  far  as  the  FAA  keeping  up  with  the  possible  growth  in  this  market,  we  were 
very  fortunate  that  the  FAA  committed  adequate  resources  to  help  us  achieve  our 
goal of type certification. However, if the same FAA office had been forced to divide 
its  attention  between  two  similar  projects  at  the  same  time,  they  could  not  have 
adequately  supported  both.  We  think  there  are  two  primary  ways  to  address  this 
problem:  (1)  allocate  additional  FAA  funding  to  ensure  adequate  resources  or  (2) 
provide for more creative and efficient means of delegation. 

We believe that the FAA’s pursuit of enhanced Organizational Delegation (ODA’s) 
is  a  step  in  the  right  direction.  This  puts  more  of  the  responsibility  of  ‘‘day-to-day’’ 
certification  activity  on  the  manufacturer,  with  the  FAA  evolving  more  to  an  over-
sight  organization  that  focuses  on  specific  safety-critical  items.  This  will  require  a 
cultural  change  with  both  manufacturers  and  within  the  FAA.  Manufacturers  will 
need  to  take  this  responsibility  very  seriously  as  they  will  be  acting  on  behalf  of 
the  FAA.  Manufacturers  should  be  required  to  develop  structured  training,  and  a 
system of checks-and-balances to ensure efficiency, effectiveness and objectivity. The 
FAA  will  need  to  adjust  to  not  being  involved  in  the  details  of  engineering/certifi-
cation activity, and successfully evolve into a project management organization. 

Question  2.  In  terms  of  competition  with  airlines,  do  you  see  your  Eclipse  cus-
tomers taking customers away from airlines for complete (origination to destination) 
trips  or  just  flying  passengers  from  remote  places  to  the  air  lines  for  connecting 
service?  Wouldn’t  flying  passengers  to  places  where  there  is  commercial  air  service 
put these aircraft in congested terminal airspaces? 

Answer.  VLJ  operators  will  not  be  competing  directly  with  airlines  at  the  con-
gested  hub  airports.  At  a  foundational  level,  air  taxi  operators  would  not  be  able 
to compete on a cost basis with the airlines if they were flying from one hub to an-
other, or from a hub to a medium-size community. Existing FAA data supports this 
assumption,  as  general  aviation  operations  account  for  only  6  percent  of  the  oper-
ations  at  Operational  Evolution  Plan  (OEP)  35  airports.  In  addition,  there  is  abso-
lutely no correlation when comparing the 20 busiest general aviation airports to the 
20  busiest  airports  for  airlines.  In  fact,  there  are  no  airlines  operating  out  of  the 
20 busiest GA airports. 

I  want  to  further  illustrate  this  point  by  referencing  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Con-
trol,  January–March  2006,  (Attachment  ‘‘1’’,  page  42).  ‘‘The  VLJ  business  model  is 
based  on  providing  convenient,  personal  point-to-point  services  through  non-con-
gested airports. VLJ passengers will be time sensitive and convenience-minded, and 
they will use VLJs precisely to avoid the hassles associated with large hubs. Second, 
VLJ aircraft are specifically designed to operate from runways as short as 3,000 feet 
(including  many  grass  strips).  This  makes  them  ideal  for  providing  point-to-point 
services to most of the 5,000+ U.S. airports serving small to medium sized markets.’’ 
Even if a VLJ operator decided to operate into a hub airport, that operation would 
not  cause  congestion.  Once  again,  as  detailed  in  the  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control, 
January–March 2006, (Attachment ‘‘1’’, page 42), ‘‘The effect of VLJ operations into 
hub airports will be minimal for a number of reasons: VLJ pilots will need adequate 
prior experience and will receive rigorous training, equivalent in many cases to that 
for commercial pilots; VLJ aircraft will have advanced integrated avionics to provide 
enhanced  pilot  situational  awareness,  enable  seamless  traffic  flow  integration  and 
optimal  spacing  with  commercial  traffic  flows;  VLJs  are  capable  of  operating  at 
speeds  compatible  to  those  of  commercial  jet  aircraft  throughout  the  terminal  area 
and  until  well  inside  the  final  approach  fix;  VLJ  climb  and  descent  rates  are  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

patible  with  commercial  turbojet  aircraft;  VLJ  aircraft  can  land  and  depart  safely 
using  shorter  runways,  unusable  by  commercial  jet  traffic.  Even  regional  jets  re-
quire those same longer runways. On intersecting runways, VLJ aircraft are capable 
of routine (LAHSO) Land and Hold Short Operations; and finally, to enhance traffic 
integration even more, new procedures that take advantage of VLJ performance and 
avionics capability can be developed.’’ 

Today, businesses are moving away from the coastal metropolises and toward the 
center  of  the  country.  Consequently,  an  increasing  number  of  individuals  want  and 
need  to  travel  from  smaller  communities  to  other  smaller  communities.  Currently, 
these  travelers  face  a  frustrating  lack  of  commercial  air  transportation  service.  If 
they  attempt  air  travel,  they  are  spending  excessive  amounts  of  travel  time  being 
routed  through  hubs  to  make  connecting  flights.  As  a  result,  these  individuals  are 
choosing one of three alternatives: (1) planning and suffering through a day of travel 
for even the shortest trips, (2) driving or (3) not traveling at all. Our nation is filled 
with  communities  in  which  citizens  do  not  benefit  from  a  convenient  level  of  air 
service.  As  a  result,  these  communities  are  grappling  with  growing  citizen  frustra-
tion,  business  inefficiency,  dwindling  business  development  opportunities  and  little 
to no economic growth. 

Question 3. You state that VLJs will not use or overtax congested airspace around 
hub airports, could you explain about how these aircraft will use of the rest of FAA 
controlled  airspace  both  en  route  and  terminal?  Will  these  flights  adversely  impact 
this airspace? Will VLJ flights add to the FAA workload? 

Answer. As I stated in my testimony, the reality is that there is significant avail-
able  airspace  to  accommodate  these  new  aircraft.  Under  Administrator  Marion 
Blakey,  great  progress  has  been  made  and  the  transformation  to  NGATS  has  al-
ready  begun.  Last  year  we  doubled  the  capacity  of  airspace  system  between  FL290 
and FL410 with RVSM, significantly increasing the amount of space between those 
altitudes.  WAAS  is  now  a  reality,  and  RNAV  and  RNP  are  happening.  Moreover, 
it  is  important  to  note  the  airspace  is  three  dimensional.  This  is  not  a  two-lane 
highway  where  you  are  permanently  stuck  behind  the  truck  in  front  of  you.  VLJs 
are technologically advanced and nimble. They are more than capable of getting out 
of the way of faster airplanes. Moving around in the airspace is something airplanes 
do  everyday,  most  often  when  the  commercial  airlines  go  up  and  down  in  altitude 
looking for a smooth ride. 

As  stated  in  the  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control,  ‘‘Commercial  jet  traffic  will  con-
tinue to dominate in the higher altitudes. VLJ operations will generally be on short-
er  routes  under  600  statute  miles  and  mainly  at  altitudes  below  those  on  longer- 
range  commercial  operations.  Sometimes,  especially  on  longer  stage  lengths,  VLJs 
will  want  or  need  to  operate  at  the  higher  altitudes,  but  even  then  VLJs  will  not 
disrupt en route traffic flows, even though they cruise at 0.64 mach, slightly slower 
than  commercial  airliners.  Current  Flight  Management  System  (FMS)  technology 
already enables faster moving aircraft to establish offset tracks so as to pass slower 
aircraft  en  route.’’  The  article  goes  on  to  say,  ‘‘In  the  ongoing  debate  about  the  im-
pact of VLJ operation, the question of VLJ speed compatibility has been raised fre-
quently. In large measure, this is a red herring. The commercial and business fleets 
of  today  operate  at  a  variety  of  climb,  cruise,  descent,  and  approach  speeds,  based 
not just on aircraft type, weight, and performance differences but also on variations 
in  company  policies.  Even  with  today’s  1950s  ATC  technology,  controllers  are  able 
to integrate traffic of varying speeds quite efficiently, so VLJs will add no significant 
complexity.’’  Journal  of  Air  Traffic  Control,  January–March  2006,  (Attachment  ‘‘1’’, 
pages 42 & 43). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. CONRAD BURNS TO 

MATTHEW G. ANDERSSON 

Question 1. What is the reason why your underlying model in your analysis shows 
that over time travelers (business and others) will shift out of cars and commercial 
aircraft to on demand air taxi services? 

Answer. Value, pricing, disposable income, choice criteria and behavioral/cognitive 
assumptions  from  economic  theory  are  among  factors  affecting  consumer  decision-
making. The modes (or technologies) get adopted as their utility increases over time. 
The utility is a function of network effects (scale): the more users, the more valuable 
the  service,  the  higher  the  utility  associated  with  joining  the  network  (this  may  be 
squared:  Metcalfe  V=n2 (square  of  the  number  of  users);  Log:  Odzliko/Tully: 
V=n(logn) 
logarithmic);  or  exponential:  Reed:  number 
subgroups=n2¥N¥1  or  2Λn  which  grow  exponentially  (subgroups  +  all  other  con-
nections).  Utility  also  increases  as  user  costs  decrease,  and  which  is  realized  when 

(connections  vary; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

fixed  costs  are  allocated  over  more  users.  Technological  advances  can  also  decrease 
cost. An illustration of a utility expression: 

56 

Utility theory assumes that (1) users and suppliers have perfect information about 
the market; (2) they have deterministic functions (faced with the same options, they 
will  always  make  the  same  choices);  and  (3)  switching  between  alternatives  is 
costless. 

Question 2. Looking at your first map in your testimony on the distribution of an-
nual originating trips by VLJ air taxi by U.S. county, please explain the huge num-
ber of trips in Southern California and the Southwest? 

Answer.  These  maps  indicate  among  other  elements,  the  level  of  forecast  trip 
origination  to  other  counties  by  a  ‘‘gravity’’  model  structure.  Factors  affecting  trip 
origination include population density, trading patterns, travel patterns, income and 
other socioeconomic elements. Number of trips depend on population, airport choice 
and  intensity  of  several  socioeconomics  factors.  The  gravity  model  reflects  certain 
relationships  between  places  (e.g.,  households  and  work  locations).  It  has  been  pos-
ited  that  the  interaction  between  two  locations  declines  with  increasing  distance, 
time, and cost between them, but is positively associated with the amount of activity 
at each location (Isard. 1956). Reilly (1929) formulated a ‘‘law of retail gravitation’’, 
and  Stewart  (1948)  formulated  definitions  of  demographic  force,  energy,  and  poten-
tial, now called accessibility (Hansen, 1959). The distance decay factor of 1/distance 
has  been  updated  to  a  more  comprehensive  function  of  generalized  cost,  which  is 
not  necessarily  linear—a  negative  exponential  tends  to  be  the  preferred  form.  In 
analogy  with  Newton’s  law  of  gravity,  a  gravity  model  is  often  used  in  transpor-
tation  planning.  The  rate  of  decline  of  the  interaction  (called  alternatively,  the  im-
pedance or friction factor, or the utility or propensity function) has to be empirically 
measured,  and  varies  by  context.  While  the  gravity  model  is  very  successful  in  ex-
plaining  the  choice  of  a  large  number  of  individuals,  the  choice  of  any  given  indi-
vidual  varies  greatly  from  the  predicted  value.  As  applied  in  an  urban  travel  de-
mand  context,  the  disutilities  are  primarily  time,  distance,  and  cost,  although  dis-
crete  choice  models  with  the  application  of  more  expansive  utility  expressions  are 
sometimes  used,  as  is  stratification  by  income  or  auto  ownership  (ref:  GNU  docu-
mentation/license). 

Mathematically, the gravity model can take the form: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
d
n
a

57 

Question 3. How does that compare to today in that area? What do you think ac-

counts for the increase in air taxi trips? 

Answer.  The  map  does  not  indicate  current  or  historic  trip  origination.  The  fore-
cast  in  part  reflects  economic  relationships  between  counties;  over  time  these  may 
change. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

I. Introduction 
A. ATA Introduction and Purpose 

The airspace system in the United States is fast approaching a critical point. Sev-
eral  very  decisive  factors  are  in  plain  view;  they  will  profoundly  affect  the  system 
and its future ability to serve users. First, the system must be modernized. Existing 
and anticipated satellite-based navigation and communications technologies must be 
leveraged  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  the  system  and  its  ability  to  accommodate 
substantial  new  demand  for  air  traffic  services.  Second,  an  equitable  way  to  fund 
those  system  improvements  must  be  developed.  Third,  the  impact  on  the  system  of 
the  much-anticipated  introduction  of  great  numbers  of  very  light  jets  (VLJs)  must 
be evaluated and dealt with. It is this last matter—the airspace implications of this 
new category of system user—that is the subject of our statement. 

The  Air  Transport  Association  of  America,  Inc.  (ATA)  is  the  principal  trade  and 
service  organization  of  the  U.S.  airline  industry,  and  its  members 1 transport  over 
ninety percent of U.S. airline passenger and cargo traffic. As of June 30, 2006, ATA 
member airlines were operating a fleet of 4,316 airplanes. 

As  a  key  stakeholder  in  our  Nation’s  aviation  system,  ATA  respectfully  submits 
these  comments  to  the  Aviation  Subcommittee  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Com-
merce, Science, and Transportation. 
B. ATA Member Airlines Enable our Nation’s Economic Engine 

The U.S. civil aviation sector (including air transportation, related manufacturing 
and  air-based  travel  and  tourism)  was  collectively  responsible  for  $1.37  trillion  of 
national  output  (i.e.,  economic  activity)  in  2004,  supporting  12.3  million  U.S.  em-
ployees and $418 billion in personal earnings. Commercial aviation accounts for the 
majority of this impact with $1.2 trillion in output, $380 billion in earnings and 11.4 
million jobs. 

1 Members  are:  ABX  Air,  Alaska  Airlines,  Aloha  Airlines,  American  Airlines,  ASTAR  Air 
Cargo,  ATA  Airlines,  Atlas  Air,  Continental  Airlines,  Delta  Air  Lines,  Evergreen  International 
Airlines,  Federal  Express  Corporation,  Hawaiian  Airlines,  JetBlue  Airways,  Midwest  Airlines, 
Northwest  Airlines,  Southwest  Airlines,  United  Airlines,  UPS  Airlines  and  US  Airways.  Asso-
ciate  members  are:  Aerovı´as  de  Me´xico,  Air  Canada,  Air  Jamaica  and  Mexicana  de  Aviacio´n. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
d
n
a

58 

The national economy is highly dependent on commercial aviation, which, in 2004, 
was  directly  or  indirectly  responsible  for  5.8  percent  of  gross  output,  5.0  percent  of 
personal earnings and 8.8 percent of national employment. 2 

These  extraordinary  economic  benefits  could  not  have  been  generated  without  an 
aviation  infrastructure  that  enables  air  carriers  to  provide  the  services  that  pas-
sengers  and  shippers  demand.  Any  changes  to  our  Nation’s  aviation  system,  such 
as  the  introduction  and  proliferation  of  a  new  and  different  aircraft  type,  must  be 
carefully assessed to ensure that the public continues to benefit from a safe, healthy 
aviation system. 
C.  The  Introduction  of  VLJs  Will  Affect  All  National  Airspace  System  Stakeholders 
The  introduction  of  VLJs  into  the  National  Airspace  System  (NAS)  constitutes  a 
significant  change  and  will  have  far  reaching  and—at  this  point—not  entirely 
known  consequences.  What  we  do  know  is  that  their  impact  will  eventually  be  felt 
by  all  stakeholders,  including  airlines,  FAA,  manufacturers,  Fixed  Base  Operators 
(130s)  and  many  others.  However  this  plays  out,  stakeholders  share  an  obligation 
to ensure that their introduction does not jeopardize the unparalleled efficiency and 
safety of our NAS. 
II. Overview of Very Light Jets 
A. What is a Very Light Jet? 

A  VLJ,  also  called  a  microjet  or  personal  jet,  is  generally  defined  as  a  techno-
logically  advanced,  high-performance  turbine  engine-powered  aircraft  weighing 
10,000 pounds or less (maximum certificated takeoff weight) and certificated for sin-
gle  pilot  operations.  These  aircraft  will  feature  advanced  cockpit  automation,  such 
as  moving  map  GPS  and  multi-function  displays,  automated  engine  and  systems 
management, and integrated autoflight, autopilot and flight-guidance systems. 

The  cost  of  VLJs,  somewhere  in  the  range  of  $1.0M  to  $3.0M,  places  them  well 

within the reach of many businesses and individuals. 
B. Manufacturers and Models 

FAA estimates that there are presently some 20 models of VLJs in various stages 

of design, certification and production. Exhibit 1 highlights a sampling of VLJs. 

Exhibit 1. Sample of Very Light Jets in Development 

Name 

Company 

Orders 

First Delivery 

Eclipse 500 
Mustang 
Adam700 
EMB–VLJ 
Epic LT 
HondaJet 
D–Jet 

Eclipse Aviation 
Cessna 
Adam Aircraft 
Embraer 
Epic 
Honda 
Diamond Aircraft 

2,111 as of July 2004 
250 as of June 2004 
77 as of July 2004 
Not Disclosed 
Not Disclosed 
Pending Commitment  Pending Commitment 
Not Disclosed 

2006 
2006 
2006 
2008 
Not Available 

2006 

C. Performance: Not Your Father’s Airplane 

VLJs  will  offer  performance  comparable  to  high-end  business  jets  at  a  fraction  of 
the  price.  They  will  be  capable  of  operating  from  shorter  runways  than  commercial 
airliners  and  larger  business  jets,  enabling  them  to  utilize  a  large  number  of  air-
ports. 

VLJs  will  be  certificated  to  operate  at  maximum  altitudes  of  roughly  41,000  feet, 
enabling them to join commercial airliners and business jets in competing for finite 
en  route  airspace.  Unfortunately,  VLJs  will  have  maximum  cruise  speeds  at  those 
altitudes  that  are  significantly  slower  than  other  aircraft  (380  knots  versus  550 
knots).  This  difference  in  cruising  speed  will  pose  a  potentially  significant  airspace 
management issue. They will have a range of roughly 1,200 nautical miles and carry 
up to four passengers. 
D. Expected Uses 

Current  and  projected  aircraft  orders  illustrate  two  primary  categories  of  VLJ 
buyer. The first is an individual who plans to use the aircraft for recreational trans-
portation.  The  second,  and  much  larger  segment  of  buyer,  is  that  which  involves 
transporting  passengers  conducting  business  between  major  metropolitan  areas.  It 

2 The total impact of commercial aviation is compared to national aggregates of Gross Outputs 
and Personal Earnings (from the Bureau of Economic Accounts) and Total Covered Employment 
(from  the  Bureau  of  Labor  Statistics)  for  the  50  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia  combined. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

is important to note that while VLJs will frequently utilize secondary airports, those 
airports  are  typically  near—and  share  the  airspace  above—major  metropolitan 
areas. 
E. Projected Deliveries 

Predictions  regarding  the  number  of  VLJ  deliveries  vary  from  source  to  source. 
FAA  predicts  roughly  4,000  aircraft  deliveries  over  the  next  10  years,  while  others 
put the number at twice that. NASA translated their projections into flight activity 
and estimates that VLJs could account for 20,000 flights daily by the end of the 10- 
year period. 

While aviation industry experts may debate the actual number of aircraft eventu-
ally ordered, most agree that VLJs will appear in sufficient numbers to significantly 
increase demand on an already strained air traffic control system. 
III. Economic Implications 

The  early  interest  in  VLJs  clearly  illustrates  the  demand  in  the  marketplace  for 
an aircraft with its capabilities. It appears to fill the void between conventional pis-
ton  aircraft  and  high-end  business  jets  at  a  price  considered  reasonable  by  its  buy-
ers. 

Clearly the VLJ manufacturers and their suppliers stand to benefit from the sale 
of  these  new  aircraft.  Furthermore,  the  downstream  activities  linked  to  the  oper-
ation  and  support  of  these  aircraft  will  increase  access  and  revenue  to  smaller  air-
ports. VLJs will drive new business for FBOs due to demand for storage, fuel, main-
tenance and related services. 

Using VLJs, air taxi operators could open access to new business centers that pre-
viously  were  beyond  the  reach  of  available  aircraft.  This  new  access  could  generate 
new markets and opportunities resulting in further economic benefit. 

At  the  same  time,  any  incremental  economic  benefits  would  be  quickly  erased  if 
the  introduction  of  VLJs  leads  to  an  increase  in  airspace  congestion.  The  airspace 
above  major  metropolitan  areas  is  already  or  rapidly  becoming  congested,  and  any 
further increase in demand would cause an increase in delays for all users. 

Delays  are  especially  expensive  to  airlines  and  their  customers.  The  Department 
of Transportation has estimated that delays cost U.S. airline passengers $9.4 billion 
in 2005. In addition to those direct costs to passengers, delays cost airlines an esti-
mated  $62  per  minute  in  direct  (i.e.,  aircraft)  operating  costs.  Applied  to  the  94.1 
million  cumulative  delay  minutes  recorded  in  2005  reveals  $5.9  billion  in  industry 
costs.  Combining  the  passenger  and  airline  costs  produces  a  U.S.  economic  cost  of 
$15.3 billion or $484 every second. 
IV. Implications for Our National Airspace System 
A. VLJs Will Place Additional Demands on an Already Constrained ATC System 

The existing U.S. ATC system is based on vintage 1950s design concepts that can 
no longer be efficiently expanded to meet future demand. As the number of aircraft 
using  the  system  increases,  congestion  will  worsen  resulting  in  artificial  limits  on 
demand—access to our Nation’s airspace will be restricted to prevent total gridlock. 
Industry experts 3 have expressed concern over the ability of the ATC system to ac-
commodate growing demands: 

‘‘The  non-airline  turbine  powered  fleet  is  much  larger  than  the  air  carrier  tur-
bine-powered  fleet.  And  the  total  turbine-powered  fleet  is  projected  by  FAA  to 
increase  by  49  percent  over  the  next  11  years,  putting  considerable  stress  on 
the ATC system.’’ 

It isn’t hard to imagine a system where access to airspace is rationed. That is pre-
cisely  what  exists  today  at  New  York’s  LaGuardia  and  Chicago’s  O’Hare  airports. 
Congested  airspace  above  New  York  and  South  Florida  threatens  to  force  further 
restrictions.  It  is  critical  to  note  that  capacity  limitations  are  not  necessarily  tied 
to  a  lack  of  runway  or  terminal  capacity.  More  and  more,  airport  accessibility  is 
driven by the ability of the airspace above to accommodate the traffic. For example, 
VLJs  attempting  to  access  Fort  Lauderdale  Executive  Airport  may  be  blocked  by 
saturated airways even though the airport itself could handle the traffic. 

Integrating  VLJs  into  the  current  ATC  system  will  present  challenges  for  FAA 
and existing users. VLJs will be incompatible with existing aircraft using high-alti-
tude  airspace  because  they  cruise  at  significantly  slower  speeds.  Introducing  VLJs 
into  these  routes  is  analogous  to  allowing  tractors  on  a  freeway.  Air  traffic  control-
lers would be faced with an increased level of complexity. This increasingly complex 

3 Vaughn  Cordle  and  Robert  W.  Poole,  Jr.,  ‘‘Resolving  the  Crisis  in  Air  Traffic  Control  Fund-

ing,’’ 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

environment  translates  into  increased  controller  workload,  leading  to  excessive  and 
inefficient aircraft separation. 

Clearly  it  is  in  the  best  interest  of  VLJ  operators  and  all  other  users  of  our  Na-
tion’s airspace system to collaborate in building a system that safely, efficiently and 
equitably  accommodates  all  users.  Vern  Raburn,  President  and  CEO  of  VLJ  manu-
facturer  Eclipse  Aviation,  clearly  recognizes  the  importance  of  NAS  transformation 
on the success of his business: 

‘‘In  my  opinion,  we  need  to  be  asking  and  answering  the  hard  questions  that 
will  lead  to  implementation  of  a  next-generation  distributed  ATC  system.  And 
we should be doing it sooner, because later is already here.’’ 4 

Unfortunately,  the  revenue  collected  by  FAA  will  not  cover  their  costs  to  provide 
ATC  services  to  VLJ  operators  and  will  fall  far  short  of  the  amount  needed  to  fi-
nance  NAS  modernization.  FAA  will  be  faced  with  significantly  increasing  demand 
for  services  without  a  corresponding  increase  in  revenue.  To  illustrate  the  problem 
caused  by  today’s  FAA  funding  mechanism,  consider  that  a  typical  737  commercial 
airliner  flying  from  New  York  to  Fort  Lauderdale  pays  $1,506 5 toward  funding 
FAA, while an Eclipse 500 corporate VLJ on an identical route using the same ATC 
services  pays  only  $53. 6 Based  on  an  analysis  of  FAA’s  cost  data,  ATA  estimates 
that it costs FAA approximately $781 to provide those services. 
B. VLJs Could Introduce New Operational and Safety Risks 

Historically,  the  cruise  performance  capabilities  of  the  aircraft  operated  by  the 
various segments of the aviation community naturally segregated them into distinct 
operating  environments.  Larger,  faster  aircraft  (like  business  jets  and  commercial 
airliners) typically cruise above 28,000 feet, while piston-driven recreational and on- 
demand charter aircraft primarily operate at lower altitudes. 

VLJ performance will blur the lines between the blocks of airspace conventionally 
used  by  the  different  types  of  operators.  VLJ  operators  will  be  able  to  climb  to  and 
cruise  at  altitudes  that  previously  were  inaccessible  due  to  the  performance  limita-
tions of their previous aircraft. 

While  the  impact  of  VLJs  on  the  airport  terminal  airspace  environment  will  be 
more  a  function  of  the  number  of  operations  rather  than  an  issue  of  compatibility, 
the FAA must assess a broad array of integration considerations. Approach and de-
parture  patterns,  wake  turbulence  interaction  and  ramp  congestion  are  but  a  few. 
In  recognizing  that  the  potential  will  exist  for  relatively  inexperienced  pilots  to 
be operating high-tech aircraft in a complex and challenging environment, the FAA 
must  ensure  that  current  training,  experience  and  medical  standards  are  adequate 
to ensure the continued safety of the system. 
C. VLJs Will Consume Limited FAA Resources 
1. Initial Certification 

With some 20 VLJ models in various phases of certification, FAA is applying sig-
nificant  resources  in  an  effort  to  support  manufacturers’  production  and  delivery 
schedules.  While  some  certification  work  is  handled  indirectly  by  FAA  through  the 
designees,  the  direct  burden  on  FAA  is  significant.  FAA  resources  allocated  to  VLJ 
certification efforts delay other certification activity. 
2. Ongoing Safety and Regulatory Oversight 

After  certification  of  the  aircraft,  FAA  is  responsible  for  ensuring  that  the  users 
of  VLJs  comply  with  Federal  regulations  applicable  to  their  use  of  the  aircraft. 
While  oversight  of  individuals  flying  VLJs  recreationally  is  relatively  straight-
forward,  oversight  of  large  air  taxi  operators  operating  hundreds  of  aircraft  is  a 
complex and resource-intensive effort. In recent testimony before the House Aviation 
Subcommittee, the GAO observed that: 

‘‘Meeting the challenges posed by recent safety trends and program changes will 
be exacerbated by other changes in human capital management; the acquisition 
and  operation  of  new  safety  enhancing  technologies;  and  new  types  of  vehicles, 
such  as  very  light  jets  (VLJ),  that  may  place  additional  workload  strains  on 
FAA inspectors and air traffic controllers.’’ 7 

4 Vern Raburn, President and CEO, Eclipse Aviation, October 15, 2005. 
5 Commercial  airliner  tax  revenue  based  on  passenger,  cargo  and  fuel  taxes,  and  assumes  70 

percent load factor. Cargo and fuel taxes derived from DOT Form 41. 

6 Corporate VLJ tax revenue based on Part 91 operation and assumes full fuel load at depar-

ture. 

7 U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office,  Testimony  before  the  Subcommittee  on  Aviation, 

Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure, House of Representatives, GAO–06–1091T. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

3. Air Traffic Control 

The  performance  of  VLJs  and  their  apparent  incompatibility  with  existing  traffic 
in  the  terminal  and  en  route  environment  will  make  air  traffic  control  more  chal-
lenging. Mixing fast and slow traffic on high-altitude routes, as described previously, 
increases controller workload. Sequencing large and small aircraft in terminal areas 
to  reduce  the  effect  of  wake  turbulence  adds  complexity  for  controllers.  In  limited 
cases, FAA may be able to respond by adding additional controllers. The more com-
mon response will be to increase spacing to manage the difference in aircraft speeds 
and reduce workload. This results in wasted capacity and ultimately constraints on 
demand. 

In  the  July  2005  issue  of  Flight  Safety  Digest,  the  director  of  safety  and  tech-
nology  for  the  National  Air  Traffic  Controllers  Association,  and  a  former  controller, 
identified  the  relatively  low  cruising  speeds  of  VLJs  as  the  biggest  concern  for  con-
trollers: 

‘‘The biggest impact most likely will be in the en route environment . . . In the 
upper flight levels, speed will be an issue’’ 

He  also  expressed  concern  that  VLJs  will  have  an  impact  similar  to  other,  rel-

atively slow aircraft: 

‘‘The  early  (Cessna)  Citations  are  already  an  issue  for  us.  As  a  controller,  you 
have  to  be  aware  of  their  slower  speeds  so  that  you  don’t  run  them  down.  The 
very  light  jets  are  going  to  create  the  same  issue  if  they’re  put  into  the  same 
flow with commercial aircraft . . . I don’t think the VLJs will mix in well with 
the flow that we have today.’’ 
4. Use of Flight Service Stations 

The introduction of VLJs, or any aircraft other than those used by large commer-
cial air carriers, will drive a proportionate increase in the use of Flight Service Sta-
tions (FSS). FSS provide flight planning, weather and other related services to pilots 
free  of  charge.  As  the  number  of  users  increases,  so  will  the  demand  on  FSSs.  Un-
like general, corporate and business aviation users, commercial airlines typically do 
not use FSSs. 
V. Unmanned Aerial Vehicles Must Also Be Considered 

An  issue  closely  related  to  the  introduction  of  VLJs  is  that  of  unmanned  aerial 
vehicles  (UAVs).  While  not  the  focus  of  this  particular  hearing,  ATA  is  concerned 
about  the  aggressive  pace  of  their  introduction  into  the  NAS.  Although  most  are 
used  in  military  applications  today,  UAVs  are  rapidly  being  deployed  in  a  variety 
of non-military surveillance roles. 

Unfortunately, the nature and capabilities of most UAVs today, combined with op-
erators’  apparent  limitations  in  handling  UAVs,  require  that  large  blocks  of  valu-
able  airspace  be  quarantined  when  UAVs  are  in  use.  Clearly  this  approach  is  not 
a viable, long-term solution. 

The aviation industry will continue to work collaboratively to develop certification 
standards  and  operational  procedures  that  will  allow  UAVs  to  be  safely  integrated 
into the NAS. 
VI. Summary 

VLJs  are  an  exciting  innovation  and  a  testament  to  the  capabilities  of  the  U.S. 
aircraft  manufacturers.  Their  long-term  viability,  however,  will  be  governed  by  the 
ability of our National Airspace System to safely and efficiently accommodate them. 

ATA believes that the successful integration of VLJs hinges on the following: 
• FAA must ensure that robust standards are in place for certification, operation 

and training. 

nues to costs. 

ATC system. 

• FAA must segregate incompatible traffic to streamline flows. 
• FAA  must  employ  a  reliable  and  equitable  funding  mechanism  that  links  reve-

• FAA  must  use  that  revenue  to  create  capacity  through  modernization  of  the 

ATA  will  continue  to  advocate  a  safer,  smarter  and  fairer  system  that  satisfies 

the current needs of all users while scaling to meet future demand. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HONDA AIRCRAFT COMPANY 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Aviation Subcommittee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  submit  a  statement  for  the  record  on  the  Sep-
tember  28,  2006  hearing  entitled.  ‘‘New  Entrants  Into  the  National  Airspace  Sys-
tem.’’ 

On  July  25,  2006,  Honda  announced  its  intention  to  introduce  the  innovative 
HondaJet  into  the  very  light  jet  (VLJ)  market.  The  HondaJet  is  the  culmination  of 
more  than  20  years  of  aviation  research,  development  and  testing  to  validate  our 
technology.  The  initial  test  flight  took  place  in  December  2003  and  more  than  240 
hours  of  test  flights  have  occurred  between  December  2003  and  July  2006.  Produc-
tion of the HondaJet will occur in the U.S. with specific details on location and tim-
ing to be announced in the future. 

The design specifications of the HondaJet are as follows: 

Seating: 6 to 8. 
Length×Width×Height: 41.7×39.9×13.2 ft. 
Maximum Speed: 420 knots. 
Operational Ceiling: 41,000 ft. 
Range: 1,100 nautical miles. 

The  HondaJet  has  several  significant  technological  innovations  that  help  it  to 
achieve  superior  fuel  economy,  a  larger  cabin  and  more  luggage  base,  and  a  higher 
cruising speed compared with other aircraft in its class. 

The  HondaJet  has  a  natural-laminar  flow  (NLF)  wing  and  fuselage  nose  that  al-
lows  it  to  have  a  low  drag  coefficient  along  with  a  high  lift  coefficient.  These  were 
developed through extensive analyses and wind tunnel testing including sessions at 
the Boeing and NASA test facilities. 

The  HondaJet’s  patented  over-the-wing  mounted  engines  have  the  advantage  of 
eliminating the need for significant structures to mount the engines to the rear fuse-
lage. This in turn maximizes space for passengers and luggage. In addition, this de-
sign feature reduces drag at high speeds resulting in improved fuel economy. 

The all-composite fuselage of the HondaJet consists of honeycomb sandwich struc-

tures and stiffened panels. These reduce both weight and manufacturing costs. 

The  flight  deck  is  all  glass  state-of-the-art  with  integrated  avionics  and  digital 
graphics  on  a  high  resolution  flat  screen  display.  The  HondaJet  also  has  an  auto-
pilot function. 

In  August  2006,  Honda  announced  the  formation  of  Honda  Aircraft  Company, 
based  in  Greensboro,  NC.  Honda  Aircraft  Company  will  be  responsible  for  getting 
FAA  type  certification  and  production  certification.  The  new  company  will  also  be 
responsible  for  taking  sales  orders  beginning  this  fall  as  well  as  carrying  out  mar-
keting activities. 

Honda  has  formed  a  business  alliance  with  Piper  Aircraft.  Inc.  to  collaborate  on 
sales  and  service.  The  alliance  will  also  look  for  new  opportunities  in  the  areas  of 
engineering as well as general and business aviation. 

The  goal  of  our  aviation  endeavor,  consistent  with  our  other  Honda  products,  is 
to  provide  convenient  and  efficient  transportation  to  improve  the  quality  of  life  for 
our  customers.  The  entry  of  the  HondaJet  expands  the  list  of  mobility  products 
Honda has to offer. 

Honda  is  one  the  world’s  leading  producers  of  mobility  products  including  its  di-
verse line-up of automobiles, motorcycles and ATVs, power products, marine engines 
and  personal  watercraft.  Honda  is  the  world’s  preeminent  engine-maker,  with  an-
nual  worldwide  production  of  more  than  20  million  engines.  Honda  began  assem-
bling motorcycles in the U.S. in 1979, with U.S. automobile manufacturing starting 
in  1982.  We  currently  have  10  manufacturing  plants  in  the  U.S.  with  a  workforce 
of more than 29,000 associates. 

Thank you for the opportunity to submit this statement. We look forward to work-

ing with the Committee. 

A  copy  of  the  article,  The  Business  Jet  Market:  Here  to  Stay,  by  Richard 
Aboulafia, from the April 2006 issue of World Military & Civil Aircraft Briefing has 
been retained in Committee files. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:09 Dec 22, 2011 Jkt 071841 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\71841.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

